<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89710-0023 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-10-89.f2.A1022</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 130 / Monday, July 10, 1989 /Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Food and Drug Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">21 CFR Parts 10, 310, 314, and 320</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 85N-0214]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">RIN 0905-AB63</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Abbreviated New Drug Application Regulations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Food and Drug Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is proposing regulationsto implement Title I of the Drug Price Competition and Patent Term RestorationAct of 1984 (Pub. L. 98-417), which amends section 505 of the Federal Food,Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 355). The proposal provides for the submissionof abbreviated new drug applications for generic versions of drug productsfirst approved after 1962. Before enactment of Pub. L. 98-417, abbreviatedapplications were permitted under FDA regulations for generic versionsof drug products first approved between 1938 and 1962. These new provisionswill benefit consumers by making generic drug products available more quickly.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Comments by October 10, 1989. FDA proposes that any finalrule based on this proposal would become effective 60 days after its publicationin the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Written comments to the Dockets Management Branch (HFA-305),Food and Drug Administration, Rm. 4-62, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD20857.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Marilyn L. Watson, Center forDrug Evaluation and Research (HFD-360), Food and Drug Administration, 5600Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857, 301-295-8038.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="74">Table of Contents</ITAG>I. IntroductionII. BackgroundA. The Abbreviated New Drug Application (ANDA) Procedure for Pre-1962 DrugsB. Procedure for Duplicates of Post-1962 Drugs (``Paper NDA'' Policy)C. The Drug Price Competition and Patent Term Restoration Act of 1984D. Relationship to New Drug RegulationsIII. Highlights of this ProposalA. Abbreviated ApplicationsB. ANDA Suitability PetitionsC. 505(b)(2) ApplicationsD. Patent Information, Certification, and Notice of Certification to PatentOwner and Certain Application HoldersE. ExclusivityF. Withdrawal or Suspension of Approval of an ANDAIV. The ListV. Provisions of this ProposalA. DefinitionsB. Drug Products for Which Abbreviated Applications May Be SubmittedC. ANDA Suitability PetitionsD. Content and Format of an ANDAE. Notice of Certification of Invalidity or Noninfringement of a PatentF. Amendments to an Unapproved ANDAG. Other Applicant ResponsibilitiesH. Time Frames for FDA Actions on ANDA'sI. Applications Described by Section 505(b)(2) of the ActJ. Applications for Changes in Approved Drug Products that Require theReview of InvestigationsK. Delay in the Effective Date of Approval of an ANDA and 505(b)(2) ApplicationBecause of the Existence of a PatentL. ExclusivityM. Refusal to Approve ANDA'sN. Withdrawal or Suspension of Approval of ANDA'sO. Determination that a Listed Drug was Withdrawn for Safety or EffectivenessReasonsP. Removing Drugs from the ListQ. Patent Information in Full New Drug Applications and SupplementsR. Public Disclosure of Safety and Effectiveness DataVI. Conforming AmendmentsVII. Economic AssessmentVIII. Environmental ImpactIX. Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980X. Request for Comments<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Introduction</ITAG>On September 24, 1984, the President signed into law the Drug Price Competitionand Patent Term Restoration Act of 1984 (Pub. L. 98-417). Title I of thelaw amended the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (the act) to expandthe universe of drugs for which FDA would accept abbreviated new drug applications(ANDA's). Before enactment of Pub. L. 98-417, ANDA's were permitted underFDA regulations for duplicates, i.e., generic (different manufacturers')versions, only of drug products first approved between 1938 and 1962. Theterm ``duplicate'' applied to a drug product that was the same as an alreadyapproved drug product in dosage form, route of administration, kind andamount of active ingredient, indication(s), and any other conditions ofuse. The regulations permitted ANDA's for ``similar'' and ``related'' productsonly if FDA had made a separate finding, following a manufacturer's petition,that an ANDA was appropriate for that product. Title I provides for thesubmission of ANDA's for duplicates and certain related versions of drugproducts previously approved by FDA for safety and effectiveness and listedin the approved drug product list published by the agency. Title I furthermakes the existence of a patent on an approved drug a factor in the approvalof generic copies of that drug, and establishes a system (the so-called``exclusivity provisions'') for rewarding research associated with significantinnovation by providing for a delay in the submission or effective approvaldate of certain generic applications.Title II of Pub. L. 98-417 amended the patent law to provide for the extension,under certain circumstances, of the normal 17-year term of a product, use,or process patent of a patented product which is subject to premarketingclearance.The proposed rule set forth below, if adopted as a final rule, will implementTitle I of Pub. L. 98-417. Final regulations implementing the provisionsof Title II of the law were published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of March 7, 1988 (53 FR 7298). It should be notedthat although antibiotics are expressly covered by Title II, they are notcovered by Title I. Title I applies only to drugs approved under section505 of the act (21 U.S.C. 355). Antibiotics are approved under section507 of the act (21 U.S.C. 357). This proposed rule would, however, reorganizethe current regulations governing the abbreviated antibiotic applicationprocedures by placing them in a new subpart.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Background</ITAG>The act as passed by Congress in 1938 established a system of premarketclearance for drugs under which applicants seeking drug approval were requiredto submit to FDA a new drug application containing, among other things,data showing the drug's safety. (Sections 201(p)(1) and 505(a) as enacted(21 U.S.C. 321(p) and 355(a)).) The law at that time provided that a newdrug application would automatically become effective (i.e., the productcould be lawfully marketed) within a fixed period unless the agency affirmativelyrefused to approve the application.In addition to products for which a new drug application had become effective,many products were marketed without effective applications that were identical,similar, or related to products with effective applications. Manufacturersof such products either had concluded that their products were generallyrecognized as safe, or had received advisory opinions from the agency thata new drug application was not required because their products were generallyrecognized as safe (i.e., were not ``new drugs'').In 1962, Congress amended the drug approval provisions of the act to requireaffirmative approval of new drug applications before marketing. That approvalwas to be granted on the basis of a showing that a drug product was notonly safe but also effective. (Pub. L. 87-781 (October 10, 1962).) Thus,on or after October 10, 1962, a new drug could not be marketed withoutan approved new drug application that contained, in addition to safetydata, substantial evidence establishing that the drug was effective forits intended uses (21 U.S.C. 355(d)). Under the 1962 amendments, new drug applications that had become effectivebefore the effective date of those amendments were ``deemed'' approved.The requirement that drugs be shown to be effective for their intendeduses was also made applicable to drugs that had been deemed approved. Toimplement this Congressional mandate, FDA undertook a program to evaluatethe drugs that had been deemed approved to determine whether there wassubstantial evidence of their effectiveness, as the law required. The systematicevaluation of these drugs and the implementation of the findings of thisevaluation became known as the Drug Efficacy Study Implementation (DESI).Under this program, FDA contracted with the National Academy of Sciences/NationalResearch Council (NAS/NRC), which established panels of experts to reviewavailable evidence of effectiveness and to provide recommendations to theagency. FDA considered the NAS/NRC panels' recommendations about the effectivenessof these DESI drugs, and announced the agency's conclusions in <T4>Federal Register</T4> notices. These notices, referred to as DESI notices,set forth the acceptable marketing conditions for the class of productscovered by the notice. The DESI review covered over 4,000 specific productswhich had had new drug applications evaluated for safety only and had beenallowed to become effective between 1938 and 1962. A. The Abbreviated New Drug Application (ANDA) Procedure for Pre-1962 DrugsIf a manufacturer had a pre-1962 new drug application in effect for a drugproduct, FDA continued its approval if the manufacturer submitted a supplementalnew drug application to conform the product's indications for use to thosedetermined to be effective in the DESI review. As noted above, however,there were many drug products on the market that were identical in activeingredients and indications or very similar to the drug products foundeffective in the DESI review but for which no new drug application hadever been submitted. In implementing the DESI program with respect to theseduplicate products, FDA concluded that each such drug product was a ``newdrug'' that required its own approved new drug application before it couldbe legally marketed. <T3>United States </T3>v. <T3>Generix Drug Corp., </T3>460 U.S. 453 (1983) (act's definition of ``newdrug'' applies to the drug product rather than to the generic active ingredient).In addition, FDA issued a statement of policy that revoked the earlieradvisory opinions that drugs could be marketed without preclearance bythe agency. The statement of policy was published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of May 28, 1968 (33 FR 7758), and later codifiedat 21 CFR 310.100. To provide an appropriate procedure for approval of duplicate productsin reliance on the DESI evaluation, a procedure for submission of ANDA'swas established (34 FR 2673 (February 27, 1969); 35 FR 6574 (April 24,1970)). After FDA had found through the DESI review that a particular drugproduct was effective and suitable for ANDA's, FDA published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a DESI notice announcing these conclusions; anymanufacturer of a duplicate of the drug not already holding an approvednew drug application was then required to submit an ANDA to obtain approvalto market the duplicate version of the approved drug (35 FR 11273; July14, 1970). The approval of an ANDA before passage of Pub. L. 98-417 was based on thetheory that the evidence of effectiveness necessary for approval of a newdrug application had been provided, reviewed, and accepted during the DESIprocess. The evidence of safety of the drug had been determined on thebasis of information included in the pioneer new drug application and bythe subsequent marketing experience with the drug. The information currentlyrequired to be in an ANDA is specified in FDA's regulations in 21 CFR 314.55(e)and consists of information showing the applicant's ability to manufacturea product of acceptable quality that will be equivalent in its effectivenessand safety to the drug product whose safety and effectiveness is established.The ANDA thus contains information on the drug product's formulation, manufacture,quality control procedures, and labeling. In addition, the DESI noticemay identify other information that FDA requires in an ANDA for a specificdrug product, usually data on the bioavailability of the product showingthat it is similar to that of a standard product. The ANDA, therefore,provides for agency review of the same kind of product quality informationrequired in a full new drug application but omits the reports of investigationsestablishing the safety and effectiveness of the drug which are alreadyestablished.B. Procedure for Duplicates of Post-1962 Drugs (``Paper NDA'' Policy) FDA's ANDA policy established for pre-1962 drugs was never extended toduplicates of drugs first approved for marketing on or after October 10,1962. The agency long recognized the value of an ANDA system for the post-1962drugs and at various times considered and announced the possibility ofestablishing such a system either by regulation or through legislation(see, e.g., Drug Regulation Reform Act of 1978 (95th Cong., 2d Sess. (1978),Drug Regulation Reform Act of 1979 (96th Cong., 1st Sess. (1979), and proposedrule of September 1, 1978 (43 FR 39126)). During the 1970's and early 1980's,patents expired for many post-1962 drugs, including some high volume, therapeuticallyimportant drugs. As a result, many drug manufacturers became increasinglyinterested in changing FDA's new drug approval system to permit the submissionof ANDA's for duplicate versions of post-1962 drugs.FDA did allow some duplicate drug products of drugs first marketed after1962 to be marketed under FDA's ``paper NDA'' policy. (See 46 FR 27396;May 19, 1981, publication of ``Paper NDA'' memorandum.) Under that policy,FDA could approve new drug applications for post-1962 duplicate drug productson the basis of evidence of safety and effectiveness derived primarilyfrom published reports, if those reports were of well-controlled studies,thus eliminating the need for manufacturers to perform most of their owntests. Although the courts upheld the legality of paper NDA's (see, e.g.,<T3>Burroughs Wellcome Co. </T3>v. <T3>Schweiker, </T3>649 F.2d 221 (4th Cir. 1981)), adequate literature,including detailed reports of adequate and well-controlled studies, wasavailable for only a fraction of post-1962 drugs. Moreover, the staff effortinvolved in reviewing paper NDA's for drugs that were already availableand whose evidence of safety and effectiveness was already well documentedin a prior application was a substantial and wasteful use of agency resources.C. The Drug Price Competition and Patent Term Restoration Act of 1984 Beginning in 1978, Congress considered various forms of legislation thatwould have expressly authorized an ANDA procedure for duplicate versionsof post-1962 drugs, and, concurrently, legislation to restore patent lifelost during the new drug approval process. In 1984, Congress passed theDrug Price Competition and Patent Term Restoration Act of 1984 (Pub. L.98-417) which became law on September 24, 1984. The new law consists oftwo titles. Title I authorizes approval of generic new drugs and TitleII authorizes extension of patent terms for approved new drugs. The twoparts of the bill were intended to provide a careful balance between promotingcompetition among pioneer or brand-name and generic drugs, and encouragingresearch and innovation. The ANDA provisions of Title I provide for approvalof duplicate or related versions of approved drugs whose patents have expired,and that have been shown through the ANDA approval requirements to be assafe and effective as their brand name counterparts, but without the submissionof duplicative safety and effectiveness data. Thus, these provisions areintended to encourage competition by decreasing the time and expense ofbringing generic drugs to market, and thereby to provide the public withlow cost drugs. The patent term extension provisions of Title II provide for the extensionof drug patent terms beyond the normal 17 years to reflect the period ofpatent life lost during FDA's review of safety and effectiveness data forthe drug. These extensions of patent life are intended to encourage theinnovation necessary for the development of important new drug products,by increasing the period during which innovative products are protectedfrom competition. Title I specifically amends only the new drug provisions of the act atsection 505 and applies only to nonantibiotic human drugs submitted andapproved under section 505 of the act. The statutory authority for approvingantibiotics, including generic antibiotics and antibiotics in combinationwith other antibiotics or nonantibiotic active ingredients, is section507 of the act. Therefore, Title I does not apply to antibiotics. TitleI does, however, apply to new drugs containing insulin. Although certifiedunder section 506 of the act (21 U.S.C. 356), insulin-containing productsare approved under section 505 of the act. Section 505(j) of the act, as amended by the 1984 Amendments, establishesa statutory ANDA procedure for duplicate and related versions of previouslyapproved pioneer drug products, in which Congress intended to adopt withfew modifications the policies developed by FDA in the agency's approvalof ANDA's for pre-1962 drugs. Section 505(b)(1) of the act, as amended,requires that certain patent information be submitted to FDA for all previouslyapproved new drug applications, all newly submitted applications, and allapplications previously submitted but not yet approved. Section 505(b)(2)of the act, as amended, provides for the submission and approval of applicationsfor which the investigations relied on by the applicant to satisfy the``full reports'' of safety and effectiveness requirement were not conductedby or for the applicant and for which the applicant has not obtained aright of reference or use from the person who conducted the investigations.Section 505(l) of the act establishes rules for the public disclosure ofsafety and effectiveness data submitted as part of a new drug application.The new law also provides patent protection for the developer of pioneernew drugs by delaying the effective date of approval of an ANDA or 505(b)(2)application until all relevant product and use patents for the pioneerdrug have expired, or until the patent owner is notified of, and givenan opportunity to litigate, a challenge to such patents. In addition, fornew chemical entities (active moieties never before approved in the U.S.)and significant innovations in already approved chemical entities, thelaw prohibits the submission or delays the effective date of approval ofan ANDA or 505(b)(2) application during specified periods that are independentof the patent status of the pioneer drug.The 1984 Amendments require FDA to promulgate new implementing regulations.The new law further provides that, until such time as FDA has new implementingregulations in effect, the currently existing regulations or ANDA's underandSection; 314.55 (formerly andSection; 314.2) will be effective, absent aconflict with the new law. In the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of May 24, 1985 (50 FR 21460), FDA publisheda notice requesting public comment on Title I of Pub. L. 98-417. The noticealso announced the establishment of a public file (Docket No. 85N-0214)for all comments, views, and other information submitted to FDA concerningTitle I. The purpose of the notice was to obtain public comment on interpretationof the new law to assist the agency in its regulation writing process.In the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of August 7, 1985 (50 FR 31887), FDA publisheda notice reopening for an unspecified period of time the period for publiccomment on Title I. Interested persons may now focus their comments onthis proposed rule during the 90 day comment period on the proposal. Therefore,the period of time for comment on Title I under the August 7 notice endson July 10, 1989. Since passage of the 1984 Amendments, FDA has issued a series of lettersto NDA and ANDA holders and applicants offering interim guidance on themore controversial provisions of the new law. Copies of these letters arein a public file under Docket No. 85N-0214. To the extent that the provisionsof this proposed rule differ from the guidance in these letters, this proposedrule supersedes the previous guidance. D. Relationship to New Drug Regulations In the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of February 22, 1985 (50 FR 7452), FDA publishedrevised regulations in 21 CFR Part 314 governing the approval for marketingof new drugs and antibiotic drugs for human use. Those regulations setforth procedures and requirements for the submission to, and the reviewby, FDA of full applications (NDA's) and abbreviated applications, as wellas amendments, supplements, and postmarketing reports to such applications,by persons seeking or holding approval from FDA of an application undersection 505 of the act to market a new drug or an application under section507 of the act to market an antibiotic drug. Those regulations were notintended to implement the 1984 Amendments to the act. (See 50 FR 7466.)The provisions of this proposed rule further revise 21 CFR Part 314 toimplement the 1984 Amendments.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Highlights of This Proposal  </ITAG>This proposed rule would (1) reorganize and revise 21 CFR Part 314 to incorporatethe new requirements and procedures imposed upon applicants by the 1984Amendments, and (2) revise 21 CFR Part 320 consistent with the bioequivalencerequirements of the 1984 Amendments and current agency policy. The majorprovisions implementing the 1984 Amendments are summarized as follows:A. Abbreviated Applications New section 505(j) of the act governs the requirements and procedures forANDA's. Under the statute, an ANDA is permitted for (1) a drug productthat is the ``same'' as a drug product listed in the approved drug productlist published by the agency (listed drug), with respect to active ingredient(s),route of administration, dosage form, strength, and conditions of use recommendedin the labeling and (2) a drug product with certain changes from a listeddrug if FDA has approved a petition from a prospective applicant permittingthe submission of an ANDA for the changed drug product. The agency proposesin a new Subpart C to describe the content of and procedures for submissionof an ANDA. The proposal would retain the current ANDA format which requiresthe submission of an archival and review copy of the ANDA. For an ANDAfor a drug product that is the ``same'' as a listed drug, the focus ofthe proposed requirements is to provide FDA with sufficient informationto assure that the drug product for which the applicant is seeking approval(1) is the same as the listed drug referred to by the applicant with respectto active ingredient(s), route of administration, dosage form, strength,and conditions of use, except for those conditions of use that are protectedby patent or that have been accorded periods of exclusivity, (2) is bioequivalentto the listed drug, and (3) has the same labeling as that of the listeddrug except for changes because the proposed drug has a different manufactureror distributor. In addition, the regulations would require that the ANDAcontain a certification with respect to product and use patents coveringthe listed drug and information about the applicant's ability to manufacturea drug product of acceptable quality. B. ANDA Suitability Petitions The statute provides that an ANDA applicant may petition FDA for permissionto file an ANDA under section 505(j)(2)(C) of the act for a drug productthat has one different active ingredient (permitted only in a combinationproduct), or whose route of administration, dosage form, or strength differsfrom that of a listed drug. These are the only types of changes permittedin an ANDA. The proposed rule describes the kinds of information a petitionermust include in its petition to demonstrate to FDA that the change fromthe listed drug requested for the proposed drug product may be adequatelyevaluated for approval without data from investigations to show the safetyand effectiveness of the proposed drug product or that a drug product witha different active ingredient may be adequately evaluated for approvalas safe and effective on the basis of the information required to be submittedin an ANDA. An ANDA submitted pursuant to an approved petition generally would be requiredto contain the same information as an ANDA for a drug product that is thesame as a listed drug except that additional information may be requiredregarding the difference in the proposed drug product from the listed drug.In addition, FDA proposes to require that the listed drug referred to inthe ANDA be the one upon which the petition was based and that the applicantrefer in its ANDA to the petition and include in the ANDA a copy of FDA'sresponse approving submission of the ANDA. C. 505(b)(2) Applications In addition to ANDA's, the 1984 Amendments recognize another type of applicationfor an applicant seeking approval of a generic drug: a 505(b)(2) application.Although similar to FDA's ``paper NDA'' policy, section 505(b)(2) of theact has broader applicability. Section 505(b)(2) of the act applies toany application for which the investigations relied on by the applicantto provide the ``full reports'' of safety and effectiveness required bysection 505(b)(1)(A) of the act were not conducted by or for the applicantand for which the applicant has not obtained a right of reference or usefrom the person who conducted the investigations. Thus, section 505(b)(2)of the act covers not only literature-supported NDA's for duplicates ofapproved drugs, but any NDA's for drug products that rely for approvalon studies not conducted by or for the applicant or for which the applicantdoes not have a right of reference.Applications described in section 505(b)(2) of the act are submitted undersection 505(b)(1) of the act. They are therefore subject to the same statutoryprovisions that govern full new drug applications. However, the new statutoryprovisions impose on a 505(b)(2) applicant additional requirements withrespect to patent certification, notification of such certification tothe patent owner, and exclusivity that are generally the same as thosethat apply to ANDA's. The agency proposes to include in the regulationsrequirements applicable to 505(b)(2) applications.D. Patent Information, Certification, and Notice of Certification to PatentOwner and Certain Application HoldersThe statute prohibits the agency from making effective the approval ofan ANDA or an application described by section 505(b)(2) of the act beforeall relevant product and use patents for the listed drug have expired,except where the generic applicant asserts either that its product willnot infringe the patent or that the patent is invalid. In the latter case,approval of the ANDA or 505(b)(2) application may not be made effectiveuntil the patent owner and NDA holder have been notified and have had anopportunity to litigate the issue of patent infringement or validity. Tofacilitate the patent protection provisions, the statute requires thatapplications submitted under section 505(b) of the act include the patentnumber and expiration date of all relevant product patents that claim thedrug in the application or use patents that claim a method of using thedrug. The agency publishes this patent information in its approved drugproduct list for each listed drug for which patent information has beensubmitted. A generic drug applicant submitting an ANDA that refers to alisted drug must include a certification as to the status of all patentsapplicable to the listed drug. Similarly, an applicant submitting a 505(b)(2)application must make certifications with respect to patents claiming anylisted drug on which investigations that are relied upon by the applicantfor approval of its application were conducted or claiming a use for suchlisted drug. If a generic applicant certifies that a relevant patent expireson a specified date, the effective date of approval of the ANDA or 505(b)(2)application will be delayed until the expiration of the patent. When ageneric applicant certifies that any product or use patent is invalid orwill not be infringed, the applicant must give notice of such certificationto the patent owner and appropriate approved application holder for thelisted drug. The generic applicant must include in the notice the factualand legal basis for the applicant's opinion that the patent is invalidor will not be infringed. Finally, a patent owner or NDA holder has 45days from receipt of the notice of certification to file suit against thegeneric applicant to defend the patent. If the patent owner or NDA holderfiles suit within 45 days, the effective date of approval of the ANDA or505(b)(2) application may be delayed up to 30 months pending resolutionof the lawsuit.The proposed rule describes (1) the requirements for the submission ofpatent information by a pioneer NDA holder, (2) the patent certificationrequirements applicable to generic applicants and (3) the content of apatent certification notice. The proposal also specifies (1) when and towhom the notice is to be sent and (2) the effect of each type of patentcertification on the effective date of approval of an application for ageneric drug product.E. ExclusivitySections 505(j)(4)(D) and 505(c)(3)(D) of the act protect certain listeddrugs, or certain changes in listed drugs, from generic copying for specifiedperiods by placing a moratorium on the submission, or by delaying the effectivedate of approval, of ANDA's and 505(b)(2) applications for those listeddrugs. These so-called ``exclusivity provisions'' provide the followingperiods of protection from generic competition: (1) a 10-year period ofexclusivity for new chemical entities approved during the period January1, 1982, to September 24, 1984, the date of enactment of the 1984 Amendments;(2) a 5-year period of exclusivity for new chemical entities approved afterSeptember 24, 1984; (3) a 3-year period of exclusivity for non-new chemicalentities approved after September 24, 1984, if the applicant submittedan application containing reports of ``new clinical investigations (otherthan bioavailability studies) essential to the approval and conducted orsponsored by the applicant''; (4) a 3-year period of exclusivity for certainchanges made after September 24, 1984, if the applicant submitted a supplementcontaining reports of ``new clinical investigations (other than bioavailabilitystudies) essential to the approval and conducted or sponsored by the personsubmitting the application''; and (5) a 2-year period of exclusivity fornon-new chemical entities, or for certain changes made to already approveddrug products, approved during the period January 1, 1982, to September24, 1984.The agency proposes to codify the first four of these five exclusivityprovisions; the fifth provision will not be codified because it expiredon September 24, 1986. The agency also proposes to define certain termsused in the regulations, and clarify the agency's interpretation of eachof the provisions.F. Withdrawal or Suspension of Approval of an ANDAThe statute authorizes the Secretary to remove from the market, by withdrawalor suspension of approval, any generic drugs already approved if the approvalof the listed drug referred to by the generic applicant is withdrawn orsuspended or if the listed drug is voluntarily withdrawn from sale by itsmanufacturer for what the agency determines are safety or effectivenessreasons. The agency proposes to establish in the regulations a procedurefor the withdrawal or suspension of approval of an ANDA under these circumstances.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. The List</ITAG>Section 505(j)(6) of the act requires FDA to publish and make publiclyavailable a list of all drug products approved for safety and effectivenessunder section 505(c) or approved under section 505(j) of the act. The agency'spublication, ``Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations''(the list), and its monthly supplements, are being used to satisfy thisstatutory requirement. In accordance with section 505(j)(6) of the act,FDA updates the list monthly through publication of cumulative supplements.Under the act, a drug product approved for safety and effectiveness undersection 505(c) or approved under section 505(j) is deemed to be a listeddrug on the date of its approval even though the drug product is not actuallyincluded in the list until the next monthly update of the agency's publishedlist. (See section 505(j)(6)(B) of the act.) A drug will not be listedas eligible for approval under an ANDA for the following reasons: (1) theapproval of the drug product has been withdrawn or suspended for groundsdescribed under section 505(e) (1) through (5) or 505(j)(5) of the act,or (2) FDA determines that the drug product has been voluntarily withdrawnfrom sale by the manufacturer due to safety or effectiveness concerns.(See discussion about removing drugs from listed status at part V. sectionP. below.)Further, the agency will withdraw approval of and remove from the listany drug product that is the subject of a new drug application and thatmay now be marketed over-the-counter (OTC) pursuant to an effective finalOTC monograph. Drug products that conform to an OTC final monograph areconsidered by the agency to be generally recognized as safe and effectiveand, as such, are no longer considered to be ``new drugs'' as defined insection 201(p) of the act. Thus, such products do not require an approvednew drug application. In addition, FDA's enforcement policy for prescriptiondrugs undergoing review in the agency's OTC drug review (21 CFR 330.13)permits a prescription drug to be marketed OTC without approval beforea final monograph issues in each of the following circumstances: (1) wherethe drug is classified by an OTC advisory review panel in Category I (generallyrecognized as safe and effective and not misbranded) and FDA does not dissentin the preamble to the panel report or thereafter, (2) where FDA concludesthat a drug that was not classified by a panel in Category I later tentativelyqualifies for classification in Category I and so states in a <T4>Federal Register </T4>announcement, and (3) where the agency, on itsown initiative, proposes by <T4>Federal Register</T4> announcement OTC marketing of a prescriptiondrug not reviewed by an OTC advisory review panel, and public notice thatOTC marketing may commence is issued after a formal comment period on theagency's proposed change.Section 505(j)(6) of the act also requires FDA to include in the list thedate of approval and application number of each drug product approved after1981, whether in vitro or in vivo bioequivalence studies or both such studiesare required for ANDA's for a listed drug, and the patent information requiredby section 505 (b) or (c) of the act. Although not required by the act,the list, as published, also identifies all drug products that qualifyunder the act for periods of exclusive marketing, regardless of patentstatus, and states therapeutic equivalence evaluations for approved multisourceprescription drug products. (Information on therapeutic equivalence evaluationsis provided under the policy announced in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of October 31, 1980 (45 FR 72582). These proposedregulations do not modify or affect in any way the policy announced inthat notice, nor do they affect any therapeutic equivalence evaluationpublished in the list.) As a general rule, FDA intends to use the listand its supplemental updates as the primary means of announcing informationregarding patent status, exclusivity, type of bioequivalence study needed,and eligibility for consideration in an ANDA.The list and its supplements are available on an annual subscription basisfrom the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office,Washington, DC 20402. In addition, a copy of the list and its supplementalupdates will be placed on public display in the Dockets Management Branch(address above) when FDA sends them forward for printing.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Provisions of This Proposal</ITAG>FDA proposes to reorganize 21 CFR Part 314 by revoking existing andSection;andSection;314.55 and 314.56, which describe the requirements for abbreviated applicationsand the drug products for which abbreviated applications are suitable,by adding a new Subpart C, and by redesignating the existing subparts.The agency further proposes to revise existing sections of 21 CFR Part314, where necessary, to implement the 1984 Amendments. New proposed SubpartC contains regulations on abbreviated applications for new drugs and antibioticsand the responsibilities and rights of applicants concerning their abbreviatedapplications. As revised, Subpart B would contain regulations on new drugapplications submitted under section 505(b) of the act and antibiotic applicationsother than abbreviated antibiotic applications. FDA proposes to reviseexisting sections under Subpart B to remove any reference to abbreviatedapplications. Existing Subparts C through F are redesignated as SubpartsD through G, respectively. Because the 1984 Amendments impose new proceduralrequirements upon applicants submitting ANDA's, FDA believes that placementof these requirements in a separate subpart will make them easier to find,read, and understand.As noted above, Title I of the 1984 Amendments does not apply to antibiotics.Section 507 of the act, however, already provides for abbreviated applicationsfor duplicates of approved antibiotic drugs. Therefore, except for a proposedrevision to the adverse drug experience reporting requirements for newdrugs and antibiotics, the agency proposes to retain the current requirementscontained in Subpart B for abbreviated antibiotic applications, but restatethem in the new Subpart C. (See discussion under part V. section G. below.)A. DefinitionsFDA proposes to revise andSection; 314.3(b) to incorporate definitions andinterpretations necessary to implement the 1984 Amendments. The regulationswould define ``abbreviated application'' to mean the application describedunder andSection; 314.94, including all amendments and supplements to theapplication. The term ``abbreviated application'' applies to both an abbreviatednew drug application and an abbreviated antibiotic application. When particularregulations apply to only one of these groups, or to specific drugs, however,the agency will be more specific by referring to an ``abbreviated new drugapplication'' or an ``abbreviated antibiotic application.'' The proposedregulations would revise the definition of ``application'' to mean theapplication described under andSection; 314.50, including all amendmentsand supplements to the application.Proposed revised andSection; 314.3(b) incorporates the statutory descriptionin section 505(b)(2) as the definition of a ``505(b)(2) application.''The agency proposes to retain the current definition of ``drug product''under andSection; 314.3(b). The agency notes that the term ``drug'' is usedthroughout section 505 of the act. For purposes of this proposed rule,FDA interprets the term ``drug'' to mean ``drug product'' unless otherwisespecified.The agency proposes to define ``listed drug'' to mean a new drug productthat has been approved for safety and effectiveness under section 505(c)of the act or approved under section 505(j) of the act, the approval ofwhich has not been withdrawn or suspended under section 505(e) (1) through(5) or (j)(5) of the act, and which has not been withdrawn from sale forwhat FDA has determined are reasons of safety or effectiveness. A listof such drugs is published in the current edition of FDA's publication,``Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations'' (thelist) and any current supplement to the list. A drug product is deemedto be a ``listed drug'' if it has been approved for safety and effectivenessunder section 505(c) of the act or approved under section 505(j) of theact but has not yet been included in the list. For a drug product thatis subject to FDA's DESI review, the agency will consider the applicableDESI notice published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a listed drug until a drug product subject tothe notice meets the conditions for approval of effectiveness set forthin the notice and becomes a listed drug.FDA recognizes that approved drug products with delayed effective dates,see part V. sections K. and L. below, will be considered ``listed'' drugsto which subsequent ANDA's can refer. The agency believes that permittingsuch references will, in some cases, conserve agency resources and reduceburdens on ANDA applicants. For example, there will be drug products withdelayed effective dates for which changes in dosage form, strength, routeof administration or active ingredients were approved pursuant to ANDAsuitability petitions. Some of these products will represent beneficialalternatives to, or improvements over, existing drug products. Permittingsubsequent ANDA applicants to refer to these drug products with delayedeffective dates will eliminate the burden on the subsequent applicantsto submit, and FDA to review, duplicative ANDA suitability petitions. However,consistent with the patent protection and exclusivity provisions of the1984 Amendments, the subsequent applicant's ANDA will generally share thesame delayed effective date as the listed drug.The agency proposes to define ``reference listed drug'' to mean the listeddrug identified in an abbreviated new drug application or identified byFDA as the drug product upon which an applicant relies in seeking approvalof its abbreviated application. The agency proposes to define ``the list'' to mean the current editionof FDA's publication ``Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic EquivalenceEvaluations'' and any current supplement to the publication.B. Drug Products for Which Abbreviated Applications May Be SubmittedThe agency proposes to revoke existing andSection; 314.56 and propose a newandSection; 314.92 that describes the drug products for which abbreviatedapplications may be submitted to the agency. As described in proposed andSection;314.92(a), FDA proposes to accept an abbreviated application for the followingdrug products:1. <T3>Duplicates of a listed drug. </T3>Section 505(j) of the act providesfor the submission of ANDA's for generic versions (duplicates) of any drugproduct listed under section 505(j)(6) of the act (hereinafter referredto as a ``listed drug''). Thus, an applicant may submit an ANDA for a drugproduct that has the same active ingredient(s), dosage form, strength,route of administration, and conditions of use as a listed drug, so longas its submission is not precluded by exclusivity. (See discussion at partV. section L.1.)Drug products approved after enactment of the 1984 Amendments, but notmarketed, or those approved and for which marketing has been discontinuedbut for which FDA has made no determination that the marketing ceased forreasons of safety or effectiveness will be included in the list, but identifiedwith a special symbol or placed in a special appendix. In addition, somedrug products reviewed under DESI and approved for safety and effectivenessand some post 1962 approved drug products are not published in the listbecause marketing was discontinued before September 24, 1984. Althoughtechnically such drug products are listed drugs under section 505(j)(6)(B)of the act, FDA does not intend to update the list retrospectively to includedrug products that no longer generate interest with respect to marketingeither by the pioneer applicant or by another applicant. A firm wishingto submit an ANDA for such a listed drug should petition the agency underandSection; 314.122 to relist the drug product and submit information toshow that its withdrawal from sale was not for safety or effectivenessreasons. (Also see discussion under part V. section 0.1. below.)2. <T3>Drug Products that differ from a listed drug.</T3> Section 505(j) ofthe act permits the submission of an ANDA for a drug product that differsfrom the listed drug if FDA has approved a petition from a prospectiveapplicant requesting the change. The differences from the listed drug forwhich petitions may be submitted are differences in route of administration,dosage form, and strength, or, when the listed drug contains more thanone active ingredient, a change in one of its active ingredients. To alertinterested persons to petitions that have been approved permitting thesubmission of an abbreviated application for a drug product that differsfrom a listed drug, the agency will publish in the list all approved petitionssubmitted under section 505(j)(2)(C) of the act and a description of thepermitted changes. Subsequent applicants who wish permission to make achange permitted in an already approved petition may refer in their ANDA'sto the approved petition rather than filing a duplicative petition. Toaid potential petitioners in preparing their petitions, the list also includesall petitions that have been denied. All such petitions are also on publicdisplay in FDA's Dockets Management Branch (address above).3. <T3>Antibiotics. </T3>Section 507(a) of the act permits the submissionof abbreviated applications for duplicates of all antibiotics the agencyhas already approved for marketing. The agency includes approved antibioticdrug products in the list, even though antibiotics are not covered in the1984 Amendments, and, therefore, are not subject to, for example, the patentcertification and exclusivity provisions of the act.4. <T3>DESI drug products. </T3>Under its DESI program, the agency has acceptedANDA's for drug products that were the same as certain pre-1962 drug productsreviewed under the DESI program. Under this program, each <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice announcing that  a particular drug hasbeen found effective has included, when appropriate, an FDA finding thatan ANDA is the suitable mechanism by which manufacturers or suppliers ofthe drug product may obtain FDA approval. In addition, an ANDA may be submittedfor a drug product that is similar or related to a DESI drug and for whichFDA has made a separate finding, in response to a petition, that an ANDAis suitable. A pre-1962 approved drug product in the DESI review does not qualify formarketing exclusivity under the 1984 Amendments if the applicant seeksonly approval of the indications in the DESI notice. However, DESI productsfor which additional new uses beyond those reviewed in the DESI programare approved may qualify for periods of marketing exclusivity for the newuse under certain circumstances.C. ANDA Suitability PetitionsProposed andSection; 314.93 would implement section 505(j)(2)(C) of the act.That section of the act permits an applicant to petition the agency forpermission to submit an ANDA for a drug product that differs from a listeddrug when the change is one authorized by the statute and the agency hasgranted a petition for the change. Under the proposal, an applicant maypetition FDA for permission to submit an ANDA for a drug product that differsfrom a listed drug in route of administration, dosage form, or strength.If a proposed drug product were more bioavailable than the innovator'sproduct and the applicant proposed to reduce the dose to a level that deliveredplasma levels equivalent to the innovator's product, a petition for a changein strength would be permitted. In addition, an applicant may seek to change one of the active ingredientsof the listed drug when the listed drug is a combination product. For example,the agency may find acceptable the substitution of one analgesic for another,e.g., acetaminophen for aspirin, in a combination product. The active ingredientthe applicant wishes to substitute in its product must be approved forsafety and effectiveness in a listed drug or must be an ingredient of adrug product that does not meet the definition of ``new drug'' under section201(p) of the act. The remaining active ingredients of the combinationproduct, however, must be identical to the other active ingredients ofthe reference listed drug. (See discussion at part V. section D.1.c. below.)An applicant is not permitted to petition for any other kinds of changesfrom listed drugs. H. Rept. 98-857, Part 1, 98th Cong., 2d Sess. at 23(1984). Thus, for example, an applicant may not petition to submit an ANDAfor a different active ingredient in a single active ingredient drug product,for an extra active ingredient in a combination product, or for a new usefor an already approved drug product. The legislative history of the 1984Amendments supports the agency's position that a different active ingredientmay be substituted only in a combination drug product. Part 1 of the HouseReport describes FDA's authority to grant petitions requesting changesfrom listed drugs: <ITAG tagnum="21">If an applicant wishes to vary the route of administration, dosageform or strength of the generic drug from the listed drug, it must firstpetition the FDA for permission to file an ANDA for the differing genericdrug. In addition, the applicant may request to vary one of the activeingredients in the generic drug from the listed drug <T3>when the listed drug is a combination product. </T3>The remaining activeingredients of the generic drug must be the same as the other active ingredientsof the listed drug.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>These are the only changes from the listed drug for which an applicantmay petition.</T3></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">H. Rept. 98-857, Part 1, 98th Cong., 2d Sess. 23 (1984) (emphasisadded). Section 314.93(e)(1)(ii) requires denial of a petition seekingto change an active ingredient, if the drug that is the subject of thepetition is not a combination drug. FDA considers a salt or ester of an active ingredient to be a differentactive ingredient, and will not approve petitions that seek permissionto submit an ANDA for a drug product which substitutes a different saltor ester of an active ingredient from that of a listed drug, unless thepetition seeks a change in a combination product and the new salt or esterhas been approved or is not a new drug. No petition is necessary for achange in the inactive ingredients from those of the listed drug. Proposed andSection; 314.93(d) would require a petitioner to identify a listeddrug and include in its petition a copy of the proposed labeling for thedrug product that is the subject of the petition and a copy of the approvedlabeling for the reference listed drug. A petitioner may, under limitedcircumstances, identify more than one listed drug, e.g., when the petitionerseeks permission to submit an ANDA for a drug product that substitutesone of the active ingredients in a combination listed drug and the substitutedingredient itself is a listed drug. (Also see discussion under submittingan application for, or a suitability petition that relies on, a listeddrug that is no longer marketed at part V. section 0.1.)Sections 505(j)(2)(A)(v) and 505(j)(3)(G) of the act require that the labelingof generic drugs be the ``same'' as the labeling approved for the listeddrug, except where a change in labeling is ``required because of differencesapproved under a petition filed under section 505(j)(2)(C) of the act orbecause the drug and the listed drug are produced or distributed by differentmanufacturers.'' FDA emphasizes that the exceptions to the requirementof ``same labeling'' are limited. The agency will not approve a petitionunder section 505(j)(2)(C) of the act that seeks permission to submit anANDA for a product with significant changes in labeling (such as new warningsor precautions) intended to address newly introduced safety or effectivenessproblems not presented by the listed drug. Such labeling changes are notthe kind that were intended to fall within the limited exceptions in sections505(j)(2)(A)(v) and 505(j)(3)(G) of the act. FDA does not believe thatit would be consistent with the purpose of section 505(j) of the act, whichis to assure the marketing of generic drugs that are as safe and effectiveas their brand-name counterparts, to interpret section 505(j)(2)(C) ofthe act as permitting the marketing of generic drugs with diminished safetyor effectiveness and concomitantly heightened labeled warnings. Ratherthan waste agency resources by approving a petition for a drug that cannotsatisfy the ANDA approval requirements, FDA is proposing to deny a suitabilitypetition for a change that would necessitate significant new labeled warningsor precautions. Under the act, the agency must approve an appropriately submitted petitionfor a change authorized by the statute, unless it finds (1) that investigationsare necessary to show the safety and effectiveness of the drug productor of any of its active ingredients, the route of administration, dosageform, or strength which differ from the listed drug (see section 505(j)(2)(C)(i)of the act), or (2) in reviewing a petition to substitute one of the activeingredients in a combination product, that the safety or effectivenessof the drug product may not be adequately evaluated by the informationin an ANDA (see section 505(j)(2)(C)(ii) of the act). The legislative history of the 1984 Amendments makes clear that section505(j)(2)(C)(ii) of the act was added to clarify FDA's authority to rejectpetitions for new combination products that raise safety or effectivenessissues. See H. Rept. 98-857, Part 1, 98th Cong., 2d Sess. 23 (1984); 130Cong. Rec. H9114 (daily edition September 6, 1984) (statement of RepresentativeWaxman). The agency anticipates that it will only rarely approve petitionsto submit ANDA's for new combinations, because data on the safety and effectivenessof the new combinations will almost always be needed. See hearing on S.2748 before the Committee on Labor and Human Resources, 98th Cong., 2d.Sess. 31-2 (June 28, 1984) (statement of Mark Novitch, Acting Commissionerof Food and Drugs). Section 314.93(e)(1)(iii) specifies the grounds for denying a petitionto change an active ingredient in a combination product. Under the proposalat andSection; 314.93(e)(1)(iii)(B), the agency would not approve a petitionto substitute one of the active ingredients in a combination product ifthe petition failed to contain information to show that the different activeingredient of the drug product is of the same pharmacological or therapeuticclass as the ingredient of the reference listed drug that is to be changedand that the drug product could be expected to have the same therapeuticeffect as the reference listed drug when administered to patients for acondition of use identical to that of the reference listed drug. Undersection 505(j)(2)(A)(iv) of the act, this information is required to becontained in an ANDA for a product with a different active ingredient thanthe listed drug. (See andSection; 314.94(a)(7) and discussion at Part V.,section D.1.f.) FDA believes that this information must also be includedin a petition to substitute an active ingredient because the ANDA couldnot be approved without this information and because substitution of anactive ingredient of a pharmacological or therapeutic class different fromthat of the ingredient in the reference listed drug that is to be changedmay be presumed to result in a product with a different degree of safetyor effectiveness. Such a product would require investigations to show itssafety and effectiveness; thus an ANDA would not be appropriate. The information needed to provide scientific support for the safety andeffectiveness of the new combination drug product should consist of well-documentedevidence of the general acceptance that the ingredients to be substitutedfor each other are interchangeable and have known equipotent doses. Suchinformation could be in the form of agency findings or conclusions in previous<T4>Federal Register</T4> notices. For example, FDA has allowed, in appropriatecases, substitution between aspirin and acetaminophen based on extensivescientific data establishing their safety and effectiveness and their equipotentdoses and on long-term experience with these ingredients when used in combinationwith other drugs (see 47 FR 34636 at page 34641; August 10, 1982). If interchangeabilityis not generally accepted, investigations would be required to establishthe safety and effectiveness of the new proposed combination product, andthe product would properly be the subject of a new drug application submittedunder section 505(b) of the act. New clinical data would not be an appropriatemeans of establishing that a new combination would have the same therapeuticeffect as the listed combination drug because the need to review such datawould require denial of the petition.Sections 314.93(e)(1)(iii) (C) and (D) similarly require denial of a petitionif the petition fails to demonstrate that the substituted active ingredientis already approved in a listed drug or is in a drug satisfying the requirementsof section 201(p) of the act, or that the remaining active ingredientsin the combination are identical to those of the listed combination drug.(See section 505(j)(3)(C) and H. Rept. 98-857, Part 1, <T3>supra</T3>, at 23.) In the absence of information that the safety andeffectiveness of the changed ingredient has already been established andthat the remaining active ingredients have not also been changed, the safetyand effectiveness of the new combination cannot be evaluated without newinvestigations and thus cannot be the subject of an ANDA. Under the proposal at andSection; 314.93(e)(1)(v), the agency would not approvea petition that relies on a listed drug that has been voluntarily withdrawnfrom sale and that has not been referred to in an approved ANDA, unlessthe agency determines that the withdrawal of the listed drug was not forsafety or effectiveness reasons. A generic applicant may obtain approvalof a suitability petition to submit an ANDA for a change from a listeddrug only when the safety and effectiveness of the listed drug can be reliedon to support approval of the change. To assure that ANDA's will not besubmitted for drug products that rely on a listed drug whose safety oreffectiveness is questionable, the agency will refuse to approve a suitabilitypetition that relies on a listed drug that has been voluntarily withdrawnfrom sale until the agency can determine that there are no safety or effectivenessconcerns about the listed drug. If the agency approves a petition for a change from a listed drug, FDAmay require that certain information supporting the change be includedin the ANDA. (See section 505(j)(2)(A) of the act.) The agency may alsorequire additional data concerning the change during its review of an application.If preclinical or clinical data are needed to support safety, or if clinicaldata are needed to support the effectiveness of the requested change, thenan ANDA is not appropriate for the proposed drug product, and FDA willnot approve a petition. However, under certain circumstances, data fromlimited confirmatory testing to show that the characteristics that makethe proposed drug product different from the listed drug do not alter itssafety and effectiveness may be accepted in a petition or as additionaldata to be included in an ANDA resulting from an approved petition. Bylimited confirmatory testing, the agency means simple studies intendedto rule out unlikely problems. For example, data from acute animal studiesto show the absence of liver enzyme induction properties of the substitutedanalgesic active ingredient might be required and be acceptable in a petition.(See 48 FR 2751 at 2753; January 21, 1983, at paragraph 4.) A study intendedto answer basic safety or effectiveness questions or one that would requiresubstantial scientific review would not be considered limited confirmatorytesting. A petitioner must use the procedures set forth in andSection; 10.20 (21 CFR10.20) and the format of a petition established in andSection; 10.30 (21CFR 10.30). However, unlike a citizen petition under andSection; 10.30, section505(j)(2)(C) requires FDA to approve or disapprove a petition requestingpermission to submit an ANDA for a drug product differing from a listeddrug within 90 days of its submission to the agency. Both proposed andSection;314.93 and proposed revised andSection; 10.30 incorporate this statutoryrequirement. As is the case under the DESI review in which the hearingopportunity provided by section 505(c) of the act does not apply to ANDAapplicants who disagree with an adverse agency decision on whether theirproducts may rely on DESI conclusions, there is no legal right to an opportunityfor a hearing on a petition denial under section 505(j)(2)(C) of the act.See H. Rept. 98-857, Part 1, 98th Cong., 2d Sess. 23 (1984). In addition,for the purposes of 21 CFR 10.45, the agency is proposing, at 21 CFR 10.45(d),that a petition for reconsideration of a response to an ANDA suitabilitypetition be submitted and acted upon before the agency's response willbe considered final agency action. The proposal retains the current regulations on the public availabilityof data and information in a petition. The availability of a petition forpublic examination and copying is governed by 21 CFR Part 20. Under thoseprovisions, all data submitted in a petition, except data incorporatedby reference, are available for public disclosure. The agency has on severaloccasions been asked to maintain confidentiality of petitions in whicha petitioner seeks a determination of the suitability of an ANDA for aproposed drug product. Some petitioners oppose the public availabilityof such petitions on the ground that information contained in the petitionmay provide commercial advantage to competitors by, for example, disclosinga petitioner's marketing plans or new dosage form technology. The agencyconsidered revising the regulations to provide for the confidentialityof any petition submitted under section 505(j)(2)(C) of the act until FDAhas either approved or disapproved the petition, and if the agency disapproveda petition, to provide confidentiality for an additional 30 days to permitthe petitioners to file a petition for reconsideration. The agency hasinitially rejected that position because it believes that the benefitsin keeping the process a public one outweigh potential commercial problemsto petitioners. In addition, data requiring confidentiality would ordinarilynot need to be submitted in a petition under section 505(j)(2)(C) of theact. The public is specifically invited to comment on the alternative policyof nondisclosure of a petition submitted under section 505(j)(2)(C) ofthe act until final agency action on the petition. FDA does not anticipatethat it will need to repropose this regulation if it ultimately adoptssuch a policy. Interested persons should prepare their comments accordingly.D. Content and Format of an ANDA The agency proposes to retain the current requirement that an applicantsubmit two copies of an ANDA, an archival copy, and a review copy. Theagency will maintain guidelines under andSection; 10.90(b) (21 CFR 10.90(b))to help applicants comply with the content and format requirements of anANDA.1. <T3>Archival copy. </T3>Section 314.94 of the proposed rule describes thecontent and format requirements for ANDA's. In addition to the proposedrequirements described below, the archival copy of an ANDA would contain,as now, the application form that contains the information described inandSection; 314.50 (a) (1), (3), (4), and (5), a statement whether the submissionis an abbreviated application under andSection; 314.94 or a supplement underandSection; 314.97, and a table of contents.The proposed content requirements for an ANDA under andSection; 314.94 (a)implement section 505(j)(2)(A) of the act. For a drug product that is thesame as the reference listed drug, the ANDA procedures focus on the kindsof information necessary to assure that the duplicate product is the sameas the reference listed drug and on the ability of the applicant to producea drug product of acceptable quality. In these regulations, the term ``sameas'' is used to describe drug products that are identical in specific keyaspects (i.e., indications, dosage form, strength, route of administration,and active ingredient(s)), but allows certain appropriate differences dueto different manufacturers (e.g., differences in inactive ingredients andcertain labeling statements). (See discussion under Samples and labelingat part V. section D.1.i.) A description of the proposed requirements forinformation to be included in an ANDA follows.a. <T3>Basis for ANDA submission. </T3>The agency proposes in andSection; 314.94(a)(3)(i)to require applicants to submit the name of the reference listed drug,including its dosage form and strength, that is the basis for the ANDA.In addition, for ANDA's submitted pursuant to an approved petition, proposedandSection; 314.94(a)(3)(iii) would require reference to the petition byFDA assigned docket number and a copy of the agency's response to the petitionstating that an ANDA may be submitted. (Section 505(j)(2)(C) of the actprohibits an applicant from submitting an ANDA for a drug product thatdiffers from a listed drug in one of the active ingredients, route of administration,dosage form, or strength, unless FDA has approved a petition for the change.)Ordinarily both an ANDA and a petition submitted under section 505(j)(2)(C)of the act must refer to a single listed drug. However, as discussed aboveat part V. section C., a petition may, under limited circumstances, relyon more than one listed drug. The agency's response to a petition permittingsubmission of an ANDA will identify the listed drug or drugs relied onfor approval of the petition. The listed drug referred to in an ANDA forwhich a suitability petition was approved must be the same as the listeddrug relied on in the petition.Currently, the agency uses one product as a reference standard for bioequivalencedeterminations. Usually that reference standard is the pioneer drug product.Applicants will be required to refer and show bioequivalence to the listeddrug selected by the agency as the standard for bioequivalence determinations.Therefore, where there is more than one listed drug for the same drug product,prospective applicants are encouraged to consult with the Director, Divisionof Bioequivalence before selecting a reference listed drug.Under FDA's DESI program, each <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice announcing the effectiveness conclusionsreached in the DESI review about a drug product first approved for marketingbefore October 10, 1962, has included, when appropriate, an FDA findingthat an ANDA is the suitable mechanism by which manufacturers or suppliersof duplicate versions of the first approved drug product could obtain FDAapproval. Similar findings may, under the DESI or related programs, bemade by the agency in the future. Where the agency has made such a findingand there is no other approved NDA or ANDA at the time of submission ofan ANDA, the listed drug referred to in the ANDA would be the agency'snotice published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. If the ANDA is for a duplicate of a drug productthat is subject to FDA's DESI review and there is a listed drug, the applicantwould refer to the listed drug as the basis for submission of the ANDAunless FDA has selected a different drug product as the standard for bioequivalencedeterminations.The applicant must also include a statement as to whether the referencelisted drug is entitled to a period of marketing exclusivity as providedunder section 505(j)(4)(D) of the act. Exclusivity information on listeddrugs is published in the list. If the listed drug is entitled to 5 yearsof exclusivity under section 505(j)(4)(D)(ii) of the act, ANDA's that referto the drug may not be submitted until the exclusivity expires. All remainingperiods of exclusivity accorded by sections 505(j)(4)(D)(i), (iii), (iv),and (v) of the act do not bar an applicant from submitting an ANDA. Suchexclusivity does, however, require the agency to delay the effective dateof approval of an ANDA.b. <T3>Conditions of use. </T3>The agency proposes to require in andSection;314.94(a)(4) that the ANDA include sufficient information to show thatthe conditions of use, which include, among other things, indications anddosage instructions for which the applicant is seeking approval, have beenpreviously approved for the reference listed drug. Except in extraordinarycircumstances, an applicant would be expected to seek approval for allof the indications previously approved for the reference listed drug exceptfor those indications that are protected by patent or that have been accordedperiods of exclusivity. Consistent labeling for duplicate versions of adrug product, insofar as this is possible, will avoid differences thatmight confuse health care professionals who prescribe and dispense prescriptiondrug products or might create omissions of significant information.An applicant, however, may not seek approval in an ANDA or through an ANDAsuitability petition for an indication that has not been previously approved.Approval of a new indication requires investigations to demonstrate thesafety and effectiveness of the drug product for the new indication, andthus may not be obtained through an ANDA or suitability petition.The requirement that the applicant show that its proposed conditions ofuse have been previously approved for the reference listed drug is satisfiedif the applicant includes in the ANDA: (1) a statement that the conditionsof use for which the applicant is seeking approval and for which the drugproduct will be marketed have previously been approved for the referencelisted drug; and (2) reference to the applicant's annotated proposed labelingand to the currently approved labeling for the reference listed drug containedelsewhere in the ANDA.c. <T3>Active ingredients. </T3>The agency proposes to require in andSection;314.94(a)(5) that the applicant provide sufficient information to showthat the active ingredients of the drug product for which the applicantseeks approval are the same as those of the reference listed drug. Theagency interprets the requirement that the active ingredients in the proposeddrug product be the same as those of the listed drug to mean that the activeingredients must be identical. For example, if the proposed drug productcontained a different salt or ester of the active ingredient in the listeddrug, the active ingredient in the proposed drug product would not be identicalto the active ingredient in the listed drug, and could not, therefore,be approved in an ANDA. Active ingredient in this context means the activeingredient in the finished drug product prior to its administration.In some cases, an applicant may petition the agency to permit the applicantto vary an active ingredient in a proposed combination drug product. Ifthe reference listed drug has one active ingredient, then the active ingredientin the applicant's drug product must be identical to that of the listeddrug. See section 505(j)(2)(A)(ii)(I) and (j)(3)(C)(i) of the act. If thereference listed drug has more than one active ingredient, then all ofthe active ingredients in the applicant's drug product must be identicalto those in the listed drug, except that an applicant may seek to varyone of the active ingredients of a listed combination drug product by theANDA suitability petition procedure.Under proposed andSection; 314.94(a)(5), the requirement that the activeingredients in the applicant's drug product be shown to be the ``same as''those of the reference listed drug is satisfied if the applicant includesin its ANDA: (1) A statement that the active ingredients in its productare the same as that of the reference listed drug except for any differentactive ingredient in a combination drug product that has been the subjectof an approved petition and (2) reference to the applicant's annotatedproposed labeling and to the currently approved labeling for the referencelisted drug contained elsewhere in the ANDA.For a combination drug product with an active ingredient different fromthat of the listed drug, the applicant would be required to provide informationto show that (1) The different active ingredient is an active ingredientof another listed drug or of a drug which does not meet the definitionof ``new drug'' in section 201(p) of the act and (2) the other active ingredientsof the drug product are the same as those of the reference listed drugby referring to the applicant's annotated proposed labeling and the referencelisted drug's approved labeling contained in the ANDA. The applicant wouldalso be required to provide any other information about the different activeingredient that FDA may require.d. <T3>Route of administration, dosage form, and strength. </T3>Under proposedandSection; 314.94(a)(6), the applicant would be required to include in anANDA sufficient information to show that the route of administration, thedosage form and the strength of the drug product for which the applicantis seeking approval are identical to those of the reference listed drug.An applicant may vary the route of administration, dosage form or strengthof its product from the reference listed drug only if the applicant haspetitioned FDA for permission to submit an ANDA for the differing drugproduct and the agency has approved the petition. An applicant satisfiesthe requirement to show that the route of administration, dosage form,and strength of its drug product are the same as those of the referencelisted drug except for differences that have been the subject of an approvedpetition if the applicant includes in its ANDA: (1) a statement that theroute of administration, dosage form, and strength are the same as thoseof the reference listed drug and (2) reference to the applicant's annotatedproposed labeling and to the currently approved labeling for the referencelisted drug contained elsewhere in the ANDA. If the applicant has obtainedpermission to vary the route of administration, dosage form, or strengthof the proposed product, the application must contain any information aboutthe change as FDA may require.e. <T3>Bioequivalence. </T3>The agency proposes at andSection; 314.94(a)(7)(i)to require the applicant to include in an ANDA information sufficient toshow that the drug product for which the applicant is seeking approvalis bioequivalent to the reference listed drug. In addition, the proposedrule provides that for each in vivo study, an applicant include in theANDA a description of the analytical and statistical methods used and astatement with respect to the applicant's compliance with the institutionalreview board regulations under 21 CFR Part 56 and the informed consentregulations under 21 CFR Part 50.Under this proposal, the agency would retain, with one modification, thecurrent definitions of the terms ``bioequivalence'' and ``bioavailability''under Subpart A of 21 CFR Part 320. These terms are similarly characterizedin section 505(j)(7)(A) and (B) of the act. The language of section 505(j)(7)(A)and (B) of the act is adopted except for a minor wording difference asnoted below. Thus, a drug product for which an applicant is seeking approvalin an ANDA would be considered bioequivalent to the reference listed drugif: (1) the rate and extent of absorption of the applicant's drug productdo not show a significant difference from the rate and extent of absorptionof the reference listed drug when administered at the same molar dose ofthe active moiety under similar experimental conditions in either a singledose or multiple doses or (2) the extent of absorption of the applicant'sdrug product does not show a significant difference from the extent ofabsorption of the reference listed drug when administered at the same molardose of the active moiety under similar experimental conditions in eithera single dose or multiple doses and the difference from the reference listeddrug in the rate of absorption of the drug product is intentional, is reflectedin the proposed labeling, is not essential to the attainment of effectivebody drug concentrations on chronic use, and is considered medically insignificantfor the drug product (21 CFR 320.1(e)). The second definition of bioequivalencein existing andSection; 320.1(e) is similar to that proposed except thatunder the existing regulation a difference in rate of absorption must be:(1) Intentional and reflected in the labeling; (2) not essential to theattainment of effective body drug concentrations; or (3) considered medicallyinsignificant for the particular drug. The language of section 505(j)(7)(B)(ii)of the act thus differs from the current regulatory definition in thata drug must now meet all three of the current criteria. FDA is proposingto adopt the statutory definition. (Also see part VI. Conforming Amendments.)The second definition of the term bioequivalence may be applied, for example,in considering whether two controlled release products are bioequivalent.Therefore, for purposes of approval of an ANDA, if a controlled releasedosage form of a drug product meets the four criteria in the second definition,it would be regarded as bioequivalent to the reference standard. However,for purposes of including the product in the list, FDA reserves the rightto rate the product not ``therapeutically equivalent'' to any other listeddrug containing the same active ingredient.The term ``bioavailability'' means the rate and extent to which the activeingredient or active moiety is absorbed from a drug product (21 CFR 320.1(a)).The agency proposes to expand this definition to include a reference todrugs that are not intended to be absorbed.Currently, the agency uses one product as a reference standard againstwhich the bioequivalence of the applicant's product is compared. The agencyintends to continue that practice. Usually that reference product is theinnovator's product, which would also usually be the listed drug referredto by the applicant. However, if the listed drug chosen by the applicantis different from that chosen by the agency as the standard for bioequivalencedeterminations, the agency will require the applicant to amend its applicationto refer to the agency's bioequivalence reference standard as its listeddrug. This policy is intended to assure that all generic products remainequivalent to a common standard and thus to each other. The agency notes that the statutory definitions of ``bioavailability''(section 505(j)(7)(A) of the act) and ``bioequivalence'' (section 505(j)(7)(B)of the act) use the phrase ``therapeutic ingredient'' rather than the phrase``therapeutic moiety,'' which is used in 21 CFR Part 320. FDA does notbelieve Congress intended a meaning different from that in 21 CFR Part320 for drug products that are the subject of ANDA's, because the legislativehistory of the 1984 Amendments, in discussing the terms ``bioavailability''and ``bioequivalence,'' refers to 21 CFR 320.1 (a) and (e). See H. Rept.98-857, Part 1, 98th Cong., 2d Sess. at 31 (1984). The agency, however,believes that the term ``active moiety'' is more appropriate and proposesto substitute this term for the term ``therapeutic moiety'' or ``therapeuticingredient'' in defining the terms ``bioavailability'' and ``bioequivalence.''Both the statutory definition of ``bioequivalence'' and the definitionunder andSection; 320.1(e) describe a standard for demonstrating in vivobioequivalence for systemically absorbed drug products. Some drug productsare not intended for systemic absorption, e.g., a topically applied drugproduct, an antacid or a radiopaque medium. Nevertheless, the statute imposesa bioequivalence requirement on all drug products for which an applicantis seeking approval in an ANDA. Where the usual in vivo bioequivalencemethods (blood level measurements) are not applicable, suitable alternativemethods, such as measurement of acute pharmacologic effect or demonstrationof equivalent clinical effectiveness (with appropriate confidence intervals),may be established where FDA determines that they are capable of demonstratingbioequivalence. FDA notes, however, that where no methodology capable ofestablishing bioequivalence has been shown to exist for a particular drugor class of drugs, ANDA's for the drug cannot be approved until adequatemethodology becomes available. (See section 505(j)(3)(F) of the act.) In vitro dissolution may also be determined by the agency to be an appropriatemeans of demonstrating bioequivalence, for example, where an in vitro testhas been correlated with human in vivo bioavailability data. The list specifieswhether an in vitro or in vivo bioequivalence study will be required forANDA's that refer to a listed drug. One method of demonstrating bioequivalencewill generally apply to all indications for which the listed drug is approved,unless there is more than one route of administration in which case itmay be necessary to study bioequivalence by more than one route. If anyperson believes that a specified method demonstrates bioequivalence onlyfor a certain indication, that person may raise the issue with the agency.The agency will decide each such issue on a case-by-case basis. Before enactment of the 1984 Amendments, the agency deferred or waivedthe requirement for the submission of evidence of in vivo bioavailabilityfor various drugs for a number of reasons. For example, FDA deferred therequirement if adequate methodology were not available for in vivo testing.However, section 505(j)(2)(A)(iv) of the act requires that the applicantprovide information to show that its drug product is bioequivalent to thelisted drug referred to by the applicant. Thus, there is no statutory provisionfor deferral of the requirement. Therefore, in those situations where methodologyfor in vivo testing is not available, the applicant is required to developadequate methodology for such testing, or to carry out clinical studiesto assess therapeutic equivalence, unless the agency determines that invitro methods can be used to demonstrate bioequivalence. In some cases, the in vivo bioavailability of a drug product may be self-evident,e.g., for a drug product that is a solution intended for intravenous ororal administration. The regulations under 21 CFR Part 320 set forth thecriteria for waiver of evidence of in vivo bioavailability. (Also see discussionabout proposed revisions to the waiver criteria under part VI.) The agencydoes not believe Congress intended that unnecessary human research be conductedin cases where an applicant could demonstrate that a product is inherentlybioequivalent to another product and therefore meets the statutory standardof bioequivalence. Therefore, the agency proposes to continue its policythat if an applicant can demonstrate that its proposed drug product fallsin this category, such a demonstration would be considered adequate informationto show bioequivalence to the reference listed drug, as required in proposedandSection; 314.94(a)(7)(i). Likewise, if the agency concludes that bioequivalencecan be demonstrated by in vitro tests, the agency proposes to require onlysuch tests rather than in vivo studies. (See section 505(j)(6)(A)(i)(III)of the act.) The agency informs prospective applicants of whether in vivoor only in vitro tests will be required through its list. In addition,the agency may from time to time, prepare or modify existing guidance documentsfor conducting bioequivalence studies. To assure that all applicants receivethe most up-to-date version of any available guidance documents on thetypes of studies recommended for establishing bioequivalence, FDA publishesa complete listing of the most current available guidance documents inthe list. Many applicants now submit bioequivalence protocols to obtain agency reviewand comment before beginning bioequivalence tests. The agency proposesto continue to permit the submission of these protocols. An ANDA that containsa bioequivalence protocol and the chemistry, manufacturing, and controlsdata required by andSection; 314.94(a)(9) would be considered sufficientlycomplete to start the statutory 180-day review period. However, an applicantcertifying patent invalidity or noninfringement must submit completed bioequivalencestudies with the initial ANDA submission (see section 505(j)(2)(B) of theact). f. <T3>Therapeutic effect. </T3>Under the petition procedure, an applicantmay seek to substitute one of the active ingredients in its proposed combinationdrug product for one of the active ingredients in the reference listedcombination drug. If FDA approves a petition permitting the submissionof an ANDA for such a change, the ANDA must contain information to showthat the different active ingredient in the proposed drug product is ofthe same pharmacological or therapeutic class as the ingredient in thereference listed drug that was changed and that the proposed drug productcan be expected to have the same therapeutic effect as the reference listeddrug when administered to patients for the conditions of use approved forthe listed drug and for which the applicant is seeking approval. (See section505(j)(2)(A)(iv) of the act.)With respect to the requirement that the substituted active ingredientbe ``of the same pharmacological or therapeutic class'' as that of thelisted drug, FDA would view the different active ingredient as being ofthe same pharmacological or therapeutic class as that of the listed drugif the applicant can show that the different active ingredient in its proposeddrug product has similar pharmacologic properties to the ingredient inthe listed drug that has been changed. FDA would view a drug product asbeing expected to have the same therapeutic effect as the listed drug ifthe applicant can demonstrate that: (1) There is an adequate scientificbasis for determining that substitution of the specific proposed dose ofthe different active ingredient for the dose of the member of the samepharmacological or therapeutic class in the reference listed drug willyield a resulting drug product of the same safety and effectiveness. Thiswill ordinarily require a showing that there is general acceptance in thescientific community that the specified doses of the two ingredients areequipotent; (2) the unchanged active ingredients in the applicant's drugproduct are bioequivalent to those in the reference listed drug; and (3)the different active ingredient in the applicant's drug product is bioequivalentto an approved dosage form of a drug product containing that ingredientand approved for the same indication(s) as the proposed product or is bioequivalentto a drug product offered for that indication which does not meet the definitionof ``new drug'' under section 201(p) of the act. This would demonstratethat the different active ingredient is as bioavailable from the combinationdrug product as it is when separate preparations of the active ingredientare given. During its review of the ANDA, FDA may request the submissionof additional information to show that the proposed drug product can beexpected to have the same therapeutic effect as the listed drug.g. <T3>Chemistry, manufacturing, and controls. </T3>The agency proposes atandSection; 314.94(a)(9)(i) to retain the current requirement of the submissionof adequate chemistry, manufacturing, and controls information describedunder andSection; 314.50(d)(1). Current agency practice permits applicantsto submit this information and bioequivalence protocols before beginningbioequivalence tests of their drug products and submitting the resultsof these tests to FDA. Thus, applicants are able to obtain agency reviewand comment on their formulation data, bioequivalence protocols, and pilotstudies before conducting bioequivalence tests. The agency intends to continuethis practice, except that ANDA's that contain a section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii)(IV)patent certification must submit completed bioequivalence studies withthe initial ANDA submission.h. <T3>Inactive ingredients. </T3>The inactive ingredients or compositionused in a generic drug product must not raise serious safety questions.(See discussion in part V. section M., <T3>infra.</T3>) The agency intends to place more stringent limitationson the variations permitted in the inactive ingredients in the formulationof parenteral, ophthalmic, and otic drug products than on other dosageforms. This is because each parenteral, ophthalmic, and otic drug productrepresents an individual pharmaceutical system with its own characteristicsand requirements. In the formulation of parenteral drug products, certainadded substances are used to maintain solubility, stability, sterility,and to increase patient comfort (i.e., by adjusting toxicity and reducingtissue irritation). Added substances selected for parenteral drug productsmust be known to be of the highest quality, must be known to not interferewith the therapeutic effectiveness of the product and must be known tobe nontoxic in the quantities used. The sensitivity of inactive ingredientsin parenteral drug products is reflected in regulations under 21 CFR 201.100which require that certain added substances and their concentrations belisted on the label of the product. Similarly, added substances are usedin the formulation of products intended for ophthalmic and otic use suchas buffers, antimicrobial preservatives, chemicals to adjust toxicity,and thickening agents.Generally, in an ANDA, the formulation of ingredients in parental, ophthalmic,and otic dosage forms must be identical to the formulation of the referencelisted drug identified in the ANDA. For the reasons described above, theagency will presume any inactive ingredient in an applicant's proposeddrug product different from that in the reference listed drug to be unsafeunless the applicant can rebut the presumption by demonstrating that thedifferent inactive ingredient will not affect the safety of its proposeddrug product. Differences from the reference listed drug in the types ofadded substances described above for parenteral, ophthalmic, and otic dosageforms may be permitted if the applicant includes in its ANDA an identificationand characterization of the differences in added substances between theproposed drug product and reference listed drug and demonstrates that suchdifferences will not affect the safety of the proposed drug product.For all dosage forms, the applicant would be required to identify and characterizeany differences between the formulation of its proposed drug product andthat of the reference listed drug and include in the ANDA information toshow that the inactive ingredient will not adversely affect the drug product'ssafety.i.<T3> Samples and labeling. </T3>The agency proposes at andSection; 314.94(a)(10)to: (1) retain the current requirement under andSection; 314.50(e) that uponFDA's request, the applicant submit samples of the finished drug product,the drug substances used in the manufacture of the drug product, and referencestandards and blanks and (2) retain the current requirement under andSection;314.50(e) with respect to the submission of analytical methods and descriptiveinformation needed to perform the tests on the samples and to validatethe applicant's analytical methods. The agency also proposes at andSection; 314.94(a)(8)(ii) to retain the currentrequirement under andSection; 314.50(e)(2)(ii) for the submission of copiesof the proposed or final printed label and labeling for the drug productfor which the applicant is seeking approval, i.e., four copies of draftlabeling or 12 copies of final printed labeling. The agency proposes to add a new requirement with respect to the submissionof labeling. The statutory provisions of section 505(j) of the act requirethat an applicant provide sufficient information to assure that a genericversion of a previously approved drug product is the same as the listeddrug in dosage form, strength, and route of administration, contains thesame active ingredients, except for differences from the listed drug thathave been the subject of an approved petition, and generally is recommendedfor administration under the same conditions of use. In addition, the actrequires that an applicant include in the ANDA information adequate toshow that the proposed labellng for its drug product is the same as thatof the reference listed drug except for changes required because of differencesapproved under a petition or because the drug product and the referencelisted drug are produced or distributed by different manufacturers. Thus,an applicant's proposed labeling might differ from that of the referencelisted drug because: (1) the method of formulation (e.g., inactive ingredients)differs; (2) the applicant's product and the reference listed drug havedifferent strengths (in the case of petition-approved drug products) orwith respect to the ``how supplied'' section of the labeling, the genericmanufacturer does not supply all strengths of the drug product; (3) thereference listed drug labeling does not reflect current agency labelingstandards; for example, the agency may require a change in the labelingof a drug product to make available important new information about thesafe use of a drug product, but the reference listed drug's labeling hasnot yet been updated to reflect this change; (4) the reference listed druglabeling includes conditions of use that are protected by a patent or areaccorded a period of exclusive marketing; (5) the name and address of themanufacturers of the proposed and listed drug products vary; (6) the expirationdates for the proposed product and the reference listed drug differ; (7)the National Drug Code (NDC) number for the proposed product and the referencelisted drug differ, if displayed on the label and in the labeling; and(8) there are differences in the color used in a tablet (e.g., the listeddrug contains Yellow No. 5, which must be declared in the label, whilethe proposed product uses a different color).FDA emphasizes that the exceptions to the requirement that a generic drug'slabeling be the same as that of the listed drug are limited. The agencywill not accept ANDA's for products with significant changes in labeling(such as new warnings or precautions) intended to address newly introducedsafety or effectiveness problems not presented by the listed drug. Suchlabeling changes do not fall within the limited exceptions in sections505(j)(2)(A)(v) and 505(j)(3)(G) of the act. Moreover, FDA does not believethat it would be consistent with the purpose of section 505(j) of the act,which is to assure the marketing of generic drugs that are as safe andeffective as their brand-name counterparts, to interpret section 505(j)(2)(A)(v)of the act as permitting the marketing of generic drugs with diminishedsafety or effectiveness and concomitantly heightened labeled warnings.Thus, where a proposed change in a generic drug, e.g., in packaging orinactive ingredients or, for a petition-approved drug, in the approvedchange, would jeopardize the safe or effective use of the product so asto necessitate the addition of significant new labeled warnings, the proposedproduct would not satisfy the labeling requirements of sections 505(j)(2)(A)(v)and 505(j)(3)(G) of the act.To assist the agency in determining if the applicant's proposed labelingis the ``same as'' that of the reference listed drug, except for the typesof differences described above, FDA proposes in andSection; 314.94(a)(8)(iv)to require the applicant to include in the ANDA a side-by-side comparisonof the applicant's proposed labeling with the currently approved labelingfor the listed drug referred to in the ANDA with all differences annotatedand explained. Current approved labeling for any approved drug productmay be obtained under 21 CFR Part 20 pursuant to the Freedom of InformationAct. In addition, the proposed rule provides that an applicant must includein the ANDA a statement that the proposed labeling is the same as thatof the listed drug except for those allowable differences specificallycited by the applicant. Where the agency has issued class labeling or anotherlabeling standard, e.g., labeling requirements set forth in a DESI notice,and the applicant believes such labeling is more appropriate than the listeddrug product's labeling, the applicant should refer to such labeling orstandard and explain why it is more appropriate. j.<T3> Patent certification. </T3>The statute prevents an ANDA from becomingeffective before all relevant listed product and use patents that havebeen filed for the listed drug have expired  or, if the generic applicantasserts either that the generic product will not infringe the patent orthat the patent is invalid, until the patent owner and listed drug holderhave been notified and have had an opportunity to litigate the matter.Sections 505 (b) and (c) of the act require that applicants for all newlysubmitted or pending new drug applications and holders of all previouslyapproved new drug applications submitted under section 505(b) of the actsubmit to FDA the patent number and the expiration date of any patent thatclaims the drug in the new drug application or that claims a method ofusing such drug with respect to which a claim of patent infringement couldreasonably be asserted if a person not licensed by the owner of the patentengaged in the manufacture, sale, or use of the drug product. The patents covered by the statutory provisions for submission of patentinformation are those that claim the drug product for which approval isbeing sought, including an active ingredient in such product and use patentsthat claim a particular indication or method of using the drug product.The agency interprets the statutory language ``any patent which claimsthe drug'' to include formulation and composition patents that claim thedrug product for which approval is being sought. The 1984 Amendments donot authorize the submission of information for patents that claim a methodof manufacturing a listed drug or that claim drug products for which theapplicant is not seeking or has not obtained approval. FDA is requiredto publish the required patent information submitted under section 505(b) or (c) of the act. The patent information appears in the list. i. <T3>Patents requiring a certification or statement</T3>. Proposed andSection;314.94(a)(12), which implements sections 505(j)(2)(A) (vii) and (viii)of the act, requires applicants to include in their original ANDA submissiona certification or statement as to each patent that, in the opinion ofthe applicant and to the best of its knowledge, claims the reference listeddrug or a use of the reference listed drug for which the applicant seeksapproval. A certification under andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i) or statementunder andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(iii), as appropriate, must be submitted wheneveran applicant believes that the reference listed drug is claimed by an ingredientpatent, drug product patent (including a formulation and composition patent),or a method of use patent. In some instances, an applicant may have tomake multiple certifications if there is more than one relevant patenton the listed drug. For example, if the active ingredient patent for thelisted drug has expired but a valid formulation patent will not expirefor 3 years, then the applicant would be required to certify, for example,that one patent has expired and the other will expire in 3 years. The patent information submitted to FDA, whether or not published in thelist, should be the basis of the applicant's certification. To assist theapplicant in determining whether information on a relevant patent has beensubmitted to FDA, the agency will place copies of new patent submissionson approved drug products and, prior to its publication, a copy of thepatent information supplement to the list on public display in the Freedomof Information Office (HFI-35), Food and Drug Administration, 5600 FishersLane, Rockville, MD 20857. Once a year, FDA conducts a review of the patentinformation published in the list and deletes all patents that have expiredin the course of the year. Thus, an applicant should check the list forpublished patent information and FDA's Freedom of Information Office forpatent information submitted to FDA but not yet published. FDA would alsoexpect that an applicant would check the Patent Office for U.S. patentsissued but not yet submitted to FDA. If the applicant is aware of a U.S.patent that claims the drug, drug product, or a method of using the drugthat has been granted but not yet submitted to FDA, it must submit a certificationunder section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii)(I) of the act or, if applicable, a statementunder section 505(j)(2)(a)(viii) of the act. If an applicant becomes aware,after submitting an ANDA, of a newly issued patent or if a patent is timelysubmitted after the submission of the ANDA, an appropriate new certificationwould be required in the form of an amendment to the pending ANDA. ii. <T3>Patent certifications or statement. </T3>Under section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii)(I)of the act, an applicant must make a ``paragraph I'' certification if theapplicant is aware, e.g., through a patent search, that a patent existsthat claims the listed drug or that claims a use for such listed drug forwhich the applicant is seeking approval and for which patent informationis required to be submitted, but for which the holder of the approved applicationfor the listed drug has not submitted the information to FDA (proposedandSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>1</T3>)). Under section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii)(II) of the act, an applicant must makea ``paragraph II'' certification if the applicant believes that there wasa patent that claimed the listed drug or that claimed a use for such listeddrug but that such patent has expired (proposed andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>2</T3>)).Under section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii)(III) of the act, an applicant must makea ``paragraph III'' certification if the applicant believes that thereis an unexpired patent that claims the reference listed drug or that claimsa use for such listed drug and the applicant does not want to certify thatthe patent is invalid or will not be infringed by the applicant's proposeddrug product. The certification must state the date on which the patentwill expire (proposed andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>3</T3>)). Under section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii)(IV) of the act, an applicant must makea ``paragraph IV'' certification if the applicant believes that there isa relevant unexpired patent that claims the listed drug or that claimsa use for such listed drug, but also believes that the patent is invalidor will not be infringed by the applicant's proposed drug product. In addition,if the proposed drug product is a generic copy of a listed, patented drugand is the subject of a patent licensing agreement with the patent owner,the applicant would submit a paragraph IV certification. The agency proposesat andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) that a paragraph IV certification be submitted to FDA in thefollowing form:<ITAG tagnum="21">I, (<T3>name of applicant</T3>), certify that Patent No. <T2>XX</T2>(<T3>is invalid or will not be infringed by the manufacture, use, or saleof) (name of proposed drug product</T3>) for which this application issubmitted.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The certification must be accompanied by the statement required bysection 505(j)(2)(B)(i) of the act that the applicant will give the noticerequired by section 505(j)(2)(B)(ii) of the act and proposed andSection;314.95(a) to the patent owner or its representative and the holder of theapproved application for the listed drug and by a statement that the applicantwill comply with the requirements under proposed andSection; 314.95(c) withrespect to the content of the notice. A certification in any other formwill not be accepted by the agency as a paragraph IV certification. If, in the applicant's opinion and to the best of its knowledge, no relevantpatents claim the listed drug or a method of using the listed drug, theagency proposes at andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(ii) to require the applicantto include in its ANDA the following certification:<ITAG tagnum="21">In the opinion and to the best knowledge of (<T3>name of applicant</T3>), there are no patents that claim the listeddrug referred to in this application or that claim a use of the listeddrug.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">This will assist the agency in assuring that each applicant has compliedwith section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii) of the act. If a patent is removed fromthe list after an applicant has submitted one of the certifications describedin andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A), and the application is pending or hasa delayed effective date, the applicant should submit an amended certificationunder andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(ii) certifying that there are no relevantpatents. The new certification should be submitted either as an amendmentto a pending application or by letter to an approved application.If there is a patent claiming a method of using the listed drug, and thelabeling for the applicant's proposed drug product does not include anyindications that are covered by the use patent, proposed andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(iii)would require the applicant to submit a statement that the method of usepatent does not claim any of the proposed indications. The applicant shouldnot submit a certification under andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A) for sucha patent. If, however, the labeling of the proposed drug product includesan indication that, according to the patent information submitted to FDAunder sections 505 (b) and (c) of the act or in the opinion of the applicant,is claimed by the use patent, the applicant must submit an applicable certificationunder andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A). If patent information is submitted on a listed drug and, if, as of thetime FDA concludes that an ANDA that refers to that drug is approvable,the ANDA applicant has not submitted an appropriate certification or statementon the patent, FDA will notify the applicant of the existence of the submittedpatent before approval. (Because the applicant will then have to complywith any applicable certification and notification requirements, possiblydelaying approval, applicants should make every effort to keep themselvesinformed as to whether patent information has been submitted while theirANDA's are pending.) If, however, a patent on the listed drug is issuedby the Patent Office after an ANDA is submitted to FDA, and the holderof the approved application for the listed drug does not submit patentinformation within 30 days of issuance of the patent as required by section505(c) of the act, the agency is proposing that no recertification be requiredfor a pending ANDA that refers to that drug, if the ANDA applicant haspreviously submitted an appropriate certification. If the approved applicationholder ultimately submits the information late, the applicant need notsubmit an amended certification. A generic applicant whose applicationis submitted <T3>after</T3> a late submission of patent information on the listed drugor whose application is pending but does not contain a previously submittedcertification, must, however, certify as to that patent. (See proposedandSection; 314.94(a)(12)(vi) and discussion at part V., section Q.4, <T3>infra</T3>.) iii. <T3>Patent licensing agreements</T3>. The agency proposes in andSection;314.94(a)(12)(i)(B) and (v) to implement the following patent certificationrules where the proposed drug product or the listed drug is a copy of apatented drug and is the subject of a patent licensing agreement with thepatent owner. If the proposed drug product is a generic copy of a patenteddrug and the applicant has obtained a licensing agreement with the patentowner, FDA proposes to require the applicant to submit a certificationunder section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii)(IV) of the act. In response to the noticeof certification from the generic applicant to the patent owner, the patentowner may consent to an immediate effective date of approval of the genericapplicant's application by providing FDA with a written statement thatthe patent owner and the applicant have entered into a patent licensingagreement and consent to an immediate effective date. In such cases, i.e.,when the agency is informed by the patent owner of a licensing agreement,the agency may, if all other requirements are met, approve the ANDA beforethe 45-day statutory period has elapsed. The written statement from thepatent owner should be in the following form:<ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>Name of patent owner</T3>), owner of Patent No. <T2>XXX</T2>, and (<T3>name of applicant</T3>) have entered into a patent licensing agreementthat authorizes (<T3>name of applicant</T3>) to engage in the manufacture and sale of (<T3>name of proposed drug product</T3>). (<T3>Name of patent owner</T3>) does not object if FDA makes the approvalof (<T3>name of applicant's</T3>) ANDA for (<T3>name of proposed drug product</T3>) effective at any time on or afterthe date of this statement.</ITAG>If an ANDA refers to a listed drug that is itself a licensed generic versionof a patented pioneer drug, the ANDA must include a certification as toany relevant patent on the pioneer drug. Section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii) of theact requires an applicant to make a certification ``* * * <T3>with respect to each patent which claims the listed drug referred toin clause (i) or which claims a use for such listed drug for which theapplicant is seeking approval</T3> under [section 505(j)] and for whichinformation is required to be filed under subsection (b) or (c) * * *''(emphasis added). Because, where a licensing agreement is necessary, thepatent will claim both the pioneer drug product and generic copies of thatdrug product, an ANDA that refers to the licensed copy must include a certificationas to any patent on the pioneer for which information was required to befiled under section 505 (b) or (c) of the act. When the agency is awareof a patent licensing agreement between the applicant of a listed genericdrug and a patent owner, it will publish in the list information on thepatent next to the listing for the licensed generic drug. iv. <T3>Amended certifications. </T3>FDA is proposing to require an applicantwho has made a paragraph IV certification to amend its patent certificationif the applicant has a pending ANDA or an ANDA with a delayed effectivedate and one of the following occurs: (1) a final judgment is entered findingthat the applicant's product infringes the patent, or (2) the patent isremoved from the list for any reason other than because the patent hasbeen declared invalid in a lawsuit brought by the patent owner within 45days of the receipt of notice under section 505(j)(2)(B) of the act. Onceamended, the application will not be considered to be one containing aparagraph IV certification for purposes of section 505(j)(4)(B)(iv) ofthe act. A patent certification must also be amended if the applicant learns thatits previous certification is incorrect, with two exceptions. First, asdescribed above in part V. section D.1.j.ii., an applicant who has madean appropriate certification would not be required to amend the certificationif, following the first certification, the listed drug applicant submitsinformation on a patent on the listed drug, but the submission is untimely.Second, FDA is proposing not to require an amended certification if afteran ANDA is approved, whether or not the approval is effective, the listeddrug applicant submits information on a patent on the listed drug, whetherthe submission is timely or not. Once an ANDA becomes effective, new patentsissued on a listed drug are not subject to the patent certification provisionsof the 1984 Amendments; the patent holder may enforce such a patent underthe patent provisions of Title 35 of the United States Code, but is notentitled to notice from the ANDA applicant or to a period during whichthe ANDA applicant is kept off the market while the patent issue is litigated.Any delay in an ANDA's effective date will be entirely unrelated to thetiming of the issuance of a new patent on the listed drug. Accordingly,FDA believes that requiring an amended certification if a patent is issuedafter approval of an ANDA but before its effective date would provide anunintended windfall to the listed drug applicant, who, but for the fortuitousdelay in the ANDA's effective date, would not have reaped the benefitsof the patent certification provisions of the 1984 Amendments. However,FDA specifically seeks comment on whether an amended certification shouldbe required under these circumstances, and on the policies, if any, thatwould be served by requiring such an amendment. 2. <T3>Review copy. </T3>The agency proposes to retain the current requirementthat, in addition to the complete archival copy, an applicant submit areview copy of an ANDA that contains two separately bound sections. Onesection would be required to contain a copy of the application form, thechemistry, manufacturing, and controls information described in proposedandSection; 314.94(a)(9), the information described in proposed andSection;314.94(a)(3) (basis for ANDA submission), andSection; 314.94(a) (4) through(6), (8), and (12), and one copy of the analytical methods and descriptiveinformation needed by FDA's laboratories to perform tests on samples ofthe proposed drug product and to validate the applicant's analytical methods.The other section will contain a copy of the application form, the informationdescribed in andSection; 314.94(a)(3) (basis for ANDA submission) and (7)(bioequivalence information) and a copy of the currently approved labelingfor the reference listed drug and of the applicant's annotated proposedlabeling.E. Notice of Certification of Invalidity or Noninfringment of a PatentProposed andSection; 314.95 incorporates the requirements of section 505(j)(2)(B)of the act with respect to notification of the patent owner and the holderof the approved application for the listed drug when an applicant certifiesunder section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii)(IV) of the act that a patent is invalidor will not be infringed. In addition, proposed andSection; 314.95 describesthe information to be included in the notice. The act permits an applicant who wishes to market a generic version ofa listed drug product to challenge a drug or use patent that the pioneerapplication holder identifies as precluding the marketing of the genericversion. An applicant who submits an ANDA to FDA for the generic versionof the listed drug and wishes to initiate such a challenge must certifythat the relevant patent submitted by the pioneer application holder tothe agency is invalid or will not be infringed. The applicant must thengive notice of its certification to (1) the owner(s) of each relevant patentor the representative designated by the patent owner to receive such noticeand (2) the holder of the approved application under section 505(b) ofthe act for the reference listed drug claimed by the patent or the holder'srepresentative (attorney, agent, or other authorized official). Under the proposal, an applicant is required to provide the notice of certificationwhen it receives FDA's acknowledgment of the receipt of an ANDA that isacceptable for review. Although the legislative history states that Congressintended that the notice be sent simultaneously with submission to FDAof the ANDA, the statute requires the applicant to state in the noticethat an application ``has been submitted.'' Moreover, the statute requiresthe notice to state that the application contains data from bioavailabilityor bioequivalence studies. Receipt of the notice by the patent owner orits representative or the approved application holder triggers the startof the 45-day clock within which a patent owner or application holder mustbring suit if it wishes to challenge an applicant's certification of patentinvalidity or noninfringement. The statute and legislative history of TitleI demonstrate that Congress did not intend incomplete application submissionsto trigger legal action by a patent owner or approved application holder.The agency therefore proposes that the notice be sent only upon submissionof a ``complete'' application. An applicant must first submit an ANDA andcertify in the application that it will provide the required notice tothe patent owner or its representative and to the pioneer application holder.After receipt of the application, the agency will determine if the applicationis acceptable for review. An application containing a paragraph IV certificationthat does not contain the results of any required completed bioavailabilityor bioequivalence studies that meets an appropriate FDA guidance or thatis reasonable in design, and that purports to show that the proposed drugis bioequivalent to the listed drug, would not be considered acceptablefor review. Neither a protocol nor a pilot study will be considered acceptable.If, however, the ANDA is for a drug for which a bioequivalence study isnot required, e.g., a parenteral product, the application may be consideredacceptable for review if it contains a waiver of a bioequivalence studyrequirement. If the application is acceptable for review, FDA will notifythe applicant in writing and provide the applicant with the ANDA numberassigned by FDA. Immediately upon receipt by the applicant of FDA's acknowledgementletter, the applicant would be required to notify the persons describedin the statute of the certification of invalidity or noninfringement, andamend the ANDA to include a statement certifying that the notice has beenprovided and that the notice contains the required information, describedat andSection; 314.95(c). If an abbreviated application is amended to includea paragraph IV certification because the applicant learns of a relevantpatent after the abbreviated application is submitted and before its approval,the applicant would be required to notify the appropriate parties whenthe amendment is submitted to FDA. If a patent on a listed drug is issuedafter an abbreviated application is approved, the generic applicant needtake no further action. The agency does not propose to require the applicant to notify holdersof approved applications for drugs other than the listed drug claimed bythe product or use patent. If an ANDA refers to a licensed generic versionof a patented pioneer drug and the applicant made a certification as tothe patent on the pioneer drug, the applicant must notify the patent ownerand the holder of the approved pioneer application of its certification.An applicant may obtain the name and address of the patent owner or theattorney or agent designated to represent the patent owner in patent proceedings(attorney or agent of record) from the United States Patent and TrademarkOffice. The name and address of the holder of the approved applicationor the holder's attorney, agent, or authorized official (i.e., the personwho signed the Form FDA 356h) may be obtained from FDA's Center for DrugEvaluation and Research, Division of Drug Information Resources (HFD-80).The 45-day clock would start on the first day after the date of receiptof the notice by the patent owner or its representative or by the approvedapplication holder if it is an exclusive patent licensee as documentedby the applicant under proposed andSection; 314.95(e). Although an applicantis required to provide the notice to the patent owner and approved applicationholder, FDA believes it is appropriate to rely solely on the patent ownerto make decisions about bringing patent infringement actions, unless thereis a patent license agreement and the approved application holder is theexclusive patent licensee. In the latter situation, FDA would expect theexclusive licensee to bring suit for patent infringement. Therefore, thedate of receipt of the notice by an application holder who is not an exclusivelicensee for the patent will not trigger the start of the 45-day clock.The agency specifically seeks comment on this policy. FDA will accept as adequate documentation of the date of receipt of thenotice (1) a return receipt or (2) a letter acknowledging receipt fromthe patent owner and approved application holder. If an applicant wishesto rely on another form of documentation, the applicant should first checkwith the agency. The applicant would be required to amend the ANDA to includea copy of the return receipt or other such evidence of the date the notificationwas received by the patent owner and approved application holder. Proposed andSection; 314.95(c) lists the information to be included in thenotice. Under the proposal, the notice would cite section 505(j)(2)(B)(ii)of the act as the relevant statutory authority for the notice and contain:(1) a statement that FDA has received an ANDA submitted by the applicantcontaining any required bioavailability or bioequivalence data or information,(2) the ANDA number assigned by FDA, (3) the established name, if any,of the drug product that is the subject of the ANDA, (4) the active ingredient,strength, and dosage form of the proposed drug product, (5) the patentnumber and expiration date, as submitted to the agency or as known to theapplicant, of each patent alleged to be invalid or not infringed, (6) adetailed statement of the factual and legal basis of the applicant's opinionthat the patent is not valid or will not be infringed, and (7) if the applicantdoes not reside or have a place of business in the United States, the nameand address of an agent in the United States authorized to accept serviceof process for the applicant. With respect to the factual and legal basisfor the applicant's certification, the agency proposes that for each claimof a patent noninfringement, the notice would be required to include anexplanation of the alleged noninfringement. In addition, for formulationor composition patents, the notice would be required to include a descriptionof a mechanism through which the applicant agrees to make the formulationor composition of the proposed drug product known to the patent owner orto a designated intermediary who will act as a referee. The agency believesthat only by making the formulation or composition available to the patentowner or a designated third party will the patent owner have sufficientinformation to make an informed decision whether to sue for patent infringement.For each claim of patent invalidity, the notice would be required to includean explanation of the grounds supporting the allegation, including allstatutory bases, affirmative defenses, reasoning, and evidence supportingthe allegation, citing any relevant case precedent upon which the allegationis based, providing a copy of any patent or publication relied upon, andindicating that portion of each such patent or publication that is allegedto invalidate such claim and the reasons supporting such allegation. Although the proposed regulations describe the information required bystatute that an applicant must include in a notice, the applicant is notrequired to include a copy of the notice in its ANDA as suggested by thePharmaceutical Manufacturers Association (PMA) (comments filed under DocketNo. 85N-0214). Only a statement that such notice has been given by theapplicant is required (21 U.S.C. 355(j)(2)(B)(i)). Determinations concerningthe scope of patents are the province of the United States Patent and TrademarkOffice and of the courts. FDA does not have the expertise, nor is it requiredto review the notice as suggested by PMA. FDA proposes only to ensure thatsuch notice has been sent and received. If the applicant meets the requirementsunder proposed andSection; 314.95, which FDA believes will assure adequatenotice, the agency will presume the notice to be complete and sufficient.Thus, the agency does not intend to intervene in cases where the patentowner or exclusive patent licensee claims that the notice was deficient.However, in cases where the notice was deemed inadequate by the patentowner or exclusive patent licensee and where the ANDA applicant subsequentlyamends the notice, the agency may, if the applicant amends its ANDA witha written statement that the date of receipt of the amended notificationshould be considered the date of receipt of notice, use the date of theamended notification to begin the 45-day statutory period for institutionof an action for patent infringement. F. Amendments to an Unapproved ANDA The agency proposes to revise its regulations regarding amendments to pendingANDA's. Proposed andSection; 314.96 would provide for extensions to the 180-day reviewclock under section 505(j)(4)(A) of the act only for evaluating major amendments(i.e., those requiring substantial FDA review time). Examples of such majoramendments would involve amendments that contain data from a new bioequivalencestudy or stability or sterility study resulting from a drug product reformulationor change in the manufacturing or controls procedures, significant updateddata from a change in the source of the drug substance or change in manufacturingfacility, or data from a bioequivalence study where only a protocol wascontained in the original submission. The agency would consider such anamendment, whether submitted on the applicant's own initiative or at therequest of the agency, to constitute an agreement by FDA and the applicantto an extension of the review period under section 505(j)(4)(A) of theact. Any extension would start with the date of receipt by FDA of the amendmentand would be limited to the time necessary for FDA to review the submission.Under the proposal, an amendment that contains data and information toresolve substantial deficiencies in the ANDA as set forth in a not approvableletter under andSection; 314.120 would extend the review period for 120 daysfrom the date of receipt by FDA of the amendment. Although the agency nowattempts to review these amendments quickly, the agency believes this isa reasonable period for review of an amendment to resolve substantial deficienciesand that establishing a uniform length of time for this review will eliminatethe need to notify each applicant of the amount of time needed to reviewits amendment. G. Other Applicant Responsibilities 1. <T3>General.</T3> The agency proposes to retain the current requirementsfor applicants under 21 CFR Part 314 regarding: (1) withdrawal by an applicantof an unapproved ANDA, (2) submission of supplements and other changesto an approved ANDA, (3 ) change in ownership of an ANDA, (4) submissionof postmarketing reports, other than adverse drug experience reports, and(5) request for waiver of submission requirements. 2. <T3>Postmarketing reports. </T3>With respect to the requirements set forthunder andSection; 314.80 for reporting adverse drug experiences, the agencyproposes in andSection; 314.98 to require an applicant of an approved ANDAto comply with those requirements but only if the approval is effectiveunder andSection; 314.107. The objective of the adverse drug experience reportingrequirements is to signal potential serious safety problems with marketeddrugs, especially newly marketed drugs. An applicant cannot market a drugproduct before it has an effective approval for its ANDA, so it is unlikelythat the applicant, before this effective approval, would receive adversedrug experience information about other drug products through literaturereports or unpublished scientific papers that would not also be receivedby the marketers of those drug products. FDA is also proposing in andSection; 314.98 the following changes in itsadverse drug experience reporting requirements for applicants of ANDA'sand abbreviated antibiotic applications. First, ANDA and abbreviated antibioticapplication applicants would no longer be required to submit duplicatecopies of adverse drug experience reports. This change is made possibleby the centralization of FDA's processing of drug experience reports ongeneric versions of approved drug products in a single office in the Centerfor Drug Evaluation and Research that has the responsibility for ensuringthe proper distribution and analysis of these reports. Ordinarily, theDivision of Generic Drugs will not evaluate these reports and thereforeno longer needs to receive a copy. Applicants should send one copy of eachadverse drug experience report directly to the Division of Epidemiologyand Surveillance (HFD-730). Second, the proposed regulations would provide that an ANDA and abbreviatedantibiotic application applicant submit to FDA periodic reports of adversedrug experiences only if (1) the applicant has received during the periodicreporting cycle adverse drug experiences not previously reported or (2)there are labeling changes initiated by the applicant. FDA is also proposing the following revisions to andSection; 314.80. First,the agency proposes to revise the definition of the term ``adverse drugexperience'' by deleting the word ``significant'' in the phrase ``any significantfailure of expected pharmacological action.'' The word ``significant''has been a source of confusion and ambiguity. FDA considers any reportof failure of a drug to produce the expected pharmacological action tobe significant. This proposed revision would unambiguously require thatall reports of a therapeutic failure (lack of effect) be submitted to FDA.Second, the agency proposes to add the following new adverse drug experiencereporting requirement. Under the proposal, applicants of both full andabbreviated applications would be required to review periodically (at leastas often as the periodic reporting cycle) the frequency of reports of failureof a drug to produce the expected pharmacological action (lack of effect)received by an applicant and report any significant increase in frequencyof therapeutic failure (lack of effect) to FDA within 15 working days ofdetermining that an increase in frequency exists. Determinations of significantincreases in frequency are to be based on FDA's ``Guideline for PostmarketReporting of Adverse Drug Reactions.'' Applicants would be required tosubmit these reports in narrative form (including the time period on whichthe increased frequency is based, the method of analysis, and the interpretationof results). These narrative reports would be required to be submittedunder separate cover and not in a periodic report except for summary purposes.The intent of this proposed revision is to facilitate the identificationof possible therapeutic failures with both generic and brand-name drugproducts, and to obtain evidence to confirm or refute reports of therapeuticinequivalence between generic drugs and their brand-name counterparts.(Also see part VI. Conforming Amendments.) The agency proposes to retain the current requirement for the submissionof other postmarketing reports under andSection; 314.81, if applicable, uponapproval of an ANDA, whether or not the approval is effective. For example,certain manufacturing and control changes not requiring a supplementalapplication under andSection; 314.70(b) and (c) must be reported in an annualreport, and advertising and promotional material must be submitted to FDAat the time of initial dissemination or initial publication. 3. <T3>Waivers. </T3>The agency proposes to retain the current requirementunder andSection; 314.90 under which an applicant may obtain a waiver ofrequirements for the submission of information in an application. The applicablesections are those set forth under new proposed Subpart C. FDA may not,however, waive statutory requirements. H. Time Frames for FDA Actions on ANDA's The agency proposes to revise its regulations regarding agency actionsin receiving, reviewing, and approving or refusing to approve ANDA's toimplement the provisions of section 505(j) of the act. 1. <T3>Receiving and reviewing ANDA's. </T3>Under section 505(j)(4)(A) ofthe act, within 180 days of the initial receipt of an ANDA, FDA must eitherapprove or refuse to approve the ANDA, unless FDA and the applicant agreeto an extension. If FDA refuses to approve the ANDA, it must give the applicanta notice of an opportunity for a hearing (NOOH) on whether the ANDA isapprovable and will issue such a notice if the applicant elects to requesta hearing rather than to amend or withdraw its application, see andSection;314.120. Although the statute mentions ``filing'' an ANDA, filing does not triggerthe statutory time period in which FDA must either approve or disapprovethe ANDA. For an ANDA submitted to FDA under section 505(j) of the act,it is the time between the initial receipt of the ANDA and approval ordisapproval. This differs from an application submitted under section 505(b)of the act, for which, within 180 days after filing an application, FDAmust either approve the application or give the applicant a notice of opportunityfor a hearing on whether the application is approvable, unless FDA andthe applicant agree to an extension of time. For applications submittedunder section 505(j) of the act, the agency considers the date of initialreceipt of an ANDA to be the date FDA receives a submission that, on itsface, is sufficiently complete to permit a substantive review. Such anANDA may contain only the chemistry, manufacturing, and controls informationrequired by andSection; 314.94(a)(9) and a bioequivalence protocol unlessthe applicant certifies that a relevant patent is invalid or will not beinfringed. In the latter case, the ANDA must contain also the results ofany required bioequivalence studies. Accordingly, the agency proposes revisions to andSection; 314.101 to addthe requirements for receipt of an ANDA. ANDA's will be reviewed for completenesswhen they are submitted. If an ANDA is not sufficiently complete to permita substantive review, the applicant will be notified, normally by telephone.The applicant may then withdraw the application, amend the applicationto correct deficiencies, or take no action. FDA may elect to allow a deficiencyto be corrected without a formal withdrawal of the ANDA and resubmission.If the applicant does not correct the deficiency, FDA will not considerthe ANDA ``received.'' If an ANDA is sufficiently complete to permit asubstantive review, the application will be ``received'' and reviewed.(See proposed andSection; 314.101(b).) To clarify its applicability, the agency also proposes to revise the provisionunder andSection; 314.101(e)(1) under which FDA will refuse to file an applicationif the drug product that is the subject of the submission is already coveredby an approved application. The provision is intended to permit FDA torefuse to review spurious applications. For example, persons or firms whoare merely distributors of an already approved drug product do not needan approved application for the products they distribute. Therefore, theagency proposes to revise the provision to read, ``The drug product thatis the subject of the submission is already covered by an approved applicationand the applicant of the submission is merely a distributor and/or a repackagerof the already approved drug product.'' The agency specifically seeks commenton whether there are appropriate exceptions or additions to this provisionthat should be expressly noted in the provision, e.g., for joint developersof a drug product, or distributors who engage in activities beyond thatof a distributor because of a special relationship to the developer ofthe drug product. 2. <T3>Approval of ANDA's. </T3>Section 505(j)(3) of the act requires FDAto approve an ANDA if it finds that none of the statutory grounds for disapprovalof the ANDA apply. The agency proposes to revise andSection; 314.105 to statethis requirement. Under the proposed revision, if FDA finds that none ofthe grounds in the statute for disapproval of an ANDA applies, the agencywould approve the ANDA and send the applicant an approval letter. If onlyminor deficiencies exist in the applicant's draft labeling or if the applicanthas not submitted final printed labeling to FDA and the application isotherwise approvable, FDA will send the applicant an approvable letter.The approvable letter will describe the information or material FDA requiresand state a time period within which the applicant must respond. Unlessthe applicant corrects the deficiencies by amendment or submits final printedlabeling within the specified time period, the agency would formally refuseto approve the application. The agency proposes to revise andSection; 314.110by adding a new paragraph (b) to state when FDA will send the applicantan approvable letter. I. Applications Described by Section 505(b)(2) of the Act Since 1977, FDA has permitted applicants who want to market generic copiesof new drugs first approved after 1962 to file new drug applications thatmeet the ``full reports'' requirement of section 505 of the act with publishedreports in the medical literature establishing the generic drug's safetyand effectiveness. FDA's policy of permitting approval of generic copiesof approved drugs based on literature reports is commonly referred to asthe ``paper NDA policy,'' a complete description of which appears in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> of May 19, 1981 (46 FR 27396). The ``paper NDApolicy'' applied only to duplicate drug products of post-1962 drugs, i.e.,drug products which contained an active ingredient identical to an alreadymarketed drug product first approved for marketing after 1962 in the sameor closely related dosage form, and offered for the same indications asthose of the already marketed drug product. A paper NDA was a new drug application for a duplicate drug product submittedunder section 505(b) of the act that satisfied the statutory criteria fora full application except that the full reports of investigations requiredby section 505(b) of the act to prove safety and effectiveness consistedentirely of references from the medical literature. A paper NDA differedfrom an abbreviated new drug application in that, in an abbreviated application,studies of safety and effectiveness (other than bioavailability) were notrequired to be submitted or identified by the applicant. The 1984 Amendments to the act include provisions applicable to applicationssubmitted under section 505(b)(1) of the act similar to those previouslydenominated paper NDA's. These new provisions, under sections 505(b)( 2)and 505(c)(3 ) (D) of the act, describe an application submitted undersection 505(b)(1) in which the investigations described in clause (A) ofsection 505(b)(1) of the act and relied upon by the applicant for approvalof the application ``were not conducted by or for the applicant and forwhich the applicant has not obtained a right of reference or use from theperson by or for whom the investigations were conducted.'' The requirementin clause (A) to which this provision refers mandates submission of ``** * full reports of investigations which have been made to show whetheror not such drug is safe for use and whether such drug is effective inuse.'' Section 505(b)(2) of the act is significant because newdrug applicationsthat contain full reports of investigations that were not conducted byor for the applicant or for which the applicant has not obtained a rightof reference are subject to the patent certification and exclusivity provisionsof the act. (See part V. sections K. and L.)Despite certain similarities between section 505(b)(2) of the act and the``paper NDA policy,'' the new statutory provision is broader than the paperNDA policy. Although the legislative history of the 1984 Amendments refersto ``paper NDA's'' in discussing the applications described in sections505(b)(2) and 505(c)(3)(D) of the act, the language of these provisionsdoes not limit the applications described to duplicates of already approvedproducts. Instead, sections 505(b)(2) and 505(c)(3)(D) of the act, by theirterms, apply to any application that relies on investigations which theapplicant has not conducted, sponsored, or obtained a right of referenceto, regardless of the similarity or dissimilarity of the drug product toan already approved drug product. The agency therefore proposes, in accordance with the plain language ofthe statute, to interpret sections 505(b)(2) and 505(c)(3)(D) of the actto cover any application in which one or more of the investigations withoutwhich the application could not be approved, as described below, were notconducted or sponsored by the applicant or to which the applicant doesnot have a right of reference. Such applications may be for variationsof approved drug products, or, rarely, for new chemical entities. (An application,however, for a new chemical entity would not be subject to any patent protectionor exclusivity accorded a previously approved drug, because, by definition,there will be no applicable previously approved drug.)Because the 1984 Amendments established a statutory scheme for the approvalof all applications that, before the Amendments, would have been approvedunder the paper NDA policy, the agency believes that the policy is no longernecessary. For this reason, and to avoid confusion caused by the differencesbetween the coverage of the paper NDA policy and the 1984 Amendments, FDAis hereby revoking the policy. FDA proposes to revise andSection; 314.50to delete the term ``paper NDA'' wherever it now appears. The agency does not, however, propose to treat all applications previouslycovered by the paper NDA policy as 505(b)(2) applications. Applicationsfor duplicates of listed drugs eligible for approval under ANDA's willbe treated as submitted under section 505(j) of the act rather than undersection 505(b) of the act, even if such applications are supported by literaturereports of safety and effectiveness. The agency intends to treat any applicationfor a duplicate of a listed drug eligible for approval under an ANDA asan application under section 505(j) of the act because it believes thatCongress intended the ANDA provisions to, among other things, assist theagency in avoiding duplicative reviews of safety and effectiveness informationabout already approved drugs. It would be inconsistent with this purposeto require FDA to review safety and effectiveness information in 505(b)(2)applications when the statute also authorizes an abbreviated review undersection 505(j) of the act. Moreover, because the patent certification andexclusivity provisions apply equally to applications described under section505(b)(2) or 505(j) of the act, an applicant will not be disadvantagedby the review of its application under section 505(j) of the act ratherthan 505(b)(2) of the act. The agency has considered expanding this policy to include applicationsfor drug products that are modified versions of previously approved products,where the types of changes are those for which a section 505(j)(2)(C) petitioncould be approved permitting submission of an ANDA. As described abovein part V. section C., certain types of changes from an approved product,i.e., changes in dosage form, strength, route of administration and activeingredients, can be reviewed in a 505(j) application, if a petition undersection 505(j)(2)(C) of the act is approved permitting the submission ofan ANDA. Currently, an applicant can submit a 505(b)(2) application fora drug product with any of these types of changes rather than request permissionto submit an ANDA through a 505(j)(2)(C) petition. Under an expanded policy,one option would be to treat a 505(b)(2) application for these types ofchanges as a 505(j)(2)(C) petition. Another option would be to return the505(b)(2) application to the applicant and request the submission of a505(j)(2)(C) petition. This expanded policy would also further assist theagency in avoiding reviews of safety and effectiveness information in a505(b)(2) application for drug products for which the statute authorizesan abbreviated review under section 505(j) of the act. The agency specificallyseeks comment on whether FDA should adopt such an expanded policy. Applications described by sections 505(b)(2) and 505(c)(3)(D) of the actmay therefore currently be submitted for: (1) drug products that couldnot be approved under section 505(j) of the act and (2) drug products withchanges from an approved product that could be reviewed in an ANDA submittedpursuant to a 505(j)(2)(C) petition for which the applicant chose to submita 505(b)(2) application rather than a petition. In practice, with respectto the first category of drug products, this means that 505(b)(2) applicationswill generally be submitted for never before approved changes in alreadyapproved drug products, where the change cannot be reviewed under section505(j). As described above in part V. section C., certain types of changesfrom an approved product, in dosage form, strength, route of administrationand active ingredients, can be reviewed in a 505(j) application, as longas investigations are not necessary to evaluate the safety and effectivenessof the changed product. If such investigations are necessary, they canbe reviewed only under the procedures applicable to 505(b) applications.Therefore, a 505(b)(2) application will be appropriately submitted fora drug product where the safety and effectiveness of the change must be,at least in part, established by investigations. Examples of such caseswould be applications seeking approval of significantly different dosageforms or of new uses of already approved drugs. If it is necessary forFDA to review the results of investigations to approve the drug, but theapplicant has not conducted, sponsored, or obtained a right of referenceto one or more of the investigations necessary for approval of the application,the application will be treated as a 505(b)(2) application. In addition to applications supported by literature reports or a combinationof literature reports and new clinical investigations, FDA is proposingto treat as a 505(b)(2) application an application for a change in an alreadyapproved drug supported by a combination of literature or new clinicalinvestigations and the agency's finding that a previously approved drugis safe and effective. (See part V. section J., <T3>infra.</T3>) The agency proposes to interpret the phrase ``right of reference or use''as a right of reference to, or use of, the underlying raw data which providethe basis for the reports of investigations submitted in a 505(b)(2) application.Proposed revised andSection; 314.3(b) incorporates this interpretation asthe definition of the term ``right of reference or use.'' A right of referenceor use must be granted by the owner of the raw data. If the raw data arein the public domain, e.g., because they were developed in a publicly fundedstudy, no express right of reference is necessary. FDA is proposing, underrevised andSection; 314.50(g), to require an applicant that has obtaineda right of reference to, or use of, such raw data, to include in its applicationa written statement signed by the owner of the data that authorizes theapplicant to use, in support of its submission to FDA, the raw data thatprovide the basis for each report of an investigation submitted in itsapplication. Thus, the applicant must be able physically to make availablethe raw data for FDA audit, if necessary, or the data must be availablefor review by FDA in another application to which the applicant has a rightof reference. FDA proposes to interpret the phrase ``investigations described in clause</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(A) * * * and relied upon * * * for approval'' in sections 505(b)(2)and 505(c)(3)(D) of the act to mean any investigations without which theapplication could not be approved. Accordingly, an application is describedby section 505(b)(2) of the act if the applicant has not conducted or sponsoredor obtained a right of reference to every safety or effectiveness investigationwithout which the drug could not be approved. An application that containsone study conducted by the applicant but that relies on literature citationsfor the remainder of the safety and effectiveness data without rights ofreference is thus considered an application described by section 505(b)(2)of the act. In light of this interpretation, an applicant seeking to submit a so-called``full NDA'' and thereby avoid any exclusivity or patent rights attachingto a pioneer drug must conduct or sponsor the adequate and well-controlledinvestigations necessary to establish the effectiveness of the drug, or,if the applicant relies on literature for these studies, must obtain rightsof reference to the data. The applicant must conduct, sponsor, or obtainrights of reference to these studies even if the pioneer applicant reliedon literature citations. Similarly, the applicant must conduct, sponsor,or obtain a right of reference to all the safety tests without which theapplication could not be approved. In general, such tests will includeanimal carcinogenicity and reproduction studies, certain animal toxicitystudies, and some clinical investigations. When a drug product has a U.S.marketing history, an analysis of the spontaneous adverse reaction reportsmay, in some cases, be substituted for some of the safety data described.Appropriate reliance on an analysis of these adverse reaction reports willnot cause the application to be one described by section 505(b)(2) or 505(c)(3)(D)of the act. This interpretation is consistent with Congress' intent to encourage thepharmaceutical industry to develop and seek approval of significant newtherapies by conferring periods of exclusive marketing. If exclusivitycould easily be avoided by an application containing only minimal datagenerated or purchased by the applicant, the incentive created by the availabilityof such exclusivity would decrease considerably. The term ``application'' as defined in andSection; 314.3 means both a fullapplication submitted under section 505(b)(1) of the act that containsfull reports of investigations conducted or sponsored by the applicantor for which the applicant has obtained a right of reference or use andan application submitted under section 505(b)(1) of the act that meetsthe description in section 505(b)(2) of the act, i.e., one or more of theinvestigations without which the application could not be approved reliedon by the applicant for approval of the application were not conductedby or for the applicant and the applicant has not obtained a right of referenceor use from the person by or for whom the investigations were conducted.Applications that meet the description in section 505(b)(2) of the acthave been (under the ``paper NDA policy''), and will continue to be, submittedunder section 505(b)(1) of the act. They are therefore subject to the samestatutory provisions that govern full new drug applications, except, ofcourse, that the applicant has not conducted, sponsored, or obtained aright of reference to one or more of the investigations necessary to demonstratesafety and effectiveness. Thus, for example, 505(b)(2) applications maybe entitled to periods of exclusivity and should submit any relevant informationrequired under proposed andSection; 314.50(j), and any relevant patent informationrequired under andSection; 314.53. A new drug application that meets the statutory description in sections505(b)(2) and 505(c)(3) of the act must satisfy patent certification requirementsand is subject to any exclusivity accorded a relevant previously approveddrug. The patent and exclusivity provisions applicable to 505(b)(2) applicationsare generally the same as those that apply to abbreviated new drug applications.An applicant submitting a section 505(b)(2) application must make the samecertifications with respect to patents as an applicant submitting an ANDA.(See part V section D.1.j., <T3>supra.</T3>) A 505(b)(2) applicant must make certifications with respectto each patent which, in the opinion of the applicant and to the best ofits knowledge, claims the drug or drugs on which investigations that arerelied upon by the applicant for approval of its application were conducted,or which claims a use for such drug or drugs. With respect to a use patent,if the labeling of the applicant's proposed drug product includes an indicationthat, according to the patent information submitted to FDA or in the opinionof the applicant, is claimed by the use patent, the applicant must submitto FDA an appropriate certification under section 505(b)(2)(A) of the act.If,  however, there is a patent on a method of using the drug that wasthe subject of an investigation relies on in the application and the labelingfor the applicant's proposed drug product does not include the indicationsthat are covered by the use patent, the  applicant must submit a statementunder section 505(b)(2)(B) of the act that the method of use patent doesnot claim any of the proposed indications. As with ANDA's, if the applicantcertifies that a patent is invalid or will not be infringed, the applicantis required to give notice to patent owners and holders of approved newdrug applications. Applicants who have licensing agreements with patentowners will also be required to follow the same rules as licensed ANDAapplicants. FDA proposes to revise andSection; 314.50 by adding a new paragraph(i) that would contain the regulations implementing the statutory provisionregarding the certification requirements and to add new andSection; 314.52to describe the notice requirements. As with ANDA's, under proposed revised andSection; 314.80, an applicant ofan approved 505(b)(2) application would comply with the requirements forreporting adverse drug experiences only if the approval is effective underandSection; 314.107. J. Applications for Changes in Approved Drug Products That Require theReview of Investigations As described in part V. section C., <T3>supra</T3>, an applicant may petition for permission to submit an ANDAfor certain changes in the listed drug when the change does not requirethe review of investigations. An applicant may also wish to make a modificationin an approved drug where the modification requires the submission of datathat cannot be reviewed in an ANDA. For example, an applicant may wishto obtain approval of a new indication for a listed drug that is only approvedfor other indications. If the applicant has an approved ANDA for the approvedindications, the applicant may of course submit a supplemental applicationthat contains reports of clinical investigations needed to support approvalof the new indication. (Because such a supplement would require the reviewof clinical data, FDA would process it as a submission under section 505(b)of the act.) An applicant may also wish to seek approval of, for example, a new dosageform of a listed drug that requires the review of investigations but mayhave no interest in marketing the drug in its approved dosage form. The1984 Amendments do not directly address the appropriate mechanism for obtainingapproval of such a change, but permit several alternatives. The statutecould be interpreted to require such an applicant to first obtain approvalof an ANDA for the listed drug's approved dosage form, and then file a505(b) supplement to the approved ANDA containing clinical data to obtainapproval of the new dosage form. If the applicant did not first obtainan ANDA for the approved dosage form, the applicant could be required tosubmit a full new drug application under section 505(b) of the act forthe new dosage form and duplicate the basic safety and effectiveness studiesconducted on the listed drug. FDA has concluded that such an interpretationwould be inconsistent with the legislative purposes of the 1984 Amendmentsbecause it would serve as a disincentive to innovation and could requireneedless duplication of research. FDA believes that a more consistent, less burdensome interpretation ofthe 1984 Amendments is to allow a generic applicant to submit a 505(b)application for a change in an already approved drug that requires thesubmission and review of investigations, without first obtaining approvalof an ANDA for a duplicate of the listed drug. Therefore, under proposedandSection; 314.54, applications will be accepted for changes requiring thereview of investigations, including changes in dosage form, strength, routeof administration, and active ingredients (in a combination product), aswell as new indications. Like similar supplements to approved ANDA's, theseapplications will rely on the approval of the listed drug together withthe data needed to support the change. The applicant will thus be relyingon the approval of the listed drug only to the extent that such reliancewould be allowed under section 505(j) of the act: to establish the safetyand effectiveness of the underlying drug. FDA notes, however, that it willnot accept such an application for a drug that differs from the listeddrug only in that its extent of absorption is significantly less than thatof the listed drug. To allow such a drug to be approved under section 505(b)(2)would thwart Congress' clear intention to require that a duplicate of alisted drug be shown to be bioequivalent to that listed drug. (See section505(j)(3)(F) of the act.) FDA also believes that it would be inconsistent with the policies of the1984 Amendments to allow these applications to rely on the approval ofa listed drug unless they were subject to the listed drug applicant's patentrights and exclusivity. Therefore, an application that relies in part onthe approval of a listed drug, is, for this purpose, considered an applicationdescribed in section 505(b)(2) and must make a certification as to anyrelevant patents that claim the listed drug. In addition, the date of submissionand effective approval of these applications may, under section 505(c)(3),be delayed to give effect to any patent or period of exclusivity accordedthe listed drug. Because these submissions will be reviewed as applications under section505(b) of the act, they will be subject to the statutory and regulatoryrequirements applicable to such applications, including the patent submissionrequirements of sections 505 (b) and (c) of the act, and may be eligiblefor 3 years of exclusivity under sections 505(c)(3)(D) (iii) and (iv) ofthe act. These applications should be directed to the address specifiedin andSection; 314.440(a)(1). The agency proposes to revise andSection; 314.440(a)(1)to so state. K. Delay in the Effective Date of Approval of an ANDA and 505(b)(2) ApplicationBecause of the Existence of a Patent The 1984 Amendments require an important change from previous practicefor ANDA's and those 505(b)(2) applications previously handled as paperNDA's with respect to the effective date of their approval. The effectivedates of approval of ANDA's and 505(b)(2) applications are dependent onthe existence of any patents on the pioneer drug for which the genericapplicant is seeking approval (sections 505(j)(4)(B) and 505(c)(3) of theact) and on any periods of exclusive marketing accorded the reference listeddrug or other listed drug under the so-called ``exclusivity'' provisionsof the act (sections 505(j)(4)(D) and 505(c)(3)(D) of the act). Thus, anANDA or 505(b)(2) application may be approved with a delayed effectivedate, as specified by the agency in its approval letter. No new drug productmay be introduced or delivered for introduction into interstate commerceunder a full or abbreviated new drug application unless the approval ofthe application is effective (section 505(a) of the act). The agency proposesto add new andSection; 314.107 to the regulations to codify the statutoryrequirements with respect to effective dates of approval of ANDA's and505(b)(2) applications.With respect to patent status, proposed andSection; 314.107 provides thatapproval of an ANDA or 505(b)(2) application, if approval is otherwisewarranted, would be made effective in accordance with the following conditions.First, if the applicant certified that there are no relevant patents, orthe holder of the approved application for a drug product covered by arelevant patent did not submit to FDA any patent information, or that therelevant patents submitted to FDA have expired, approval of the ANDA or505(b)(2) application would be made effective immediately. Second, if the applicant certified that any relevant patents would expireon a certain future date, based on information submitted to FDA, approvalof the ANDA or 505(b)(2) application would become effective on that date,unless that date had already passed, in which case the approval would beimmediately effective. Third, if the applicant certified that any relevant patent was invalidor would not be infringed, approval of the ANDA or 505(b)(2) applicationcould be made effective 45 days from the date of the receipt of the noticeof certification by the patent owner or the approved application holderwho is an exclusive patent licensee, unless the patent owner or exclusivepatent licensee filed an action for patent infringement before the 45 dayshave elapsed. As discussed in part V. section D.1.j. above, FDA proposesto require that an applicant who has obtained a patent license to manufacturea generic copy of a patented drug certify under section 505(b)(2)(A)(iv)or 505(j)(2)(A)(vii)(IV) of the act that the relevant patent is invalidor will not be infringed. Although the statute does not expressly addressthe effect of patent licensing agreements on effective dates, FDA doesnot believe that Congress intended to interfere with such agreements betweenpioneer and generic drug manufacturers. See section 505(b)(1) of the act(defining applicable patents as those ``to which a claim of patent infringementwould reasonably be asserted if a person not licensed by the owner engagedin the manufacture, use, or sale of the drug''). Accordingly, FDA proposesto make the approval of an ANDA or 505(b)(2) application effective immediatelywhere the applicant submits (1) information establishing that the proposeddrug is covered by a patent licensing agreement with the patent owner,and (2) a written statement from the patent owner consenting to an immediateeffective date. FDA invites comment on this approach. Even in the absence of a licensing agreement, the patent owner or exclusivepatent licensee may waive its opportunity to file an action for patentinfringement provided it submits a valid waiver to FDA before the 45 dayselapses. Under proposed andSection; 314.107(f)(3), if a patent owner or exclusivepatent licensee does not intend to file action for patent infringementagainst the generic applicant within the 45-day time period and the applicantseeks an effective approval date before the 45-day period has elapsed,the patent owner or exclusive patent licensee must submit to FDA a waiverin the form prescribed in the proposed regulation.1. <T3>The 45-day clock.</T3> Both the PMA and the Generic PharmaceuticalIndustry Association (GPIA) offered FDA suggested regulatory language designedto ensure that the recipient of a notice of patent certification has thefull 45 days in which to decide whether to bring a patent infringementsuit. (PMA and GPIA comments filed under Docket No. 85N-0214.) FDA believesits proposed requirements under andSection; 314.52 for an application submittedunder section 505(b)(2) of the act and andSection; 314.95 for an ANDA undersection 505(j) of the act with respect to documentation of receipt of noticeof certification and the proposed requirements in andSection; 314.107 addressthe concerns of the PMA and GPIA. Under this proposal, the 45-day clockwould begin on the day after the date of receipt by the patent owner orits representative or by the approved application holder if the holderis an exclusive patent licensee of the applicant's notice of certification.Thus, the applicant's return receipt or a letter acknowledging receiptfrom the patent owner or exclusive patent licensee would be deemed to belegal notice of receipt of the applicant's notification by the patent owneror its representative or exclusive patent licensee. Action would then haveto be filed in federal court by the patent owner or exclusive patent licenseebefore the end of the 45th day. In computing the 45 days, Saturdays, Sundays, and Federal holidays areincluded. When, however, the 45th day falls on Saturday, Sunday, or ona Federal holiday, the 45th day would be the next succeeding day that isnot a Saturday, Sunday, or a Federal holiday. FDA intends to strictly applythe 45-day statutory time period. Therefore, unless FDA is notified inwriting by the ANDA or 505(b)(2) applicant before the expiration of the45-day time period or before the completion of the review period, whicheveris later, of the commencement of legal action for patent infringement withinthe 45-day time period, approval of the ANDA or 505(b)(2) application maybe made effective immediately upon expiration of the 45 days or upon completionof the review process, whichever is later. Even if the commencement oflegal action occurs before the ANDA is ready for approval but after the45-day period has elapsed, the agency will approve the ANDA with an immediateeffective date when the application review is complete and satisfactory.Notification by the generic applicant of the filing of a complaint allegingpatent infringement shall include: (1) the ANDA or 505(b)(2) applicationnumber, (2) the ANDA or 505(b)(2) applicant's name, (3) established nameof the drug, if any, strength, and dosage form, and (4) a certificationthat action to defend the patent, identified by number, has been filedin an appropriate court and the date of the filing. An ANDA applicant shallsubmit the notification to FDA's Division of Generic Drugs (HFD-230); a505(b)(2) applicant shall submit the notification to the appropriate divisionin the Center for Drug Evaluation and Research reviewing the application.If an action for patent infringement is filed before the expiration ofthe 45 days, FDA is precluded from making the approval of the ANDA or 505(b)(2)application effective for a period of 30 months while the matter is inlitigation or until a date of a final decision determined by a court, withone exception. The exception is for a patented drug entitled to 5 yearsof marketing exclusivity under section 505(c)(3)(D)(ii) or (j)(4)(D)(ii)of the act, where the patent holder files an action for patent infringementduring the 1-year period beginning 4 years after the date the patenteddrug was approved (and within 45 days of receiving the notice of patentcertification). In this situation, FDA must extend the 30-month periodby that amount of time required for 7\1/2\ years to elapse from the dateof approval of the patented drug. Once the 30 months, or 7\1/2\ years whereapplicable, have expired, the applicant would have an effective approvalof its drug product subject to the outcome of the pending litigation, unlessthe court itself orders otherwise. If before the expiration of the 30-month or 7\1/2\-year period the courtdecides that any relevant patent is invalid or not infringed, approvalof the ANDA or 505(b)(2) application would be made effective on the datethat final judgment is entered by the court. If before the expiration of the 30-month or 7\1/2\-year period the courtdecides that any relevant patent would be infringed, the approval wouldbe made effective on the date the patent expires or on the date the courtorders. If before the expiration of the 30-month or 7\1/2\-year periodthe court grants a preliminary injunction prohibiting an applicant frommanufacture or marketing of its drug product until the court decides theissues of patent validity and infringement and if the court later decidesthat the patent is invalid or not infringed, approval would be made effectiveon the date the court enters final judgment on the merits. For purposes of establishing the proper effective date for an ANDA or 505(b)(2)application approval in the above situations, FDA proposes that the applicantsubmit to the Division of Generic Drugs (HFD-230), within 10 working daysof the entry of any relevant judgment, a copy of the court order. Thereis a potential ambiguity in the statutory language concerning what ``court''decision triggers an effective date. The agency has interpreted that languageas referring to the final decision of that court from which no appeal canbe or has been taken by the affected party. FDA will issue a revised approval letter stating the effective approvaldate. However, an applicant may begin marketing its approved drug producton the date that final judgment is entered by the court or on any othercourt ordered effective date whether or not the applicant has receiveda revised approval letter from FDA. 2. <T3>The 180-day exclusivity period.</T3> Finally, under the proposal andthe statute, if any subsequent ANDA's for the same drug product as thefirst drug product to be involved in a patent infringement action alsocontain a certification of the invalidity or noninfringement of a patent,approval of those subsequent ANDA's would not become effective until 180-daysafter the first commercial marketing of the drug product under the firstANDA, or until 180 days after the court has determined that the patentsin dispute are invalid or not infringed, whichever is earlier. (See section505(j)(4)(B)(iv) of the act.) This provision does not apply to 505(b)(2)applications. FDA has concluded that the 180-day delay of subsequent ANDA's is availableonly to a previous applicant who has been sued for patent infringementfollowing its notification to the patent owner of the filing of a certificationof invalidity and noninfringement. Although section 505(j)(4)(B)(iv) ofthe act can be interpreted in several ways, FDA believes that the structureof the provision reflects Congress' intention to provide to the first genericapplicant who spends its resources to litigate the scope or validity ofa patent a 180-day period free from generic competition. The formula provided by section 505(j)(4)(B)(iv) of the act for calculatingthe date from which the 180-day period runs, and particularly the referenceto ``first commercial marketing,'' can be applied logically and consistentlywith the statutory scheme only if Congress intended the provision to applyonly when the first ANDA applicant was actually sued for patent infringement.Every other exclusivity provision in the 1984 Amendments begins with dateof approval of the application. Congress' decision to begin the 180-dayperiod under section 505(j)(4)(B)(iv)(I) of the act from ``the first commercialmarketing of the drug,'' rather than from the effective date of the ANDA,serves a rational policy only if Congress contemplated a situation in whichan approval of an ANDA is in effect but the applicant's decision not tomarket the drug deserves to be protected because a delay in marketing servesthe public interest. Such a situation occurs where, under the terms of section 505(j)(4)(B)(iii)of the act, an ANDA goes into effect 30 months after a lawsuit is filed,but the lawsuit is still pending. It serves the public interest to permita prudent ANDA holder in that situation to stay off the market until thelitigation is resolved, thereby minimizing potential damages.As drafted, sections 505(j)(4)(B)(iv)(I) and (II) of the act carefullyavoid providing an incentive for immediate marketing: the 180-day rewardof exclusive marketing begins when the applicant wins the lawsuit or whenthe applicant actually begins marketing, ``whichever is earlier.'' Theapplicant thus does not lose any of the 180-day period by electing to stayoff the market until the lawsuit is over. If, on the other hand, section 505(j)(4)(B)(iv) of the act is interpretedto apply even if the first applicant has not been sued, dating the 180-dayperiod from ``first commercial marketing'' rather than from the effectivedate of the ANDA approval serves no purpose. Indeed, it might provide acounterproductive incentive to the first ANDA applicant to delay marketingso as to prolong the period during which other ANDA's may not be marketed.In contrast to the delay occasioned by a prudent plaintiff in a lawsuit,this delay serves no public interest. To remove this unproductive incentivefor delay, the agency would therefore consider it necessary to read intosection 505(j)(4)(B)(iv)(I) of the act various additional requirementsand presumptions. Section 505(j)(4)(B)(iv) can thus be applied straightforwardly only whenan applicant who seeks the 180-day period of exclusive marketing has beeninvolved in a patent infringement lawsuit. To apply the section where therehas been no lawsuit, requires either that the agency ignore the plain languageof the section, essentially reading out the phrase ``first commercial marketing,''or that the agency assume, contrary to the goals of the 1984 Amendments,that Congress intended to create an incentive for delay in competition,without any countervailing benefit to society. Moreover, the policy embodiedin the provision, of rewarding the applicant who devotes the considerabletime and money necessary for patent litigation, is not served by providing180 days of exclusive marketing to an applicant who avoids a lawsuit. Accordingly,proposed andSection; 314.107(c) applies only when the first applicant hasbeen sued.\1\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Note; Subsequent to the Commissioner's signing of thisdocument, a Federal district court reached a contrary conclusion. See Inwoodv. Young, No. 89-0845 (D.D.C. May 12, 1989). An appeal from that decisionis under consideration.FDA has also concluded that the 180-day period of exclusivity delays approvalof all generic copies of the same listed drug whose applications containparagraph IV certifications. It has been suggested that where a formulationor composition patent is the subject of certification and lawsuit, theexclusivity granted under section 505(j)(4)(B)(iv) should delay the effectiveapproval only of subsequent applications that raise claims of noninfringementidentical or similar to those raised by the holder of the exclusivity.The legislative history of section 505(j)(4)(B)(iv) is silent as to thepurpose of the provision and does not limit its applicability to subsequentapplicants that receive a benefit from the first applicant's finding ofnoninfringement. The 180-day period can be interpreted as a reward notonly for the benefit provided to subsequent ANDA applicants but for thebenefit to the public of removing an obstacle to competition. Moreover,FDA lacks the expertise in patent law that would allow it to determinewhether a subsequent applicant raised issues of noninfringement in commonwith the previous applicant. Therefore, the 180-day period is availableto the applicant who resolves an issue of patent coverage, regardless ofthe judgment's applicability to subsequent ANDA applicants. 3. <T3>Other provisions. </T3>FDA proposes to implement other aspects of section505(j)(4)(B)(iv) of the act as follows:a. <T3>Date of submission. </T3>The date of submission of a prior applicationthat contained a certification of invalidity or noninfringement will beconsidered the date on which the applicant submitted a substantially completeANDA. In most cases, to be ``substantially complete,'' an ANDA must containdata from any required bioavailability or bioequivalence studies. A requiredbioequivalence study is one that meets any FDA guidance document or isotherwise reasonable in design and purports to show that the drug productfor which the applicant seeks exclusivity is bioequivalent to the listeddrug. Neither a protocol nor a pilot study will satisfy these requirements.(An ANDA may be substantially complete without such studies only if suchstudies are not required to establish bioequivalence, i.e., where bioequivalencecan be established through other information and the applicant has requesteda waiver of the study requirements.) Although the provision could be readto permit the mere submission of the first certification of invalidityor noninfringement to delay the effective date of subsequent ANDA's, regardlessof the completeness of the application, the legislative history of the1984 Amendments makes clear that such an interpretation would be inconsistentwith the purposes of the patent certification and notification scheme.The purpose of section 505(j)(4)(B)(iv) of the act is to reward the firstapplicant to test the scope or validity of a patent by litigating an actionfor patent infringement. However, it is only the giving of notice to thepatent owner under section 505(j)(2)(B)(ii) of the act, and not the filingof a certification of invalidity or noninfringement with FDA, that caninitiate a lawsuit. The notice required by section 505(j)(2)(B)(ii) ofthe act must state that the applicant has submitted an ANDA ``which containsdata from bioavailability or bioequivalence studies.'' (Section 505(j)(2)(B)(ii)of the act.) The purpose of requiring a statement that the ANDA containsdata from bioavailability or bioequivalence studies is to prevent applicantsfrom testing an innovator's patent through the filing of ``sham ANDA'sor ANDA's that are substantially incomplete.'' H. Rept. 98 857, Part I,98th Cong., 2d Sess. 24-5 (1984).FDA believes that to fulfill the purposes of the patent provisions of thestatute, the date of submission of a previous application under section505(j)(4)(B)(iv) of the act must therefore be the date on which the previousapplicant submitted a substantially complete ANDA, and thus was in a positionto notify the patent owner. As described in part V section E., supra, anANDA that contains a certification of invalidity or noninfringement willnot be accepted for review unless it contains the results of any requiredbioequivalence studies. b. <T3>Delay when first application is not yet approved. </T3>If the firstANDA applicant for a listed drug is sued for patent infringement and asubsequent ANDA for the drug is submitted before the first ANDA is approved,FDA will delay the effective date of approval of the subsequent ANDA onlyas long as the agency remains satisfied that the first applicant is activelypursuing approval of its ANDA.c. ``<T3>First commercial marketing</T3>.'' ``First commercial marketing'' isdefined as the first date of introduction or delivery for introductioninto interstate commerce outside the control of the manufacturer, exceptfor investigational use under 21 CFR Part 312, but does not include transferof a drug product for reasons other than sale within the control of themanufacturer or application holder. d. ``<T3>Court decision</T3>.'' Section 314.107(c)(1)(ii) specifies as one ofthe two dates from which the 180 days runs ``the date of a decision ofthe court holding the patent invalid or not infringed.'' This date willbe the date of a final decision of a court from which no appeal can orhas been taken, or the date of a settlement order or consent decree signedby a Federal judge, which enters final judgment and includes a findingthat the patent is invalid or not infringed. A final adjudication on themerits is not required to trigger the 180-day period. e. <T3>Amended certification after finding of infringement. </T3>If a finaljudgment is entered in an action for patent infringement finding the patentto be infringed by a drug product that is the subject of an abbreviatednew drug application, and the application contains a paragraph IV certification,the applicant should submit an amended certification, certifying underandSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>3</T3>) that the patent will expire on a specific date. The new certificationshould be submitted either as an amendment to a pending application oras a letter if the application is approved. Once the amendment or letterhas been submitted, the application will no longer be considered to beone containing a paragraph IV certification. f. <T3>Amended certification after removal of a patent from the list. </T3>If,after one or more applicants have made paragraph IV certifications on apatent, that patent is removed from the list for any reason other thanbecause that patent has been declared invalid in a lawsuit brought by thatpatent owner within 45 days of receiving notice under andSection; 314.95any applicant with a pending application or delayed effective date whohas made such a certification should submit an amended patent certification,certifying under andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(ii) if applicable, that no relevantpatents claim the drug. If other relevant patents still claim the drug,the applicant should instead submit a request to withdraw the paragraphIV certification. Once the amendment or letter has been submitted, theapplication will no longer be considered to be an application containinga paragraph IV certification.L. Exclusivity 1. <T3>Exclusivity for certain approved drug products. </T3>Sections 505(j)(4)(D)and 505(c)(3)(D) of the act partially protect certain listed drugs, orcertain changes in listed drugs, from competition in the marketplace forspecified periods by placing a moratorium on the submission of, or by delayingthe effective date of approval of, ANDA's and 505(b)(2) applications forthose listed drug products. (The exclusivity provisions of the act do notprovide any protection from the marketing of a generic version of the samedrug product if the generic version is the subject of a full new drug applicationsubmitted under section 505(b)(1) of the act.) These periods of exclusivemarketing are independent of any marketing exclusivity accorded an orphandrug pursuant to section 527 of the act and of any protection a listeddrug may have as a result of a patent. Proposed andSection; 314.108 implementsthe exclusivity provisions of sections 505(j)(4)(D) and 505(c)(3)(D) ofthe act. The holder of a new drug application or supplemental new drugapplication submitted under section 505(b) of the act that was approvedon or after January 1, 1982, may be entitled to a period of exclusive marketing(hereinafter referred to as ``exclusivity'') for the drug product subjectto the approved application or supplemental application. Briefly, the exclusivity provisions provide the following protection. Sections505(c)(3)(D)(i) and 505(j)(4)(D)(i) grant a 10-year period of exclusivityto new chemical entities approved during a specified ``window period'':January 1, 1982, to September 24, 1984, the date of enactment of the 1984Amendments. Sections 505(c)(3)(D)(ii) and 505(j)(4)(D)(ii) of the act granta 5-year period of exclusivity to new chemical entities approved afterSeptember 24, 1984. Sections 505(c)(3)(D)(v) and 505(j)(4)(D)(v) of theact grant a 2-year period of exclusivity for non-new chemical entities,or for certain changes made to already approved products, approved duringthe ``window period.'' (This 2-year period expired on September 24, 1986.)There is no requirement that an applicant have conducted clinical investigationsto qualify a drug for exclusivity under the above three provisions. Onthe other hand, the remaining two exclusivity provisions, sections 505(c)(3)(D)(iii)and (iv) and 505(j)(4)(D)(iii) and (iv) of the act, which grant a 3-yearperiod of exclusivity, specifically require that the applicant have ``conductedor sponsored new clinical investigations essential to the approval'' ofthe application, or the supplement.With the exception of the 2-year exclusivity provision for non-new chemicalentities or changes approved between January 1, 1982, and September 24,1984 (sections 505(j)(4)(D)(v) and 505(c)(3)(D)(v) of the act), the exclusivityprovisions are limited to new chemical entities, which by definition areinnovative, and to those significant changes in already approved drug products,such as a new use, which require new clinical studies. Congress understoodthat the substantial economic rewards of exclusivity might well encouragedrug companies to make minor and unimportant alterations in their marketeddrug products or to conduct additional tests which they could claim provideimportant new information about a marketed drug product. To avoid rewardingsuch behavior, the 3-year provision includes the special criteria intendedto restrict eligibility to significant innovations. See Cong. Rec. H9114,9124 (daily  edition September 6, 1984) (statement of Representative Waxman);Cong. Rec. S10505 (daily edition August 10, 1984) (statement of SenatorHatch). The exclusivity provisions of section 505(j)(4)(D) of the act operate toprohibit the submission or delay the effective date of approval of (1)an ANDA submitted under section 505(j) of the act for a duplicate of alisted drug that is entitled to exclusivity and (2) an ANDA submitted undersection 505(j) of the act pursuant to an approved petition under section505(j)(2)(C) of the act for a drug product that is similar to a listeddrug that is entitled to exclusivity. The exclusivity provisions of section505(c)(3)(D) of the act affect applications described under section 505(b)(2)of the act and are essentially the same as those for abbreviated new drugapplications. The legislative history of the 1984 Amendments makes clearthat Congress intended the exclusivity provisions of section 505(c)(3)(D)of the act to delay submission or approval of applications described bysection 505(b)(2) of the act to the same extent that section 505(j)(4)(D)of the act delays submission or approval of ANDA's. Section 505(c)(3)(D)of the act, however, unlike section 505(j)(4)(D) of the act, could be interpretedto apply only to those 505(b)(2) applications that are required to submita patent certification. (See section 505(c)(3) of the act.) Under thisinterpretation, applications described by section 505(b)(2) of the actthat were not required  to submit a patent certification because, for example,the pioneer drug was unpatentable, would be exempt from the exclusivityprovisions of section 505(c)(3)(D) of the act. The agency does not believe that this interpretation is reasonable andintends to apply section 505(c)(3)(D) of the act to all 505(b)(2) applications.Although section 505(c)(3) of the act states that the delayed effectivedates specified in section 505(c)(3)(A) through (D) apply to ``an applicationfiled under subsection (b) which contains a certification required by paragraph(2) of such subsection,'' patent certification is relevant only to section505(c)(3)(A) through (C) of the act. These paragraphs delay an application'seffective date on the basis of the patent status of the pioneer drug. Section505(c)(3)(D) of the act, however, delays an effective date on the basisof exclusivity, which is entirely independent of the patent status of thepioneer drug. Indeed, in the floor debates preceding enactment of the 1984Amendments, Congressman Waxman specifically stated that one of the purposesserved by the exclusivity provisions was to supply needed incentives todevelop new drugs where little or no patent life remains. Cong. Rec. H9113(daily edition, September 6, 1984). It would thus be illogical and inconsistentwith Congressional intent to apply the exclusivity provisions only to those505(b)(2) applications required to make a patent certification.Exclusivity provides the holder of an approved new drug application limitedprotection from new competition in the marketplace for the innovation representedby its approved drug product. Thus, if the innovation relates to a newactive moiety or ingredient, then exclusivity protects the pioneer drugproduct from other competition from products containing that moiety oringredient. If the innovation is a new dosage form or route of administration,then exclusivity protects only that aspect of the drug product, but notthe active ingredients. If the innovation is a new use, then exclusivityprotects only that labeling claim and not the active ingredients, dosageform, or route of administration.The language of sections 505(c)(3)(D) and 505(j)(4)(D) of the act is ambiguousas to which ANDA's or 505(b)(2) applications are affected by an innovator'sexclusivity. The statutory language allows at least two interpretations.The narrower interpretation of the protection offered by exclusivity isthat exclusivity covers only specific drug products and therefore protectsfrom generic competition only the first approved version of a drug, orchange in a drug. Under this interpretation, an innovator's exclusivitycould lose its value as soon as FDA approved a second full new drug applicationfor a version of the drug, because an ANDA could be approved by referenceto the second approved version of the drug, which would not be coveredby exclusivity.The broader interpretation of the coverage of exclusivity is that it coversthe active moieties in new chemical entities or changes in non-new chemicalentities rather than covering only specific drug products. Thus exclusivitywould protect the new active moiety of a new chemical entity or the innovativechange in a non-new chemical entity from generic competition even afterFDA had approved subsequent full new drug applications for subsequent versionsof the drug. Under this theory, an ANDA or 505(b)(2) application for adrug with the same active moiety as the innovator's new chemical entityor as the innovator's change in a non-new chemical entity could not beapproved until the innovator's exclusivity expired, even if the ANDA or505(b)(2) application relied on another approved version of the innovator'sdrug.The language of the five exclusivity provisions (similarly worded in bothsections 505(c)(3)(D) and 505(j)(4)(D) of the act) is inconsistent on thisissue, tending to support the narrower interpretation of the coverage ofexclusivity for new chemical entities (sections 505(c)(3)(D) (i) and (ii)and 505(j)(4)(D) (i) and (ii) of the act and for drugs approved betweenJanuary 1, 1982, and September 24, 1984 (sections 505(c)(3)(D)(v) and 505(j)(4)(D)(v)of the act), and the broader interpretation for innovative changes in alreadyapproved drugs (sections 505(c)(3)(D) (iii) and (iv) and 505(j)(4)(D) (iii)and (iv) of the act). Sections 505(c)(3)(D) (i), (ii), and (v) and 505(j)(4)(D)(i), (ii), and (v) of the act confer exclusivity by prohibiting submissionor delaying approval of ANDA's or 505(b)(2) applications that ``refer tothe drug for which the [first approved] subsection (b) application wassubmitted.'' Depending upon the meaning of the phrase ``refer to'' andthe word ``drug,'' these provisions could be interpreted to allow ANDA'sand 505(b)(2) applicants, once FDA approved subsequent new drug applicationsfor different versions of the same drug, to circumvent the innovator'sexclusivity by ``referring to'' the subsequent versions of the innovator'sdrug.On the other hand, the two provisions that confer exclusivity on changesin already approved drugs delay the effective date of approval of all ANDA'sor 505(b)(2) applications that have the same ``conditions of approval''as the innovator's drug, without regard to whether the ANDA ``refers to''the innovator's drug product or to another version of the same productfor which a subsequent new drug application was approved.FDA does not believe that Congress intended the exclusivity provisionsto operate inconsistently, or that Congress intended the protection offeredby the exclusivity for changes in approved drugs to be broader than theprotection offered by exclusivity for new chemical entities. FDA thereforeproposes to adopt a uniform interpretation of the scope of exclusivity.In addition, FDA has concluded that adopting the narrower interpretationof the scope of exclusivity for all types of exclusivity would seriouslyundermine its value, reducing the incentives for research and innovationin the pharmaceutical industry.For example, if FDA adopted the narrower interpretation that exclusivitycovers only a specific drug product and does not prevent ANDA's from copyingsubsequent versions of the innovative product, a manufacturer of a newchemical entity (entitled to 5 years of exclusivity), could not make improvementsin the drug, e.g., by making a new dosage form of the drug, without destroyingthe value of its exclusivity. Approval of a new dosage form, and certainother changes in approved drugs, require the submission of a new drug application;once approved, the new dosage form would become a new drug product thatan ANDA application could copy, without being subject to the exclusivitycovering the original drug product.For the same reasons, an innovator whose drug was entitled to exclusivitycould not license another company to make a copy of the pioneer drug withoutlosing the value of its exclusivity. Under the narrow theory of exclusivity,once the licensed company's product was approved, ANDA applicants couldcopy the licensed product, without regard to the innovator's exclusivity.The agency does not believe that Congress intended the exclusivity provisionsto discourage innovators from making improvements in their drug productsnor from authorizing the marketing of competitive products. Accordingly,FDA has concluded that the broader interpretation of the scope of exclusivityshould be applied to all types of exclusivity conferred by sections 505(c)(3)(D)and 505(j)(4)(D) of the act.Therefore, when exclusivity attaches to an active moiety or to an innovativechange in an already approved drug, the submission or effective date ofapproval of ANDA's and 505(b)(2) applications for a drug with that activemoiety or innovative change will be delayed until the innovator's exclusivityhas expired, whether or not FDA has approved subsequent versions of thedrugs entitled to exclusivity, and regardless of the specific listed drugproduct to which the ANDA or 505(b)(2) application refers.Proposed new andSection; 314.108 implements the exclusivity provisions withrespect to both ANDA's and 505(b)(2) applications.a. <T3>Definitions.</T3> To understand how the agency intends to administerthe exclusivity provisions of the act, it is necessary to define a numberof terms that are used in those provisions. Some of those definitions havealready been discussed; others are as follows:i. <T3>New chemical entity.</T3> ``New chemical entity'' means a drug thatcontains no active moiety that has been approved by the Food and Drug Administrationin any other application submitted under section 505(b) of the act. Thus,FDA interprets the statutory requirement that a drug (new chemical entity)contain ``no [previously approved] active ingredient (including any esteror salt of the active ingredient)'' to mean that the drug must not containany previously approved active moiety. FDA bases this interpretation onthe statutory language and on the definition of a ``new molecular entity''or ``Type 1'' drug in FDA's IND/NDA classification scheme (which is usedto classify new drugs by chemical type and therapeutic significance), whichwas in effect at the time the 1984 Amendments were under considerationin Congress. FDA's longstanding interpretation of the term ``new molecularentity'' is that it is a compound containing an entirely new active moiety.FDA's interpretation of the scope of the 5-year exclusivity provision isalso consistent with the legislative history, which reveals that Congresswas aware of FDA's classification scheme and did not intend to confer significantperiods of exclusivity on minor variations of previously approved chemicalcompounds. (See, e.g., Cong. Rec. H9124 (September 6, 1984) (statementof Representative Waxman); H. Rept. 857, Part I, 98th Cong., 2d Sess. 38(1984).)ii. <T3>Active moiety.</T3> The ``active moiety'' in a drug is the moleculeor ion, excluding those appended portions of the molecule that cause thedrug to be an ester, salt (including a salt with hydrogen or coordinationbonds) or other noncovalent derivative (such as a complex, chelate, orclathrate) of the molecule, responsible for the physiological or pharmacologicalaction of the drug substance. A drug product will thus not be considereda ``new chemical entity'' entitled to 5 years of exclusivity if it containsa previously approved active moiety, even if the particular ester or salt(including a salt with hydrogen or coordination bonds) or other noncovalentderivative has not been previously approved. A compound (other than anester) that requires metabolic conversion to produce an already approvedactive moiety is considered a ``new molecular entity,'' however, and willbe considered a new chemical entity entitled to 5 years of exclusivity.FDA will consider whether a drug contains a previously approved activemoiety on a case-by-case basis. FDA notes that a single enantiomer of apreviously approved racemate contains a previously approved active moietyand is therefore not considered a new chemical entity.iii. <T3>Date of approval.</T3> An issue has arisen as to how the date of approvalof a new drug application is determined. This issue is particularly importantwhen an applicant is claiming that its new drug application was approvedbetween January 1, 1982, and September 24, 1984, referred to in sections505(c)(3)(D) (i) and (v) and 505(j)(4)(D) (i) and (v) of the act of theexclusivity provisions. The ``date of approval'' of the application asused in these provisions means the date on the approval letter sent byFDA to the applicant. A requirement in the approval letter for submission(but not for approval) of final printed labeling or other material thatmight delay the actual initiation of marketing of the product is not relevantto a determination of the date of approval, so long as the product couldbe legally marketed. Two cases have addressed FDA's interpretation of ``dateof approval.'' <T3>Mead Johnson Pharmaceutical Group</T3> v. <T3>Bowen,</T3> 838 F.2d 1332 (D.C. Cir. 1988), and <T3>Norwich Eaton Pharmaceuticals, Inc.</T3> v. <T3>Bowen,</T3> 808 F.2d 486 (6th Cir.), <T3>cert. denied</T3>, 108 S. Ct. 68 (1987). In these cases, two separatedrug manufacturers challenged FDA's determinations that their productswere not entitled to 10 years of exclusivity under sections 505(c)(3)(D)(i)and 505(j)(4)(D)(i) of the act, which grant such exclusivity to certainproducts approved between January 1, 1982, and September 24, 1984. FDA'sdeterminations were based on its position that the two drugs were approvedon the date the approval letters were issued, in both cases prior to January1, 1982. The plaintiffs argued that the date of approval did not occuruntil the firms submitted final printed labeling. In both cases, the courtsupheld FDA's position that the date an approval letter issues is the dateof approval of a new drug application.b. <T3>Periods of exclusivity. </T3>Drug products that are the subject ofthe following types of applications are eligible for specified periodsof exclusivity.i. Sections 505(c)(3)(D)(i) and 505(j)(4)(D)(i) of the act provide exclusivityfor a drug product containing a new chemical entity that is the subjectof a new drug application submitted under section 505(b) of the act andapproved during the period beginning January 1, 1982, and ending on September24, 1984. The approval of an ANDA or 505(b)(2) application for a drug productthat contains the same active moiety as the listed drug may not becomeeffective for 10 years after the date of approval of the listed drug entitledto exclusivity. Thus, a drug product covered by an ANDA or a 505(b)(2)application would be subject to a listed drug's 10-year exclusivity ifit contains the active moiety in the listed drug.A drug product is entitled to 10 years of exclusivity only if it does notcontain an active moiety that has been part of a drug product previouslyapproved under section 505(b) of the act either as a single ingredientor as one ingredient of a combination drug product. An application is one``approved under section 505(b)'' if it was submitted under section 505(b)of the act and approved after the passage of the 1962 Amendments to theact or was ``deemed approved'' under section 107(c)(2) of the 1962 Amendments.Because the exclusivity conferred by this provision covers the active moietyof a drug, the exclusivity also protects a different ester or salt or othernoncovalent derivative, or a different dosage form, strength, route ofadministration, or condition of use approved in a subsequent applicationor supplemental application for a drug product containing the same activemoiety. Any modification in dosage form, strength, route of administration,or indication of a new chemical entity entitled to 10 years of exclusivitywill be protected for the period of exclusivity remaining on the originalapplication. Different salts, esters, or other changes that do not resultin a change in active moiety are also protected. Significant changes tothe drug product that occur after or toward the end of the initial 10 yearsof exclusivity and that independently qualify for exclusivity, e.g., anew use requiring new clinical investigations for approval (see discussionunder provision d. below) may result in an additional period of exclusivity,but only for the change.ii. Sections 505(c)(3)(D)(ii) and 505(j)(4)(D)(ii) of the act provide exclusivityfor a drug product containing a new chemical entity that is the subjectof a new drug application submitted under section 505(b) of the act andapproved after September 24, 1984. No ANDA or 505(b)(2) application fora drug product that contains an active moiety in the listed drug may besubmitted to FDA before the expiration of 5 years after the date of approvalof the application for the listed drug entitled to exclusivity, exceptthat an application challenging a patent that claims the listed drug maybe submitted 4 years after approval of the listed drug. In the latter case,because this exclusivity provision blocks only submission of the ANDA or505(b)(2) application, approval of the ANDA or 505(b)(2) application properlysubmitted after 4 years is not delayed by this provision, unless the patentowner initiates a lawsuit for patent infringement. Where litigation isinitiated, the ANDA or 505(b)(2) application may not be made effectiveby FDA for a total of 7\1/2\ years after the approval of the referencelisted drug, unless the court holds the patent invalid or not infringedat an earlier date. (See discussion under part V. section K.)As with sections 505(b)(3)(D)(i) and 505(j)(4)(D)(i) of the act, the agencyinterprets the exclusivity provided by this provision to cover any subsequentapproval of an application or supplemental application for a differentester, salt, or other noncovalent derivative, or a different dosage form,strength, route of administration, or new use of a drug product with thesame active moiety. Any modification to the product will be protected forthe period of exclusivity remaining on the original application, unlessthe change occurs after or toward the end of the initial 5 years of exclusivityand independently qualifies for exclusivity under another exclusivity provision.(See discussion under provision b.i. above.)iii. Sections 505(c)(3)(D)(iii) and 505(j)(4)(D)(iii) of the act provideexclusivity for a drug product that does not contain a new chemical entity,is the subject of a new drug application submitted under section 505(b)of the act and approved after September 24, 1984, and which contains reportsof new clinical investigations (other than bioavailability studies) essentialto the approval of the application and conducted or sponsored by the applicant.For example, a drug product containing a previously approved active ingredientmay be approved for a new indication, dosage form, strength, or route ofadministration for which clinical studies are essential to approval. Exclusivitywould be provided only if the clinical studies were ``new,'' ``essentialto approval,'' and ``conducted or sponsored by the applicant.'' If theserequirements are met, approval of an ANDA or of a 505(b)(2) applicationfor a duplicate drug product or an ANDA submitted pursuant to an approvedpetition under section 505(j)(2)(C) for a similar drug product that relieson the information supporting the new conditions of approval of the first-approvedapplication, may not be made effective before the expiration of 3 yearsfrom the date of approval of the original new drug application.iv. Sections 505(c)(3)(D)(iv) and 505(j)(4)(D)(iv) of the act provide exclusivityfor a drug product that is the subject of a supplement to an approved applicationunder section 505(b) approved after September 24, 1984, that contains reportsof new clinical investigations (other than bioavailability studies) essentialto the approval of the supplement and conducted or sponsored by the applicant.Approval of an ANDA submitted under section 505(j) of the act for a duplicateof, or submitted under section 505(j) of the act pursuant to an approvedpetition under section 505(j)(2)(C) of the act for a similar drug productthat relies on the information supporting the new conditions of approvalof a listed drug that is entitled to exclusivity or a 505(b)(2) applicationfor a change approved in the supplemental application may not become effectivefor 3 years from the date of approval of the supplemental application.Under this provision, only the change approved in the supplemental applicationwould be granted exclusivity and that exclusivity would be provided onlyif ``new clinical investigations'' were ``essential to approval'' of thechange and the investigations were ``conducted or sponsored by the applicant.''The three requirements for exclusivity under this provision are identicalto those of the third provision described above. FDA expects that only those changes in an approved drug product that affectits active ingredient(s), strength, dosage form, route of administrationor conditions of use would be granted exclusivity. These are the typesof changes in a drug product that require prior approval by FDA beforethe change may be made (21 CFR 314.70). To qualify for exclusivity under section 505(j)(4)(D) (iii) and (iv) ofthe act or section 505(c)(3)(D) (iii) and (iv) of the act, an applicationor supplemental application proposing a change to an already approved drugproduct must contain ``reports of new clinical investigations (other thanbioavailability studies) essential to the approval of the application andconducted or sponsored by the applicant.'' All three of these criteriamust be satisfied in order to qualify a drug product or change in a drugproduct for the exclusivity provided by these sections of the act. Congress intended the term ``clinical'' to mean human studies, and intentionallyexcluded all animal studies, regardless of the purpose for which they areconducted. In <T3>Zenith Laboratories, Inc. </T3>v. <T3>Heckler, </T3>No. 85-3646 (D.N.J. May 19, 1986), Zenith Laboratorieschallenged the agency's interpretation of the term ``clinical,'' arguingthat clinical testing also includes animal testing. The court granted thegovernment's motion for summary judgment, holding that FDA's interpretationwas reasonable. Further, Congress specifically excluded ``bioavailability studies,'' whichalso may be clinical studies, to limit eligibility for exclusivity to changesin a drug product that are significant enough to require human safety oreffectiveness studies for approval. The proposed regulations would, therefore,for purposes of exclusivity, define ``clinical investigation'' to meanany experiment, other than a bioavailability study, in which a drug isadministered or dispensed to, or used on, human subjects. The agency believesthat most studies qualifying for exclusivity will be efficacy studies.There may, however, be occasional clinical investigations qualifying forexclusivity that establish that a product is safer than originally thoughtand that permit broader use of the drug. Studies that establish new riskswill not be eligible for exclusivity because protection of the public healthdemands that all products' labeling contain all relevant warnings. The legislative history makes clear that Congress intended to reward with3 years of exclusivity only those investigations that require a considerableinvestment of time and money, see Cong. Rec. S10505 (daily edition August10, 1984) (statement of Senator Hatch), and that are necessary for approvalof important innovations requiring substantial study, such as significantnew therapeutic uses, see Cong. Rec. H 9114, 9124 (daily edition September6, 1984) (statements of Representative Waxman). The 3-year exclusivityprovision, therefore, could be interpreted to confer exclusivity only forinnovations requiring adequate and well-controlled trials in human subjectsthat meet the substantial evidence requirement for approval. Further, becausethe statutory language of this provision uses the term ``clinical investigations''(plural) the provision could be interpreted to mean that more than onewell-controlled trial is needed to support approval of the applicant'sproposed change. The agency's interpretation of this exclusivity provision,however, is ordinarily to require only one clinical study and that it beof the type necessary to support approval of the proposed change. The clinical investigations must be ``new.'' Under this proposal, the agencywould consider a clinical investigation ``new'' if the data from such astudy (1) have not been relied on by the Food and Drug Administration todemonstrate substantial evidence of effectiveness of a previously approveddrug for any indication or of safety for a new patient population and (2)do not duplicate the results of another investigation that was relied onby the agency to demonstrate the effectiveness or safety in a new patentpopulation of a previously approved drug product. In this context, ``new''is intended to convey lack of prior use of this particular study or anothersimilar study in successfully supporting the approval of the effectivenessof a drug product rather than any temporal requirement. The agency doesnot believe Congress intended to preclude use of data from a previouslyconducted study if such data provide important new information in supportof the applicant's proposed change to its drug product. The agency wouldstill consider to be ``new'' data from a clinical investigation previouslysubmitted in a new drug application for use only in a comprehensive evaluationof the safety of a drug product but not to support the effectiveness ofthe drug product or safety in a specific new patient population. Second, the studies referred to must also have been ``conducted or sponsoredby the applicant.'' PMA and GPIA submitted their views on this issue tothe agency prior to publication of this proposal. (See Docket No. 85N-0214.)The PMA interpretation of ``sponsored'' would have that term apply wheneverthe applicant had provided financial, technical, or in kind support tothe scientific studies, whether or not that support was the major fundingof the investigations and whether or not it was received in advance ofthe performance of the investigations. GPIA disagreed, pointing out thatthe exclusivity provisions were intended to reward those who make a substantialinvestment and take the risk associated with clinical testing of a newdrug or a new indication for a drug. The Food and Drug Administration agrees that Congress intended these exclusivityprovisions to reward only those who have made a substantial investmentin new clinical studies. The underlying basis of exclusivity should, underthe agency's policy, be transferable upon transfer of ownership of a companyor rights to a drug. By making the product of the research more valuable,the agency believes this policy will foster and reward innovation and researchto the full extent intended by Congress. However, the agency concludesthat Congress did not intend that applicants qualify for exclusivity bysimply collecting and submitting to FDA information from the literature,or buying the results of tests already done and submitting them to FDA.(See letter to Dr. Frank Young from Congressman Henry Waxman, August 5,1985, on file in Docket No. 85N-0214.) Therefore, in this proposal, the agency would consider an investigation``conducted or sponsored'' by the applicant if, before or during the conductof the investigation (1) the applicant was the sponsor of the IND underwhich the investigation was conducted, i.e., named as the sponsor of theIND in Form FDA-1571 filed with the agency, or (2) the applicant (or theapplicant's predecessor in interest) provided substantial financial supportfor the study (see proposed andSection; 314.108). For this purpose, the applicant'spredecessor in interest may be a company the applicant purchased or mergedwith or a company that sold all rights to the drug to the applicant. Generally,if the applicant was the sponsor named in the Form FDA-1571 for a new clinicalinvestigation that is essential to the approval, the applicant will bepresumed to have conducted or sponsored that investigation. If the applicantwas not the sponsor of the IND, e.g., because the study was conducted outsidethe United States, the applicant would be required to demonstrate sponsorshipby showing that it provided substantial support for the study before itwas completed. Ordinarily, to claim ``substantial support,'' the applicantmust have provided 50 percent or more of the cost of the study. In rarecases, the applicant may have provided less than 50 percent and still show``substantial support,'' if, for example, the study was extraordinarilyexpensive and the applicant's contribution to the total cost was significant.Merely supplying the drugs or providing other in kind support would notnormally constitute ``conducting or sponsoring'' a study. The applicant must show that its support for the study was provided beforethe study was conducted or while it was ongoing. The only exception tothis rule is when, after completion of the study, the applicant purchasedor merged with the company that sponsored or provided substantial supportfor the study or purchased all rights to the drug that is the subject ofthe application. Purchasing the study itself after the study has been completeddoes not constitute conducting or sponsoring a study. Under proposed andSection;314.50(j), an applicant would be required to include in its application(1) a statement that the applicant was the sponsor of the investigationnamed in Form FDA-1571 filed with the agency under the IND for the investigation,or (2) a certification with supporting information that the applicant orits predecessor in interest provided substantial support for the investigation.The agency acknowledges that it does not possess expertise and recordsessential to determining what elements should properly be considered indetermining the cost of a study and what constitutes 50 percent fundingof that study. The agency does not ordinarily intend to substitute itsjudgment for that of the applicant with respect to the 50 percent threshold.The agency will only look to see if the investigations were conducted underan IND in which the applicant was the sponsor or that the application containsthe certification with supporting information. The agency specificallyseeks comment on how to equitably interpret the term ``sponsored by.''Third, the clinical studies must be ``essential to the approval of theapplication.'' That is, without these new clinical studies, FDA would nothave sufficient information to conclude that the drug product or changeto a marketed drug product for which the applicant is seeking approvalis safe and effective. Thus, to qualify for exclusivity, there must notbe published reports of studies other than those conducted or sponsoredby the applicant, or other information available to the agency sufficientfor FDA to conclude that a proposed drug product or change to an alreadyapproved drug product is safe and effective. In addition, there must notbe an already approved drug product for which the applicant could submitan ANDA or 505(b)(2) application. The agency disagrees with the suggestionby PMA that any ``new information that will support the approvability ofan application or supplement'' is sufficient to satisfy this requirement.Rather, the studies must be truly ``essential,'' rather than simply supportive,to qualify the application for exclusivity. A study will not be consideredessential to approval merely because it was necessary for the applicantto conduct the study to avoid the exclusivity of the pioneer and obtainan immediate effective date of approval. The PMA suggested regulatory language that it believed would help applicantsto determine, in advance, the types of clinical investigations that wouldbe considered ``essential to the approval'' of an application or supplementalapplication under section 505(b) of the act. The PMA urged FDA, upon requestfrom a person planning to conduct or sponsor clinical tests on a proposednew drug, or upon submission of an IND, to examine a proposed testing protocolor general clinical outline to determine whether such clinical tests wouldbe essential to approval of the new drug. PMA would have an investigationdeemed essential unless FDA notified the applicant otherwise within 30days following receipt of this information. GPIA opposed this PMA proposal.What studies will be essential to the approval of an application cannotbe determined, in each case, by a review of protocols without knowing whatdrugs have been approved and what is in the published literature at thetime the application is approved. If published reports of investigations,other than those conducted or sponsored by the applicant, are sufficientto approve a drug product in a literature-supported application, no additionalstudies would be essential to the approval of that drug product as of thedate of approval. The agency encourages meetings between FDA and sponsorsof clinical investigations to facilitate drug development and the approvalprocess. However, the agency does not agree that it is possible to determinebefore approval which, if any, studies will be essential based on suchdiscussions. Under proposed andSection; 314.50(j), an applicant would be required to includein its application a list of all published studies or publicly availablereports of clinical investigations known to the applicant through a literaturesearch that are relevant to the conditions for which the applicant is seekingapproval. The list would be accompanied by a certification that the applicanthas thoroughly searched the scientific literature and, to the best of theapplicant's knowledge, the list is complete and accurate and, in the applicant'sopinion, the listed studies or publicly available reports do not providea sufficient basis for the approval of its application or supplement withoutreference to the new clinical investigation(s) in the application. Theagency proposes that the applicant explain why the studies and reportsare insufficient. v. Sections 505(c)(3)(D)(v) and 505(j)(4)(D)(v) of the act provide exclusivityfor a drug product that does not contain a new chemical entity and is thesubject of a new drug application or supplemental application submittedunder section 505(b) of the act and approved between January 1, 1982, andSeptember 24, 1984. The approval of an ANDA or 505(b)(2) application thatrefers to the previously approved drug product or which refers to a changeapproved in a supplemental application may not be made effective beforeSeptember 24, 1986. Because this date has passed, the proposed rule containsno reference to this provision. Applications described in sections 505(b)(2) and 505(c)(3)(D) of the actpresent one issue not encountered with ANDA's. Because applications submittedunder section 505(b) of the act may be entitled to exclusivity, there isan issue as to the treatment of concurrently pending 505(b)(2) applicationsfor the same conditions of approval where the first approved 505(b)(2)application for a drug is entitled to exclusivity, and the approval ofsubsequent 505(b)(2) applications for that drug may be delayed. FDA proposesto interpret the exclusivity provisions with respect to competing 505(b)(2)applications in the following manner. Section 505(c)(3)(D)(ii), statesthat ``* * * no application which refers to the drug for which the subsection(b) application [entitled to exclusivity] was submitted * * * may be <T3>submitted</T3> * * *.'' (Emphasis added.) The agency intends to interpretthis phrase to mean that any 505(b)(2) application submitted to FDA beforethe approval of another new drug application that qualifies for exclusivityunder section 505(c)(3)(D)(ii) is not affected by this exclusivity provision.The agency believes, however, that an exception to this rule must be madewhere the first applicant to obtain approval and qualify for exclusivitypublishes its data and the competing applicant amends its application toinclude the first applicant's published data. Where that data would beessential to the approval of the competing application, the second applicationwill be deemed to refer to the first application. FDA is proposing to amendandSection; 314.60 to ensure that the competing applicant cannot, withouta right of reference, rely on the first applicant's data and at the sametime avoid the first applicant's exclusivity. Under proposed andSection; 314.60(b), an amendment submitted by the competingapplicant to include reports of investigations conducted or sponsored bythe exclusivity holder, to which the competing applicant had not obtaineda right of reference, and which would be essential to the approval of thecompeting application, would cause the application to be deemed withdrawnand resubmitted. Because an application for a drug entitled to 5 yearsof exclusivity cannot be submitted until the exclusivity expires, the resubmissionwould not be accepted until the exclusivity had expired (or until the expirationof 4 years from the date the first application was approved, where thecompeting applicant sought to challenge a patent on the first applicant'sdrug). The exclusivity provisions of sections 505(c)(3)(D) (iii) and (iv) of theact delay the effective date of approval of any 505(b)(2) application thatis for the conditions of use of a previously approved application thatcontained new clinical investigations essential for approval. Consequently,if two 505(b)(2) applications are under review at the same time and oneis approved before the other, the effective date of approval of the secondapplication to be approved will be delayed, regardless of the date of submission,if the first contained new clinical investigations essential for approvaland thereby qualified for exclusivity. The issue of competing applications under section 505(c)(3)(D)(i) of theact is moot. No 505(b)(2) applications were submitted for any of the drugproducts qualifying for exclusivity under this provision before the approvalof the qualifying applications. 2. <T3>Exclusion of DESI upgrades from exclusivity. </T3>Under FDA's DESIreview, if a manufacturer had an effective new drug application for a drugproduct before 1962, FDA reaffirmed its approval if the manufacturer submitteda supplemental new drug application to conform the product's indicationsfor use to those determined to be effective in the DESI review. This isknown as a DESI upgrade.The agency believes as a matter of policy and statutory interpretationthat a grant of exclusivity is inappropriate for any DESI upgrade. Exceptfor the 2-year exclusivity provision (sections 505(j)(4)(D)(v) and 505(c)(3)(D)(v)of the act), Congress carefully limited the exclusivity provisions of thestatute to new chemical entities, which by definition were innovative,and to those changes in already marketed drug products, such as a new use,which are important innovations. A DESI upgrade does not constitute a changein a marketed drug or a major innovation; rather it permits the continuedmarketing of an already existing product for an already existing indication.Thus, FDA does not believe that DESI upgrades qualify for exclusivity.Changes in DESI drugs that were not shown to be effective in the DESI reviewmay, however, be entitled to exclusivity.3. <T3>Challenges to exclusivity determinations. </T3>Drug products that qualifyfor exclusivity under one of the statutory provisions discussed above areidentified in FDA's list and its monthly supplements, which state the expirationdate of the period of exclusivity for any listed drug that FDA believesqualifies for exclusivity. The authority to make final exclusivity determinationshas been delegated to the Center for Drug Evaluation and Research's Officeof Drug Standards. (See 52 FR 10881; April 6, 1987.)Interested persons may disagree with the agency's findings with respectto a period of exclusivity accorded or not accorded a drug product. Aninterested person should first informally contact the agency to determinethat the conclusion represented in the list is real and not an error. Havingestablished that the entry or lack of entry in the list represents an agencyfinding, the interested person who disagrees with the finding should petitionthe agency pursuant to 21 CFR 10.25 to include, exclude, or revise exclusivityinformation in the list if the petitioner believes the information in thelist is incorrect. The agency will generally publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a notice of availability of any such petitionit receives. Such publication is constructive notice to all interestedpersons who may be affected by the petition. Persons who may be affectedinclude holders of approved new drug applications, approved ANDA's andapproved 505(b)(2) applications, applicants with pending applications orpotential applicants. (See also 50 FR 39177; September 27, 1985.)To resolve exclusivity issues as early as possible in the drug approvalprocess, FDA proposes that, if an applicant believes its drug product orchange to an already marketed drug product is entitled to exclusivity underthe act, the applicant include this information in its new drug application.Under proposed andSection; 314.50(j) for a new drug product and proposedandSection; 314.70(e) for a change to an already marketed drug product, anapplicant would be required to include: (1) a statement that the applicantis claiming exclusivity for its drug product or change, if approved; (2)a reference to the provision under proposed andSection; 314.108 that supportsthe claim; (3) if the applicant is claiming exclusivity under andSection;314.108(b)(2), information to show that no drug product has previouslybeen approved under section 505(b) containing any active moiety in thedrug product for which the applicant is seeking approval and (4) if anapplicant is claiming exclusivity under proposed andSection; 314.108(b) (4)or (5), information to show that the application contains ``new clinicalinvestigations,'' ``essential to approval,'' of the application or supplementand ``conducted or sponsored by'' the applicant. (See discussion at partV. section L.1., <T3>supra</T3>.)M. Refusal to Approve ANDA'sThe statutory grounds for refusing to approve an ANDA in part parallelthe ANDA submission requirements. Thus, under proposed andSection; 314.127,the agency would deny approval of an ANDA if (1) the methods used in, orthe facilities and controls used for, the manufacture, processing, andpacking of the drug product are inadequate to assure and preserve its identity,strength, quality, and purity; (2) information included in the ANDA isinsufficient to show that each of the proposed conditions of use have beenpreviously approved for the reference listed drug; (3) if the proposeddrug product has one active ingredient, information in the ANDA is insufficientto show that the active ingredient is the same as that of the referencelisted drug, or, if the proposed drug product is a combination product,(i) information in the ANDA is insufficient to show that the active ingredientsare the same as those of the reference listed drug, or (ii) if one of theactive ingredients differs, information in the ANDA is insufficient toshow that the other active ingredients are the same as those of the referencelisted drug, or that the differing active ingredient is an active ingredientof a listed drug or a drug that does not meet the requirements of section201(p) of the act, or (iii) no petition to file an ANDA for the drug productwith the different ingredient was approved under section 505(j)(2)(C) ofthe act; (4) information in the ANDA is insufficient to show that the routeof administration, dosage form, or strength of the drug product are thesame as those of the reference listed drug, or, if they are not the same,no petition to vary the changed elements was approved under section 505(j)(2)(C)of the act; (5) if the ANDA was filed pursuant to the approval of a petitionto file an ANDA for a drug product with a different active ingredient,route of administration, dosage form, or strength, the ANDA did not containthe information required by FDA respecting the different active ingredient,route of administration, dosage form, or strength; (6) information in theANDA is insufficient to show that the drug product is bioequivalent tothe reference listed drug, or, if the ANDA was filed pursuant to an approvedpetition, the information is insufficient to show that the active ingredientsof the drug product are of the same pharmacological or therapeutic classas those of the reference listed drug and that the drug product can beexpected to have the same therapeutic effect as the reference listed drugwhen administered to patients for the same conditions of use; (7) informationin the ANDA is insufficient to show that the labeling proposed for thedrug product is the same as that for the reference listed drug except forchanges required because of differences approved under a petition or becausethe drug product and reference listed drug are produced or distributedby different manufacturers.1. <T3>Inactive ingredients. </T3>The statute also provides for denial ofapproval if information in the ANDA or any other information availableto FDA shows that the inactive ingredients of the drug product are unsafefor use under the proposed conditions for use or that the composition ofthe drug product is unsafe under the proposed conditions of use becauseof the type or quantity of inactive ingredients in the drug product orthe manner in which the inactive ingredients are included.It is well-established that changing the inactive ingredients in a drugcan adversely affect the drug's safety or effectiveness. Interpreting theact to require approval of generic drugs with potentially unsafe inactiveingredients would thwart one of the major purposes of the basic act, whichwas to prevent a repetition of the Sulfanilamide tragedy, in which theinactive ingredient of an untested drug was responsible for many deaths.The desire to avoid another such incident led to passage of the 1938 amendmentsto the act and the requirement that new drugs be shown to be safe. FDAis therefore proposing to consider inactive ingredients or composition``unsafe'' if there is a reasonable basis to conclude that its inactiveingredients or composition raise serious questions about the drug's safety.FDA's interpretation is consistent with the statutory scheme and with thepurpose of the 1984 Amendments, which was to assure a supply of low costgeneric drugs that are as safe and effective as their brand name counterparts.Any other interpretation of section 505(j)(3)(H) of the act would produceabsurd results when read in conjunction with the withdrawal provisionsof section 505(e), which permit FDA to withdraw approval of an ANDA withless evidence of the hazard posed by an inactive ingredient than wouldbe required to disapprove it. Section 505(e)(2) of the act permits FDAto withdraw approval of an application if there is evidence that showsthat the drug ``is not shown to be safe.'' FDA can invoke this provisionif there is a reasonable basis from which to infer serious questions asto the safety of the drug, even if the agency lacks proof that the drugis unsafe. See Commissioner's Decision on DES, 44 FR 54852, 54861 (September21, 1979), <T3>aff'd, Rhone-Poulenc, Inc., Hess andamp; Clark Div. </T3>v. <T3>FDA, </T3>636 F.2d 750 (D.C. Cir. 1980). Thus, if the agency believedthat a new inactive ingredient was potentially dangerous but lacked proofthat it was unsafe, and if section 505(j)(3)(H) of the act required proofthat it was unsafe before it could disapprove the application, the agencywould be required to approve the ANDA and then immediately initiate a proceedingto withdraw it.The Supreme Court has held that in interpreting the Federal Food, Drug,and Cosmetic Act, the act must be given `` `the most harmonious, comprehensivemeaning possible' in light of the legislative policy and purpose,'' andmust not `` `impute to Congress a purpose to paralyze with one hand whatit sought to promote with the other.' '' It would be inconsistent withthese principles to interpret section 505(j)(3)(H) of the act as requiringeither (1) a burden of proof on the agency that would allow approval ofpotentially unsafe drugs, or (2) a greater showing of unsafety to disapprovea drug than is required to withdraw it. Therefore, FDA proposes to harmonizesection 505(j)(3)(H) of the act with other provisions of the act and thereforeinterprets that section as authorizing disapproval of an ANDA on the samebasis as withdrawal under section 505(e)(2) of the act. Thus, an ANDA maybe disapproved if there is a reasonable basis to conclude that one of itsinactive ingredients or its composition raises serious questions aboutthe drug's safety.FDA is proposing to implement this interpretation in proposed andSection;314.127(h). That section provides that FDA will disapprove an ANDA if itsinactive ingredients or composition raise serious questions of safety andcites examples of changes in inactive ingredients that FDA will considerto raise such serious questions. The examples reflect FDA's experiencewith types of changes in inactive ingredients that can adversely affecta drug's safety. The examples are not intended to be exhaustive, however,and FDA may conclude, on the basis of its experience or other information,that other types of changes raise serious questions about the safety ofa drug. FDA solicits comments on additional types of changes in inactiveingredients and composition which create a reasonable basis from whichto infer serious questions as to the drug's safety.The agency lists in the regulations at proposed andSection; 314.127(h)(2)examples of the types of changes in inactive ingredients that FDA willconsider to raise serious questions about the safety of a drug product.In addition, for drug products intended for parenteral, ophthalmic, oroptic use, the regulations identify the categories of added substancesin which variations are not permitted and those in which variations maybe permitted if the applicant demonstrates that the variation will notaffect the safety of the product. (See discussion at part V. section D.1.h.)2. <T3>Withdrawal or suspension of listed drug. </T3>Section 505(j) of theact allows approval of ANDA's that refer to previously approved drugs,i.e., ``listed drugs'' within the meaning of 505(j) (2)(A)(i) and (6) ofthe act. The policy of allowing approval of generic copies of previouslyapproved drugs would present significant problems if that policy allowedapproval of generic copies of drugs whose approval had been withdrawn byFDA or that had been voluntarily withdrawn from sale for safety or effectivenessreasons. The statute seeks to assure that that will not happen by providing,in section 505(j)(6)(C) of the act, that a drug will be removed from listing,thus prohibiting approval of generic copies of that drug, if either ofthe above conditions occurs. In addition, section 505(j)(3)(I) bars theagency from approving an ANDA, even if the drug it refers to is still ``listed,''if there has been published a notice of opportunity for hearing on thewithdrawal of approval of that listed drug. Section 505(j)(5) of the act,moreover, authorizes FDA to remove from the market, by withdrawal or suspensionof approval, any generic copies already approved if the listed drug isremoved from the market by FDA withdrawal or suspension of approval oris voluntarily withdrawn from sale for what the agency determines are safetyor effectiveness reasons.To assure that the intent of section 505(j)(3)(I) of the act is not evaded,the agency proposes to interpret this section broadly. Thus, andSection;314.162(a)(1) of the proposed rules is designed to deal with the followingsequence of events: Drug A is approved under a full new drug application.Drug B is approved under an ANDA, and Drug A is the listed drug upon whichit relies. The agency issues a notice of opportunity for hearing on withdrawalof approval of Drug A. Approval of Drug B will be withdrawn, in accordancewith procedures discussed below, at the same time as that of Drug A. Section505(j)(3)(I) of the act, by its terms, would prevent approval of an ANDAfor Drug C that refers to Drug A as its listed drug after the notice ofopportunity for hearing issues. Logically, that section should also prohibitapproval of Drug C if it refers to Drug B as its listed drug, and the proposedregulation interprets the statutory language to produce that result.A notice of opportunity for hearing is published only if the ``listed''drug is being withdrawn under sections 505(e) or 505(j)(5) of the act.A drug must also be removed from the list when the agency determines thatit has been voluntarily withdrawn from sale for safety or effectivenessreasons. To fulfill Congress' intent that new drugs not be approved pendingthe removal of a drug from the list, the agency will also refuse to approvean ANDA if the ``listed'' drug referred to in the ANDA was voluntarilywithdrawn from sale and the agency has not determined that the withdrawalwas not for safety or effectiveness reasons. (See proposed andSection;andSection;314.122 and 314.127(k).)Where the listed drug is approved for more than one indication and thenotice of proposed withdrawal proposes withdrawal of less than all of theapproved indications, FDA will not approve an ANDA that includes an indicationcovered by the notice unless the applicant amends its ANDA with respectto labeling to remove the indication. Proposed andSection; 314.127(i) wouldnot apply if the ANDA seeks approval of the remaining indications only.3. <T3>Other grounds for disapproval. </T3>Finally, FDA is authorized to disapprovean ANDA if the ANDA does not meet any other requirement of section 505(j)(2)(A)of the act, for example, does not contain the certifications regardingpatents required in section 505(j)(2)(A)(vii) of the act, or the ANDA containsany untrue statement of material fact.The agency proposes to add new andSection; 314.127 to the regulations codifyingthe statutory reasons for disapproving an ANDA and to revise andSection;314.120 to state the administrative procedure governing this agency action.Under proposed revised andSection; 314.120, if the agency concludes thatthere are grounds for denying approval of the ANDA, it will send the applicanta not approvable letter describing the deficiencies in the ANDA. The applicantmust then either (1) withdraw its ANDA, (2) amend the ANDA incorporatingalready reviewed materials together with new information intended to correctall deficiencies identified in the not approvable letter, or (3) ask theagency to provide the applicant an opportunity for a hearing on the questionof whether there are grounds for denying approval of the ANDA under section505(j) of the act.The regulations describing notices of opportunity for hearing on proposalsto refuse to approve applications and abbreviated applications are setforth at andSection; 314.200. The agency proposes to make editorial, butnot substantive changes in these regulations. FDA will give an applicantwritten notice of opportunity for hearing on its refusal to approve anANDA if the applicant asks the agency to provide it an opportunity fora hearing. The notice of opportunity for a hearing on a refusal to approvean ANDA would generally provide, as such notices now do, a detailed descriptionand analysis of the specific facts resulting in the agency's refusal toapprove the ANDA and would refer to specific requirements in the act andregulations under which the agency refused to approve the ANDA. An applicantwould have, as it now does under andSection; 314.200, 30 days to respondto such notice. If the applicant requests a hearing, the hearing must beginnot later than 90 days after the expiration of the 30-day period, unlessboth the agency and the applicant agree to a later date.N. Withdrawal or Suspension of Approval of ANDA'sANDA's may be withdrawn or suspended under two separate sections of theact. An ANDA may be withdrawn under section 505(e) of the act, on the samegrounds that a full new drug application (NDA) may be withdrawn, or anANDA may be withdrawn or suspended under section 505(j)(5) of the act,if a listed drug on which the approval of the ANDA depends is withdrawnor suspended by FDA or voluntarily withdrawn from sale for safety or effectivenessreasons. The agency proposes to retain its current regulations under andSection;314.150 stating the grounds for the withdrawal of approval of applicationsand abbreviated applications for new drugs under section 505(e) of theact. The agency proposes to add andSection;andSection; 314.151 and 314.153,however, to describe the additional circumstances under which the agencywill suspend or withdraw ANDA approval under section 505(j)(5) of the act.The procedures to be followed when NDA's and ANDA's are withdrawn undersection 505(e) of the act are specified by statute. Congress was silent,however, about the procedural requirements for the withdrawal or suspensionof ANDA's under section 505(j)(5) of the act. The agency therefore proposesto establish procedures that will satisfy the requirements of due process.Section 505(e) of the act requires the Secretary to provide ``due noticeand opportunity for hearing'' when the agency proposes to withdraw approvalof an NDA or an ANDA for grounds enumerated in that section. To satisfythis requirement, the agency currently affords an opportunity for a formalevidentiary hearing under 21 CFR Part 12 when it proposes to withdraw anNDA or an ANDA under section 505(e) of the act. FDA has tentatively concludedthat different procedural safeguards are due an ANDA holder under section505(j)(5) of the act than are due an NDA holder under section 505(e) ofthe act, for the reasons described below.An ANDA for a generic drug exists legally and factually only by virtueof duplicating a previously approved listed drug. The investment in gainingapproval of an ANDA is generally substantially less than the investmentin gaining approval of an NDA. Unlike a full new drug application, an ANDAis not required to contain evidence of the safety and effectiveness ofthe drug entity for its intended use. Rather, the ANDA applicant relieson a prior agency finding of safety and effectiveness for approval. Thatprior agency finding is dependent on the evidence presented in a previouslyapproved new drug application. The property rights and privileges thatattach to an ANDA are therefore dependent and contingent upon the validityof the innovator drug manufacturer's NDA. Under the statutory scheme, anANDA holder has no expectation of the continued marketing of its approveddrug if approval of the underlying application for the reference drug iswithdrawn or suspended. Accordingly, the agency concludes that the constitutionallyprotected interest of an ANDA holder is different than that of an NDA holder.The agency recognizes, however, that ANDA holders may be entitled to moreextensive procedural protections when the agency proposes to withdraw approvalof their applications under sections 505(e) of the act rather than under505(j)(5) of the act. This result is procedurally fair because of the differenttypes of issues to be resolved under the two sections of the act. Whenthe agency proposes to withdraw an ANDA under section 505(e) of the act,rather than section 505(j)(5) of the act, the basis for withdrawal willdirectly concern aspects of safety and effectiveness, labeling, or manufacturingthat are specific to the ANDA holder's product; the basis for such a withdrawalwill not be the safety and effectiveness of the underlying drug substance.In a 505(e) proceeding that concerns only a specific ANDA and not the underlyingdrug substance, therefore, the ANDA holder will be in the best positionto present relevant evidence and to represent its interests. In many instances,an ANDA holder alone will possess the information essential to resolvingfactual issues necessary for the agency to make an informed judgment aboutwhether or not approval of the application should be withdrawn or suspendedfor grounds specified under section 505(e) of the act.In 505(j)(5) proceedings, on the other hand, the basis for the agency'sdecision to withdraw a reference listed drug will generally only indirectlyconcern the ANDA holder's product. Rather, the withdrawal will be basedon the safety and effectiveness of the listed drug on which the ANDA approvaldepends. The issues in such a proceeding will usually involve the underlyingsafety and effectiveness data that supported the approval of the originalfull new drug application. For this reason, in 505(j)(5) withdrawal proceedings,an ANDA holder will not be uniquely able to present relevant evidence.FDA notes that Congress did not amend section 505(e) of the act to requirethat ANDA holders be given an opportunity for hearing when the agency proposesto withdraw the listed drug to which the ANDA referred. Instead, Congressadded new section 505(j)(5) of the act, which provides for the withdrawalor suspension of an ANDA when the approval of the listed drug on whichthe ANDA depends, is withdrawn or suspended. The agency believes this addsweight to its interpretation that ANDA's approved under section 505(j)of the act have different rights with respect to withdrawal proceedings.Section 505(j)(5) of the act does not require an opportunity for hearing.1. <T3>Type of hearing to be provided. </T3>The agency has concluded thatfor withdrawals of ANDA approvals under section 505(j)(5), an opportunityfor an oral hearing is not required. Where no hearing of any kind is requiredby statute, the agency believes procedural fairness requires adequate noticeof the agency's position and an opportunity to respond to the agency'scontentions, before a final determination. <T3>Aeron Marine Shipping Co. </T3>v. <T3>United States, </T3>525 F. Supp. 527, 535 (D.D.C. 1981), <T3>aff'd, </T3>695 F.2d 567 (D.C. Cir. 1982). Many courts, applying theSupreme Court's balancing test in <T3>Mathews </T3>v. <T3>Eldridge, </T3>424 U.S. 319, 334-35 (1976), have held ``paper hearing''procedures adequate where, in the total context of the process, they aredeemed to ensure adequate notice and a genuine opportunity to explain one'scase. See, e.g., <T3>Carson Products </T3>v. <T3>Califano, </T3>594 F.2d 453, 459 (5th Cir. 1979); <T3>Basciano </T3>v. <T3>Herkimer, </T3>605 F.2d 605 (2nd Cir. 1978), <T3>cert. denied, </T3>442 U.S. 929 (1979); <T3>Zotos Internat,l, Inc. </T3>v. <T3>Kennedy, </T3>460 F. Supp. 268, 279 (D.D.C. 1978), following remandto agency, No. 82-1480 (D.D.C. August 14, 1986), <T3>aff'g </T3>Magis. Op. (filed August 21, 1985) (upholding FDA's writtenprocedures for contesting agency determinations of trade secret statusof certain ingredients). (See also <T3>Geneva Towers Tenants Org. </T3>v. <T3>Federated Mortgage Investors, </T3>504 F.2d 483 (9th Cir. 1974).)The agency has concluded that an oral hearing is not necessary to satisfythe requirements of due process for withdrawal or suspension of ANDA'sunder section 505(j)(5) of the act. As discussed above, the interests atstake and the nature of the issues to be resolved do not demand trial-typeproceedings. Accordingly, the agency intends to provide written due processsafeguards that assure adequate notice, accurate fact-finding, and an opportunityto respond to agency findings.Nevertheless, if the agency finds that there are dispositive factual issuesabout the reasons for the withdrawal of the listed drug that it cannotresolve on the basis of the written submissions alone, it will providefor a limited, informal oral hearing. The discretion to hold this hearinglies exclusively with the agency. The agency generally will not providefor an oral hearing unless it cannot make an informed determination withoutassessing the credibility and veracity of the witnesses.The specific procedures afforded an ANDA holder under section 505(j)(5)of the act will depend on whether the ANDA is being withdrawn or suspendedbecause (1) the listed drug referred to in the ANDA is being withdrawnor suspended by the agency for grounds described in the first sentenceof section 505(e) of the act or under section 505(j)(5) of the act or (2)the manufacturer of the listed drug has voluntarily withdrawn its drugfrom sale for safety or effectiveness reasons. Section N.3. and 4. belowdiscusses the procedures provided in each case.2. <T3>ANDA's subject to withdrawal or suspension. </T3>Section 505(j)(5)of the act requires that the agency withdraw or suspend a drug approvedunder section 505(j) of the act that ``refers in its application'' to alisted drug that has been withdrawn or suspended by the agency or voluntarilywithdrawn by its own manufacturer for safety or effectiveness reasons.Thus, the statute might be read to permit a withdrawal or suspension undersection 505(j)(5) of the act only of generic drug A, which referred inits application to the listed drug, but not of generic drug B, which referredin its application to generic drug A. If this reading were correct, section505(j)(5) would require the agency, following the withdrawal or suspensionof generic drug A, to conduct a subsequent proceeding to withdraw or suspendgeneric drug B.To avoid a series of repetitive proceedings, the agency proposes to includein a single proceeding under section 505(j)(5) of the act all applicationsfor drug products that refer to any drug that would be withdrawn or suspendedunder section 505(j)(5) of the act, either immediately or sequentially,as a result of the withdrawal or suspension of the listed drug. Thus, ifgeneric drug A refers in its application to the listed drug, generic drugB refers to drug A, and generic drug C refers to generic drug B, FDA willnotify the manufacturers of drugs A, B, and C that it is proposing to withdrawor suspend their approvals and give each the opportunity to participatein a single proceeding, in accordance with the terms of either andSection;314.151 or andSection; 314.153. (See section N.3. and 4. below.) It shouldbe noted, however, that cases of generic drugs sequentially referring todifferent listed drugs are unlikely, because in most cases the agency wouldrequire all generic applicants to refer to a single listed drug to assureuniform labeling and bioequivalence continuity.If, as a result of this policy, a large number of manufacturers elect toparticipate as nonparty participants in any hearing held under 21 CFR Part12, the presiding officer is authorized to exclude repetitive submissions.(See 21 CFR 12.94.)The agency notes that prospective ANDA applicants, i.e., persons withoutapproved ANDA's, have no constitutionally protected interest in whetherthe pioneer drug remains on the list of approved drugs and thus are notentitled to participate in the decisionmaking process concerning withdrawalor removal of a drug from ``listed'' status.3. <T3>Withdrawal of approval of an ANDA when the listed drug is withdrawnfor grounds described in section 505(e)(1) through (5) of the act. </T3>Ifthe agency proposes to withdraw a listed drug for grounds enumerated inthe first sentence of section 505(e) of the act, the listed drug's manufacturerhas a right to notice and an opportunity for a formal evidentiary hearingon the withdrawal of approval of the listed drug. Except for persons subjectto notice and an opportunity for a hearing under 21 CFR 310.6, the holderof an abbreviated application that is dependent on the approval of thelisted drug does not have an independent right to hearing. Such an ANDAholder may, however, submit written comments on the notice of opportunityfor hearing issued on the proposed withdrawal of the listed drug. The agencyrecognizes that there may be rare cases in which the reason for the withdrawalof the listed drug product is not applicable to the ANDA holder's drugproduct. For example, a withdrawal caused by a problem related to a particulardosage form might not be relevant to the safety and effectiveness of ageneric version of the drug which was marketed in a different dosage form,pursuant to an approved petition under section 505(j)(2)(C) of the act.In such a case, the burden would be on the ANDA holder to submit informationestablishing to the agency's satisfaction the inapplicability to the genericdrug product of the grounds for withdrawal.If a hearing is granted, any ANDA holder that submitted comments on thenotice of opportunity for hearing may participate in the hearing as a nonpartyparticipant as provided for in 21 CFR 12.89. (See proposed andSection; 314.151.)If the listed drug is withdrawn without a hearing, any ANDA's whose holdersdid not submit comments will be withdrawn at the same time as the listeddrug. If a hearing is requested but denied, each ANDA listed in the noticeof opportunity for hearing will be withdrawn at the same time as the listeddrug, unless the agency determines, pursuant to proposed andSection; 314.151(d),that the grounds for withdrawal are not applicable to a specific ANDA.If an affected ANDA holder that has commented on the notice of opportunityfor hearing does not have an opportunity to participate in a 21 CFR Part12 hearing because a hearing is not requested, or is settled, the ANDAholder will be provided the ``paper hearing'' procedures set forth in proposedandSection; 314.151. If the drug has been suspended pursuant to andSection;314.153 (see discussion at section N.4. below), a hearing will be providedafter the drug has been removed from the market. The published notice ofopportunity for hearing on the withdrawal of the listed drug will serveas the written notice detailing the reasons for the proposed withdrawalof approval of affected ANDA's and providing a summary of the evidencethat the agency considers most relevant.ANDA holders will have had an opportunity, as described above, to commenton the agency's proposed withdrawal of the drug from ``listed'' status.An ANDA holder should submit evidence that directly challenges the accuracyof the information considered by the agency as well as the correctnessof the agency's conclusions.Any comments received will be considered by the agency. Where no 21 CFRPart 12 hearing is held, an initial decision on the withdrawal of the listeddrug and related ANDA's, which responds to significant comments, will besent to each ANDA holder that submitted comments. These ANDA holders willthen have 30 days in which to object to the agency's initial determination,in the form of a written rebuttal. If necessary to resolve dispositivefactual issues, the agency may, at its discretion, hold a limited informaloral hearing. If there are no objections to the initial decision, it willbecome final at the expiration of 30 days from the date of its issuance.If there are objections to the initial decision, the written rebuttalswill be reviewed and responded to in the final decision.The Director will publish a notice announcing the availability of the finaldecision in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. If the final decision withdraws approval ofthe listed drug, the published notice will also (1) remove the referencedrug from the list and (2) withdraw approval of and remove from the listall ANDA's identified in the notice of opportunity for hearing. See proposedandSection;andSection; 314.152 and 314.162.4. <T3>Suspension of approval of an ANDA when the ``listed'' drug is voluntarilywithdrawn from sale for safety or effectiveness reasons. </T3>When theagency proposes to suspend an ANDA because it determines that the listeddrug on which the ANDA's approval depends was voluntarily withdrawn fromsale by the manufacturer for safety or effectiveness reasons, the ANDAholder will have an opportunity to show that the withdrawal was not forsafety or effectiveness reasons or that the reasons for the withdrawalare not applicable to the generic drug. By ``voluntary withdrawal,'' theagency means any withdrawal from sale other than a withdrawal ordered undersection 505(e) or 505(j)(5) of the act. A ``paper hearing'' procedure willbe afforded affected ANDA holders for this purpose. (See proposed andSection;314.153.) If the drug has been suspended pursuant to andSection; 314.153,a hearing will be provided after the drug has been removed from the market.If a listed drug is voluntarily withdrawn from sale and the agency determinesthat the withdrawal from sale was for safety or effectiveness reasons,each affected ANDA holder will be sent a copy of the agency's initial decisionsetting forth the reasons for its determination and its intention to removethe listed drug from the list and suspend approval of the identified ANDA's.For a discussion of the factors the agency will consider in making thisdetermination, see section O., <T3>infra</T3>.ANDA holders will have 30 days from the date the initial decision is issuedto present, in writing, comments on the agency's proposed decision. AnANDA holder may also submit evidence demonstrating that the reasons forthe withdrawal of the listed drug are not applicable to the drug subjectto the ANDA. The agency may, at its discretion, hold a limited informaloral hearing to resolve dispositive factual issues.If no significant comments on the proposed decision are received, the initialdecision will become final at the expiration of 30 days from the date theinitial decision was issued. If significant comments are received, a finaldecision responding to them will be issued. The final decision will bein writing and will be sent to ANDA holders who submitted comments. Ifthe final decision affirms the agency's initial decision, it will be publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> and will remove the listed drug from the listand suspend approval of, and remove from the list, all ANDA's whose holderswere notified of the proposed agency action. (See proposed andSection; 314.153(b).)For a discussion of removal of drugs from the list, see section P. <T3>infra.</T3>The agency is using the term ``suspended'' rather than ``withdrawn'' todescribe the status of ANDA's approved by reference to a listed drug thatthe agency determines has been voluntarily withdrawn from sale for safetyor effectiveness reasons. Section 505(j)(5) of the act provides that anANDA approval ``shall be withdrawn or suspended * * * for the period of[the listed drug's] withdrawal from sale, or, if earlier, the period endingon the date the Secretary determines that the withdrawal from sale is notfor safety and effectiveness reasons.'' The agency believes that Congressintended that ANDA approval be reinstated immediately when either of thesetwo conditions is met. The agency therefore intends to suspend rather thanwithdraw approval of ANDA's because once withdrawn, ANDA approval cannotbe automatically reinstated. Instead, to regain approval of a withdrawnapplication, the ANDA applicant would have to obtain a new approval.Therefore, to permit reinstatement of ANDA's, the agency proposes to suspendANDA approval rather than withdraw it when the listed drug is determinedto have been voluntarily withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons.Accordingly, if the approval of an ANDA depends on the approval of a drugthat the agency determines is voluntarily withdrawn for safety or effectivenessreasons, the ANDA's approval will be suspended, i.e., the approval willcease to be in effect, for the period specified in section 505(j)(5)(B)of the act. The agency notes that the ``imminent hazard'' procedures insection 505(e) of the act do not apply to suspensions under section 505(j)of the act. The authority for ``imminent hazard'' suspensions cannot bedelegated beyond the level of the Secretary of Health and Human Services,while no such statutory limitation applies to section 505(j) suspensions.Accordingly, the agency believes that Congress intended section 505(j)suspensions to be accomplished more expeditiously than section 505(e) suspensions.ANDA approval will be reinstated if the agency has evidence or evidenceis presented in a citizen petition demonstrating that the listed drug wasnot withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons and the agency thereforerelists the withdrawn drug, or if evidence is presented in a citizen petitionestablishing that the basis for the withdrawal of the reference drug doesnot apply to the generic drug (proposed andSection; 314.161(e)).5. <T3>Imminent public health hazards. </T3>If the agency determines thata drug approved under section 505 of the act presents an unacceptable hazardto the public health, approval of its new drug application may be suspendedpursuant to the ``imminent hazard'' provision of section 505(e) of theact. The holder of an abbreviated new drug application drug whose approvalrests on a listed drug that is the subject of an ``imminent hazard'' proceedingwill be permitted to participate in the proceeding. If approval of thelisted drug is suspended as an imminent hazard, the approval of ANDA'swhose approval rests on the listed drug will be suspended immediately (proposedandSection; 314.153(a)(1)).To assure that ANDA's for all drug products affected by an imminent hazardproceeding are suspended immediately, proposed andSection; 314.153(a)(1)provides for the suspension of any ANDA that refers in its applicationto a listed drug suspended under authority of section 505(e) of the actor under authority of andSection; 314.153(a)(1). Thus, if Drug B refers toDrug A and Drug A refers to a listed drug that is suspended in an imminenthazard proceeding under 505(e) of the act, Drug A will be suspended underandSection; 314.153(a)(1) because its reference listed drug was suspendedunder authority of section 505(e) and Drug B will be suspended becauseits reference listed drug (Drug A) was suspended under authority of andSection;314.153(a)(1).The holder of an ANDA suspended because a listed drug is found to be an``imminent hazard'' will also be permitted to participate as a nonpartyparticipant in any subsequent hearing on withdrawal of approval of thelisted drug, as described above in section N.3.If a listed drug is voluntarily withdrawn from sale for safety or effectivenessreasons and the agency concludes that the drug presents an unacceptablerisk to the public, the proposed regulations also provide for the immediatesuspension of ANDA approval of any drug whose approval rests on the approvalof the withdrawn drug (proposed andSection; 314.153(a)(2)). As discussedin section N.4. above, the agency does not believe that the imminent hazardprovisions of section 505(e) of the act apply to suspensions under section505(j) of the act.O. Determination That a Listed Drug Was Withdrawn for Safety or EffectivenessReasonsThe 1984 Amendments do not specify procedures to be followed in determiningwhether a drug that is voluntarily withdrawn from sale by its manufactureris withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons. The statute does notrequire that the agency make this determination for every drug that isvoluntarily withdrawn from sale, nor does it specify at what point aftera voluntary withdrawal such a determination can or must be made. Many drugsare withdrawn from the market every year, and it would be a needless expenditureof resources for the agency to determine the reason for each such withdrawal.The agency is therefore interpreting section 505(j)(5) of the act to permitit to determine whether a drug is withdrawn for safety or effectivenessreasons at any time after it has ceased to be marketed.The agency anticipates that a determination of the reasons for withdrawalof a listed drug will generally be made either when there are existingapproved ANDA's that depend upon the approval of the listed drug, see andSection;314.153(b), when an ANDA applicant seeks to refer to a listed drug thathas been voluntarily withdrawn from sale, see proposed andSection; 314.122,or when an interested person petitions for a determination under andSection;andSection;10.25 and 10.30. The agency may, however, also make the determination atany other time on its own initiative. (See proposed andSection; 314.161.)The agency may determine whether a listed drug was withdrawn from salefor safety or effectiveness reasons, as required by section 505(j)(5) ofthe act, by attempting to focus on the intent of its manufacturer. Often,however, there will be more than one reason for the withdrawal of a drugfrom market by the manufacturer. Withdrawals are often accompanied by statementsfrom the drug's manufacturer that the firm continues to have confidencein the safety and effectiveness of the product but is acting for businesspurposes. Drug manufacturers have also sometimes stated that the productwas withdrawn from the market due to unwarranted product liability.Because Congress did not provide the agency with subpoena power to callas witnesses the persons who made the decision to withdraw a product fromsale, Congress cannot have expected the agency to discern the actual intentof the decisionmakers by direct evidence. The legislative history of thisprovision does make clear, however, Congress' intent that the agency examinewhether the manufacturer had safety or effectiveness concerns about thewithdrawn drug independent of the reasons given by the manufacturer forthe withdrawal. (H. Rept. 857, Part I, at 30.) Congress, therefore, musthave expected the agency to rely upon circumstantial evidence and logicalinference to determine the actual intent of those who decided to withdrawthe product from the market. The agency's inquiry, therefore, will focuson whether there were sufficient concerns about safety and effectivenessto make a withdrawal from sale likely and reasonable.A determination on this issue by the agency will be based in part on theassumption that a pharmaceutical manufacturer would not cease distributionof a profitable drug if safety or effectiveness concerns had not arisen.If the withdrawn drug accounted for significant sales of the company withdrawingit, in the absence of convincing evidence to the contrary, that would bepersuasive evidence that safety or effectiveness concerns prompted themanufacturer to withdraw the drug from sale. As a means of implementingthe statute, the agency may establish the following rebuttable presumption.If a drug manufacturer withdraws a drug from the market which accountedfor significant sales to that manufacturer, and there is no evidence tothe contrary, it will be presumed that the withdrawal was for safety oreffectiveness reasons. FDA seeks comments on a sales figure or other methodologythat would be appropriate to establish this presumption.The agency will also consider other factors in determining whether a marketwithdrawal was for safety and effectiveness reasons, such as increasesin the number of adverse drug reactions reported on the drug and publishedor unpublished studies of the drug questioning its safety or effectiveness.If the agency makes a final decision, pursuant to andSection; 314.153(b)or andSection; 314.161, determining that a listed drug is withdrawn for safetyor effectiveness reasons, the agency will publish a notice of the determinationin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (proposed andSection; 314.161). The notice willalso serve to remove the drug from the list (proposed andSection; 314.162).At any time after a drug is removed from the list under proposed andSection;314.162(a)(2), the drug may be relisted if the agency determines that thedrug was not withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons. The agencymay make this determination on its own initiative or in response to a petitionsubmitted under andSection;andSection; 10.25(a) and 10.30. If the agency decideson the basis of evidence before it that the drug was not withdrawn forsafety or effectiveness reasons, it will publish a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> announcing its determination. (See proposed andSection;314.161(e).) The notice will announce that the drug is relisted and serveto reinstate approval of ANDA's that were suspended when the agency publishedits final decision removing the listed drug from the list.1. <T3>Submitting an application or a suitability petition that refer to alisted drug that is no longer marketed. </T3>Because there are many instanceseach year in which a drug company decides not to continue selling a drug,FDA normally will not determine whether the drug was withdrawn for safetyor effectiveness reasons simply because it learns that the product wasvoluntarily withdrawn from sale. To assure that generic versions of unsafeor ineffective drugs do not remain on the market, the agency will, however,promptly determine the reasons for the withdrawal of a listed drug if theagency has approved ANDA's that referred to the listed drug. The agencywill require persons who wish to submit ANDA's for those listed drugs thathave been withdrawn from sale and for which no ANDA's have been approvedor who wish to submit suitability petitions that rely on those listed drugsto show that the withdrawals from sale were not for safety or effectivenessreasons. For purposes of sections 505(j)(5) and 505(j)(6)(C) of the act,a drug shall be considered to have been ``withdrawn from sale'' if theapplicant has ceased its own distribution of the drug, whether or not ithas ordered recall of previously distributed lots of the drug. A routine,temporary interruption in the supply of a drug product would not be considereda withdrawal from sale, however, unless triggered by safety or effectivenessconcerns.Persons who wish to submit an ANDA or a suitability petition that relieson a listed drug that has been voluntarily withdrawn from the market mustpetition the agency with supporting documentation that the withdrawal fromsale was not for safety or effectiveness reasons (proposed andSection; 314.122).If the agency receives an ANDA or a suitability petition for such a drugunaccompanied by a petition with supporting documentation, it will refuseto approve the ANDA or suitability petition until it can determine thatthe listed drug is not withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons (proposedandSection;andSection; 314.93(e)(v) and 314.127(k)).2. <T3>Informing FDA of withdrawals. </T3>The agency proposes to require holdersof approved applications to notify FDA in writing when commercial distributionof a drug has been discontinued. Section 510(j)(2)(B) of the act requiresthe reporting of this information to FDA semi-annually as part of updatingdrug listing information. However, section 505(j)(6)(C) of the act requiresFDA to remove a drug from the list immediately if the drug has been withdrawnfrom sale for safety or effectiveness reasons. Under current regulations,a manufacturer that has voluntarily withdrawn a drug from sale may, atits discretion, report the information when the discontinuance occurs (andSection;207.30).To permit FDA to satisfy its obligations under 505(j)(6)(C) of the actand to assure that ANDA's will not be approved for generic copies of listeddrugs that have been voluntarily withdrawn from sale for safety or effectivenessreasons, the agency is proposing to revise andSection; 314.81 to requirethe applicant to tell the agency as soon as commercial distribution ofa listed drug ceases, other than for temporary interruptions in the supplyof the drug. The proposed revision would require an applicant to submitto FDA on Form FDA-2657 (Drug Product Listing) a report whenever the applicantdiscontinues commercial marketing of an approved drug, other than for routine,temporary interruptions in the supply of the drug not caused by safetyor effectiveness concerns. The report would have to be submitted within15 working days of the discontinuance and include the following information:(1) the National Drug Code (NDC) number; (2) the identity of the drug productby established name and any proprietary name; (3) the new drug application(NDA) or abbreviated new drug application (ANDA) number; and (4) the dateof discontinuance. The applicant may state the reason for its decisionto withdraw the drug from sale. The proposed regulation would require thereport to be submitted to the Drug Listing Branch (HFD-315), Center forDrug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 5600 FishersLane, Rockville, MD 20857.P. Removing Drugs from the ListSection 505(j)(6)(C) of the act requires that FDA remove from the listany drug that was withdrawn or suspended for grounds described in the firstsentence of section 505(e) or in section 505(j)(5) of the act, or thatthe agency determines was voluntarily withdrawn for safety or effectivenessreasons. The statute requires that removal occur immediately after theagency orders suspension or withdrawal or upon the agency's determinationthat the drug was voluntarily withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons.The only procedural requirement imposed by the statute is that the agencypublish a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> announcing the removal.The agency is proposing to combine the procedures for removal of drugsfrom the list with the procedures already in place for the withdrawal andsuspension of listed drugs, and for a determination of the reasons fora voluntary withdrawal. The publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of the agency's final decision withdrawing orsuspending a listed drug, or of the agency's decision determining thatthe drug was voluntarily withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasonswill also announce the removal of the drug from the list (proposed andSection;andSection;314.152, 314.153(b)(5), and 314.161).Q. Patent Information in Full New Drug Applications and Supplements1. <T3>Introduction. </T3>Sections 505(b)(1) and 505(c)(2) of the act requirethat an NDA applicant ``file with its application the patent number andthe expiration date of any patent which claims the drug for which the applicantsubmitted the application or which claims a method of using such drug andwith respect to which a claim of patent infringement could reasonably beasserted if a person not licensed by the owner engaged in the manufacture,use, or sale of the drug.'' This provision requires that an applicant submitinformation about any patent that meets the statutory description whetheror not the applicant owns or is licensed under such a patent. Requiredpatent information must be submitted with all original applications submittedunder section 505(b) of the act, including applications described in section505(b)(2) of the act and with certain supplemental applications. Upon approvalof the application, the statute requires that FDA publish patent informationsubmitted under section 505(b) of the act. Patent information on unapprovedproducts or on patents beyond the scope of the act (i.e., process patents)will not be published. Proposed new andSection; 314.53 would contain theregulations implementing the statutory provision requiring the submissionof patent information. FDA also proposes to revise andSection; 314.50 bydesignating paragraph (h) as paragraph (k) and adding a new paragraph (h)that would refer to the requirements of proposed new andSection; 314.53.2. <T3>Patents for which information must be submitted. </T3>The patents thatFDA regards as covered by this statutory provision are those that claimthe drug (active ingredient or ingredients) or drug product, and use patentsfor a particular indication or method of using the product. The agencyhas concluded that formulation and composition patents are drug productpatents within the meaning of this statutory provision about which informationmust be submitted to and published by FDA. Process patents (patents thatclaim a method of manufacturing) are not covered by the statute and informationon these patents are not to be submitted and will not be published by FDA.The agency will not accept patent information that pre-dates an officialnotice by the United States Patent and Trademark Office that a patent hasbeen granted. Thus, an applicant should not anticipate the granting ofa patent. The applicant may informally notify the agency of an impendingpatent, but no official action will be taken in response to such notice.3. <T3>Reporting requirements. </T3>The agency proposes in andSection; 314.53(c)that each required submission of patent information contain the patentnumber, the date on which the patent will expire, a statement as to whetherthe patent is a drug patent, drug product patent, or use patent, and thename of the patent owner. Identifying the type of patent will assist theagency in assuring that those types of patents that require a certificationby a generic applicant have such certification and that use patents areclearly identified for publishing in the list. Under this proposal, ifthe patent owner or applicant does not reside or have a place of businessin the United States, the application would be required to include thename of an agent (representative) of the patent owner or applicant whoresides or maintains a place of business within the United States authorizedto receive notice of patent certification under sections 505(b)(3) and505(j)(2)(B) of the act.As noted above, information will be published in the list only on patentsthat claim approved drug products or that claim approved indications orother conditions of use. Therefore, to assist the agency in ensuring thatonly appropriate patents are published for patents that claim a drug, drugproduct, or method of use an applicant would submit information only onthose patents that claim an approved drug product or approved method ofusing such drug product, or drug product or a method of using such drugor drug product for which the applicant has submitted an application toobtain FDA approval. The patent information for each formulation or composition(drug product) patent would be required to include the following certification:<ITAG tagnum="21">The undersigned certifies that the drug and the formulation or compositionof (<T3>name of drug product</T3>) is claimed by Patent No. <T2>XXXXXX</T2>. This product is (<T3>currently approved under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, andCosmetic Act) </T3>[<T3>or</T3>] <T3>(the subject of this application for which approval is being sought</T3>).</ITAG>Under the proposal, an applicant would, before approval of the application,submit a certification for each formulation or composition patent thatclaimed the drug product for which the applicant was seeking approval.Because formulations are often changed during the approval process, within30 days after the date of approval of the application, if the originalapplication submission included a certification about a formulation orcomposition patent, the applicant would be required to submit an amendedcertification identifying the patents that claim the approved formulationor composition of the drug product. If an approved formulation is changedby an applicant through the submission and approval of a supplemental applicationand an existing formulation patent no longer claims the new approved formulation,the new drug application holder must notify FDA so that the patent canbe removed from the list. Similarly, FDA should be notified if a patentholder no longer intends to enforce a patent, for example, because thepatent is no longer valid. This will assist the agency in maintaining accuratepatent information in its list and generic applicants in complying withthe patent certification requirements under sections 505(b)(2) and 505(j)of the act.With respect to a use patent, the agency proposes to require an applicantto submit a certification that identifies each patent that claims indicationsor conditions of use that are approved or are the subject of the applicationfor which the applicant is seeking approval. Because all indications orconditions of use for which an applicant sought approval may not be approved,within 30 days after the date of approval of the application, if the originalapplication submission included a certification about a method of use patent,the applicant would be required to submit an amended certification identifyingthe approved indications or conditions of use and the patents that claimthose uses. The purpose of this requirement is to provide some guidanceto applicants required to submit either a patent certification under section505(b)(2)(A) or 505(j)(2)(A)(vii) or a statement under section 505(b)(2)(B)or 505(j)(2)(A)(viii) of the act (proposed andSection; 314.94(a)(12)). Whena generic applicant concludes that a use patent does not claim the usefor which the applicant seeks approval, the applicant is required onlyto submit a statement under section 505(b)(2)(B) or 505(j)(2)(A)(viii)so stating to FDA. The applicant is not required to notify the patent ownerof the applicant's intent to market a copy of the patented drug. If thepatent owner does not specify which approved indications or conditionsof use are covered by its patent, the generic applicant may interpret thescope of the patent more narrowly than would the patent owner, therebyavoiding the certification and notification provisions of the statute.FDA's experience implementing the patent certification provisions suggeststhat where the patent owner and generic applicant disagree as to the applicabilityof a use patent, the patent owner may seek to have FDA intervene, by allegingthat the generic applicant has not complied with the patent certificationand notification provisions of the act. Because FDA has no expertise inthe field of patents, the agency has no basis for determining whether ause patent covers the use sought by the generic applicant. Nor does FDAbelieve that Congress intended the patent provisions of Title I of the1984 Amendments to require the agency to make such determinations. On thecontrary, the 1984 Amendments are plainly structured to allow any patentdisputes to be litigated in federal court. To ensure that FDA is not requiredto determine the scope of a use patent, the agency can either require theapplicant to make a certification as to the covered approved indicationsand require generic applicants to file patent certifications as to thoseindications, or the agency can allow the generic applicant complete discretionto interpret the scope of any relevant use patent. The agency believesthat the first approach more fairly implements Congress' intent that patentowners receive preapproval notice of potentially infringing products.FDA therefore proposes that after approval of an application submittedunder section 505 of the act that contained a certification that a methodof use patent covered an indication for which the applicant sought approval,the applicant would be required to amend its certification to identifythe specific indications or conditions of use that have been approved andthe patents that claim those uses. If the applicant is not the patent owner,the applicant should obtain this amended certification from the patentowner, because the applicant has the responsibility for providing FDA withthe required patent information. Upon approval of an application, the agencywill publish in the list all use patents that claim an approved indicationand for each patent identify the approved indications or conditions ofuse covered by the patent.The proposal also would require that if an applicant believes that thereare no patents that claim the drug or drug product, nor that claim an approvedmethod of using the drug product and with respect to which a claim of patentinfringement could reasonably be asserted if a person not licensed by theowner of the patent engaged in the manufacture, use, or sale of the drugproduct, the applicant would include in its application a certificationstating this belief.Finally, under proposed andSection; 314.53, a certification required underthe section must be signed by the applicant or patent owner, or the applicant'sor patent owner's attorney, agent (representative), or other authorizedofficial.4. <T3>When and where to submit patent information. </T3>If a patent is issuedon a drug or drug product or on a method of using a drug product beforean application is filed with FDA, information on the patent must be submittedwith the application. If a patent is issued after an application is filedwith FDA but before the application is approved, the applicant must submitthe required patent information in an amendment to the application underandSection; 314.60. If a patent is issued after the application has beenapproved, the applicant must submit the required patent information byletter within 30 days of the date of issuance of the patent.The act and proposed regulations contemplate amendment of an applicationwhen a patent is issued after submission, and before approval, of a fullapplication. If a patent has not been submitted to FDA by the time FDAdetermines that an abbreviated new drug application or a 505(b)(2) applicationcan be approved, and the generic applicant certifies that it is unawareof any relevant patents, the agency will not delay approval of the application.If the holder of a new drug application submits patent information afterthe application for the generic drug has already been approved, FDA willnot attempt to rescind or withdraw approval.Holders of or applicants for ANDA's or 505(b)(2) applications who are licensedunder a patent are encouraged to submit information concerning the patentlicense so that information on the patent can be listed with their productsas well as with the patent owner's product, thus assuring that the patentprotection features of the act are preserved for that patent. Licenseesare also required to submit information concerning a patent licensing agreementif they wish to avoid a delayed effective date. (See proposed andSection;314.107(b)(1).)In general, supplements are subject to the same patent submission requirementsas original applications. Many supplements, however, are for changes thatcould not be patented. Rather than require patent submissions for everysupplement, the agency proposes to require that patent information be submittedonly for the following types of changes for which applicants must submitsupplements: (1) changes in formulation; (2) new indications or other conditionsof use, including a change in route of administration; (3) changes in strength;or (4) any other patented changes. FDA recognizes that there are formulationchanges that are unpatentable and could be specifically excluded from therequirement of submitting patent information. However, FDA does not havethe expertise to identify such unpatentable formulation changes. FDA solicitscomments on this policy of requiring patent information only for certainsupplements, and on the types of supplements for which patent informationshould be required.Under the proposal, if new patents or existing patents cover the changesfor which approval is sought in a supplement, the applicant would be requiredto submit the required patent information with the supplement. If existingpatents for which information has already been submitted claim the change,the applicant would be required to submit a certification with the supplementidentifying the patents that claim the change. If the applicant submitsa supplement for one of the changes listed above and no patents, includingpreviously submitted patents, claim the change, the applicant would berequired to so certify. The patent information and certifications wouldbe required to be submitted by letter separate from, but at the same timeas, the supplement.The agency proposes to require an applicant to submit two copies of eachsubmission of patent information; an archival copy and a copy for the chemistry,manufacturing and controls section of the review copy of an applicationor supplement. The regulations would require the applicant to submit patentinformation to the Central Document Room, Center for Drug Evaluation andResearch, Food and Drug Administration, Park Bldg., Rm. 214, 12420 ParklawnDr., Rockville, MD 20857. Each submission of patent information, exceptinformation submitted with an original application, and its mailing coverwould be required to bear prominent identification as to its contents,i.e., ``Patent Information'' or, if submitted after approval of the application,``Time Sensitive Patent Information.''5. <T3>Untimely submission.</T3> PMA suggested regulatory language designedto allow a pioneer holder to update, at any time, its patent information.FDA does not believe that specific regulatory language is necessary. Ifpatent information on a patent issued after approval of an applicationis not timely submitted, i.e., is submitted more than 30 days after issuanceof the patent, the agency could refuse to publish in the list the untimelyinformation, or could withdraw approval of the new drug application ifits applicant failed to respond within 30 days to a notice from the agency(21 U.S.C. 355(e)(4)). FDA has concluded, however, that while Congressclearly intended to enforce timely submission, a less severe penalty forlate submission would effectuate Congress' intent without eliminating allstatutory patent protection or withdrawing approval of the new drug applicationitself. Therefore, if a new drug application applicant submits requiredpatent information on an approved drug product more than 30 days afterissuance of the patent, FDA will publish the untimely information but willnot require ANDA and 505(b)(2) applicants with pending applications whohave previously submitted a certification, i.e., those applicants who wouldbe prejudiced by the late submission, to recertify as to the new patent.Only applicants who initially submit ANDA's or 505(b)(2) applications afterthe submission of the patent information or whose pending applicationsdo not contain a valid certification at the time of the submission wouldbe required to submit a certification as to that patent. (See proposedandSection;andSection; 314.50(i)(4) and 314.94(a)(12)(vi).)The date that the patent information is received by the Central DocumentRoom will generally be considered the date the information was submitted.Determining the date on which patent information is submitted is importantbecause ANDA and 505(b)(2) applicants are required to notify a patent ownerof the submission of an application for a potentially infringing drug productonly if information on the patent has been submitted to FDA before approvalof the ANDA or 505(b)(2) application. If questions arise as to whetherpatent information has been submitted, FDA will review the archival recordsin the Central Document Room. If there is no evidence then that patentinformation has been submitted, no patent information will be consideredto have been submitted.6. <T3>Submission errors.</T3> In deciding whether a claim of patent infringementcould reasonably be asserted if a person not licensed by the owner engagedin the manufacture, use, or sale of the drug, the agency will defer tothe information submitted by the NDA applicant. If any interested persondisputes the accuracy or relevance of patent information submitted by anNDA applicant and published by FDA in the list, or believes that an applicanthas failed to submit required patent information, that person should firstnotify the agency informally, stating the grounds for the disagreementby writing to the Director, Office of Drug Standard (HFD-200), 5600 FishersLane, Rockville, MD 20857. The agency will contact the new drug applicationholder requesting that the correctness of the submission or omission beconfirmed. Unless the new drug application holder withdraws or changesthe patent submission, the agency will not change the patent informationin the list. If there is no change to the patent information in the list,a section 505(b)(2) or 505(j) application submitted for the drug must,despite any disagreement, contain a certification for each listed patentand any patent challenge must then be pursued through private legal actionunder the patent laws.The agency proposes to revise andSection; 314.125 to add an additional reasonfor refusing to approve a new drug application. Under section 505(d)(6)of the act, the agency is obligated to refuse to approve an applicationif the application failed to contain the required patent information.The agency proposes to revise andSection; 314.150 to add an additional groundfor the withdrawal of approval of a new drug application. As noted above,the statute provides that the agency is obligated to withdraw approvalof an application if the application fails to contain the required patentinformation within 30 days after receipt of a written notice from FDA specifyingthe failure to provide such information. Although ordinarily the agencyintends to invoke a less severe penalty for late submissions (see discussionunder section 0.5., FDA has the authority to withdraw approval of an applicationif an applicant has been notified of its failure to provide required patentinformation and the applicant does not respond within 30 days.R. Public Disclosure of Safety and Effectiveness DataSection 505(l) of the act specifies when safety and effectiveness datasubmitted as part of a new drug application are publicly disclosable. Thoseprovisions were implemented by the agency's final rule published in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> of February 22, 1985 (50 FR 7452) that revised21 CFR Part 314 governing the approval for marketing of new drugs and antibioticdrugs for human use. No changes to those provisions are being made by thisproposed rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Conforming Amendments</ITAG>21 CFR 310.305 requires adverse drug experience reporting for marketedprescription drugs not the subject of approved new drug or abbreviatednew drug applications. Those rules were patterned after the adverse drugexperience reporting provisions under 21 CFR 314.80. To ensure consistencybetween these two sets of rules, the agency is proposing to revise andSection;310.305 to adopt changes identical to those proposed in this document forandSection; 314.80 concerning the definition of the term ``adverse drug experience''and reports on increased frequency of therapeutic failure (lack of affect).The provisions of the 1984 Amendments with respect to bioequivalence, FDA'sfollowup to the Bioequivalence Hearing held September 29 through October1, 1986, and current agency policy necessitate changes in the regulationsin 21 CFR Part 320. In 21 CFR Part 320, FDA proposes to revise the table of contents to reflectthe changes described below. In andSection; 320.1, FDA proposes to (1) revise the definition of ``bioavailability''to add a reference to drugs that are not intended to be absorbed, (2) restatethe definition of ``bioequivalence,'' and (3) remove the definition of``bioequivalence requirement.'' In andSection; 320.21, FDA proposes to restate the requirements for submissionof bioavailability and bioequivalence data. In andSection; 320.22, FDA proposes to revise paragraph (b)(1) to restatethe waiver provision and to remove the automatic waiver of evidence ofin vivo bioavailability for topically applied preparations (andSection; 320.22(b)(2))and oral dosage forms not intended to be absorbed (andSection; 320.22(b)(3))because the agency believes the in vivo bioavailability of such productsshould not be considered self-evident in every case. Variations in themanufacturing process (including a change in product formulation) usedby each individual manufacturer may result in differences in the bioavailabilityof these drug products. Therefore, the agency intends to review each producton a case-by-case basis to determine if an in vivo bioavailability studyis necessary. It should be emphasized, however, that although the automatic waiver provisionsunder andSection; 320.22 would no longer apply to topical drug products andoral dosage forms not intended to be absorbed, the agency may, in appropriatecases, waive the in vivo requirement. In andSection; 320.22(b)(4)(i) (proposed andSection; 320.22(b)(2)), FDA proposesto delete the words ``or vapor.'' These words have been inaccurately interpretedby applicants to apply to aerosol drug products. In andSection; 320.22(b)(5)(ii) (proposed andSection; 320.22(b)(3)), FDA proposesto require that the active drug ingredient be in the same concentrationand dosage form. This change conforms to current agency policy. Current andSection; 320.22(c)(1) states that FDA shall waive the requirementof in vivo bioavailability testing for a solid oral dosage form (otherthan an enteric-coated or controlled release dosage form) of a drug productdetermined to be effective for at least one indication in a DESI notice,if the drug is not on the list of so-called ``bioproblem drugs'' codifiedin andSection; 320.22(c)(1). The waiver embodied in this provision resultedfrom the DESI review. During the review, because of the need to evaluatelarge numbers of products in a short time and in light of FDA's long experiencewith these drugs, FDA developed criteria for determining whether productsapproved before 1962 could be found bioequivalent on the basis of in vitrorather than in vivo data. (These criteria are codified in current andSection;320.52, proposed andSection; 320.32.) If, after applying the criteria, FDAdetermined that a drug presented an actual or potential bioequivalenceproblem, it was placed on the list of bioproblem drugs, and in vivo datawere required for approval. Those drugs that did not present such a problemcould satisfy the bioavailability/bioequivalence requirements by meetingan appropriate in vitro standard. There is no evidence that the policy of waiver of in vivo bioavailabilityfor those DESI oral dosage forms that do not present an actual or potentialbioequivalence problem has resulted in the approval of products that arenot bioequivalent. FDA has therefore concluded that there is no reasonto change the policy at this time. Proposed andSection; 320.22(d) will thuscontinue to provide for a waiver of in vivo studies for DESI oral dosageforms that do not present an actual or potential bioequivalence problem.The list of bioproblem drugs currently codified in the regulation, however,is no longer necessary. The 1984 Amendments provide that FDA shall publishin the list of approved drugs a statement of whether, for each drug, invitro or in vivo studies are required to show bioequivalence. (See section505(j)(6)(III) of the act.) FDA satisfies this requirement through theuse of therapeutic equivalence codes in the list. Thus, for each DESI product(as well as for each post-1962 product), the list provides notice of FDA'sdetermination whether the drug presents an actual or potential bioequivalenceproblem, requiring an in vivo study. Consequently, FDA's implementationof the requirement in section 505(j)(6)(III) of the act makes the codifiedlist of bioproblem drugs in andSection; 320.22(c)(2) superfluous. In addition, the list of bioproblem drugs, which has not been amended since1981, does not include all pre-1962 products that FDA currently believespresent an actual or potential bioequivalence problem. For example, a completelist of bioproblem drugs would also include products that are ``identical,related, or similar'' to those products on the list (See current andSection;320.22(c)(1)). In addition, since 1981, the agency has publicly identified,e.g., through <T4>Federal Register</T4> notices, additional drug products covered bythe DESI review that the agency has determined present actual or potentialbioequivalence problems, and that therefore require in vivo studies. FDA is therefore proposing to remove the list of bioproblem drugs fromexisting andSection; 320.22(c)(1), and to provide notice of in vitro or invivo study requirements for particular DESI drugs through the list. Asproposed, andSection; 320.22(d) (formerly andSection; 320.22(c)(1)) will continueto require FDA to waive in vivo studies for those DESI oral dosage formsthat FDA determines do not present an actual or potential bioequivalenceproblem, but those determinations will appear in the list rather than inthe regulation. If FDA determines that a DESI product previously considereda nonbioproblem drug should be reclassified as a bioproblem drug, FDA willprovide notice of its tentative conclusion in a monthly supplement to thelist and solicit comment. After considering any comments received, FDAwill make a final determination, which will be reflected in a subsequentmonthly supplement. In andSection; 320.22, FDA proposes to remove paragraphs (c)(3) and (d)(1)because they are no longer relevant. FDA no longer intends to establishseparate bioequivalence requirements for bioproblem drug products.In proposed andSection; 320.22(e) (formerly andSection; 320.22(d)), FDA proposesto revise paragraph (4) to clarify that the differences in color, flavor,or preservative could not affect the bioavailability of the reformulatedproduct.In proposed andSection; 320.22(e) (formerly andSection; 320.22(d)), FDA proposesto remove paragraph (d)(5). The agency has no evidence to show that invitro data alone are regularly sufficient to assure bioequivalence. Invitro testing can be used for drugs where there is a known in vivo/in vitrocorrelation, and has been used for pre-1962 drugs not suspected of having,or not likely to have, a bioavailability problem. For all other drug products,an in vivo bioequivalence study on the product is required to support atleast one strength of the product. Notice of FDA's determination whetherin vivo or in vitro studies are required to show bioequivalence is publishedin the list.In proposed andSection; 320.22(f), FDA proposes to modify the provision toclarify that deferral of a requirement for the submission of evidence ofin vivo bioavailability is applicable only to full new drug applications.Under the 1984 Amendments, there is no authority to defer a showing ofbioequivalence for abbreviated new drug applications.In andSection; 320.22, FDA proposes to add new paragraph (g) to state thatFDA, for good cause, may require evidence of in vivo bioavailability forany drug product if the agency determines that any difference between aproposed drug product and a listed drug may affect the bioavailabilty ofthe proposed drug product. For example, the generic applicant may use amanufacturing process (including a formulation change) different from thatused by the manufacturer of the listed drug, a difference that may affectthe proposed product's bioavailability.In andSection; 320.23, FDA proposes to revise the provision to refer to thestatutory standard for bioequivalence. In andSection; 320.24, FDA proposes to state the methods that may be usedto meet an in vivo or in vitro testing requirement.In andSection; 320.30, FDA proposes to revise the provisions to apply bothto inquiries about bioavailability and bioequivalence requirements. In andSection; 320.31, FDA proposes to clarify when an ``InvestigationalNew Drug Application'' is required for an in vivo bioavailability or bioequivalencestudy. Because the 1984 Amendments impose a bioequivalence requirement on alldrug products that are the subject of ANDA's, FDA no longer intends toestablish separate bioequivalence requirements for bioproblem drug products.Therefore, FDA proposes to amend its regulations in 21 CFR Part 320 underSubpart C by removing the subpart heading and those regulations that applyto establishing a bioequivalence requirement, and to revise the remainingregulations to delete any reference to establishing a bioequivalence requirement.The agency proposes to retain, move to Subpart B, and redesignate andSection;320.52 (proposed andSection; 320.32) <T3>Criteria and evidence to assess actual or potential bioequivalenceproblems, </T3>andSection; 320.55 (proposed andSection; 320.33) <T3>Requirements for batch testing and certification by the Food and DrugAdministration, </T3>andSection; 320.56 (proposed andSection; 320.34) <T3>Requirements for in vitro testing of each batch, </T3>and andSection;320.62 (proposed andSection; 320.35) <T3>Requirements for maintenance of records of bioequivalence testing.</T3>In addition, elsewhere in this issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, FDA is withdrawing 11 proposed rules that wouldhave established bioequivalence requirements for certain drug productslisted under existing andSection; 320.22(c). <ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Economic Assessment </ITAG>The agency has considered the economic impact of this rule, and the relationshipof the requirements in this rule with Pub. L. 98-417. The provisions inTitle I of Pub. L. 98-417 that eliminated unnecessary regulatory barriersfor duplicate products have demonstrated a capacity to achieve their intendedeconomic consequences. Generic competition has already commenced on manyimportant post-1962 drugs. Recent public reports of generic drug salesestimate their market share at nearly 25 percent of total prescriptiondrug sales. At least half of these generic sales may be post-1962 drugsthat would not have benefited from the price savings of multisource competitionwithout enactment of Pub. L. 98-417. Thus, this increased competition isalready saving consumers hundreds of millions of dollars per year. Theagency concludes that these impacts are directly attributable to the statute.This rule will not affect the pace or magnitude of these already evidenteconomic impacts. The procedures and interpretations provided by the rulewill clarify and facilitate implementation of Title I, but the rule byitself does not create a significant economic impact.Thus, the agency concludes that this rule is not a ``major rule'' as definedby Executive Order 12291 and does not require a regulatory impact analysis.Similarly, the agency certifies that this rule will not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities, and therefore,does not require a regulatory flexibility analysis under the RegulatoryFlexibility Act of 1980 (Pub. L. 96-354).<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Environmental Impact </ITAG>The agency has determined under 21 CFR 25.24(a)(8) that this proposed actionis of a type that does not individually or cumulatively have a significanteffect on the human environment. Therefore, neither an environmental assessmentnor an environmental impact statement is required.<ITAG tagnum="84">IX. Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980</ITAG>This proposed rule contains information collections which are subject toreview by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) under the PaperworkReduction Act of 1980. The title, description, and respondent descriptionof the information collection are shown below with an estimate of the annualreporting and recordkeeping burden. Included in the estimate is the timefor reviewing instructions, searching existing data sources, gatheringand maintaining the data needed, and completing and reviewing the collectionof information. <T3>Title: </T3>Abbreviated New Drug Application Regulations.<T3>Description: </T3>The information requirements contained in the proposedrule would collect information from persons who must obtain FDA approvalprior to marketing generic copies of previously approved drugs. These personsmust submit information in the form of applications, notices, and certifications.FDA will use the information submitted to determine whether the proposedgeneric drug is eligible for consideration, under what provisions an applicationwould be considered, and whether the proposed drug is identical to thepioneer drug it purports to copy. <T3>Description of Respondents: </T3>Businesses.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Estimated Annual Reporting and Recordkeeping Burden</T4><H1>Section </H1><H1>Annual number of respondents </H1><H1>Annual frequency</H1><H1>Average burden per response</H1><H1>Annual burden hours</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">314.50(g) <D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 hour </D><D>1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.50(i) <D>8 </D><D>1 </D><D>2 hours </D><D>16</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.50(j) <D>50 </D><D>1 </D><D>2 hours </D><D>100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.52 <D>30 </D><D>1 </D><D>8 hours </D><D>240</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.53 <D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 hour </D><D>200</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.54 <D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>80 hours </D><D>800</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.80, 310.305 <D>40 </D><D>1 </D><D>8 hours </D><D>320</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.81 <D>700 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 minutes </D><D>119</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.93 <D>82 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 hours </D><D>820</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.94 <D>850 </D><D>1 </D><D>160 hours </D><D>136,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.95 <D>30 </D><D>1 </D><D>16 hours </D><D>480</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.107 <D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>8 hours </D><D>80</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.110 <D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>40 hours </D><D>400</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">314.122, 314.161 <D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 hours </D><D>10</D><R>n,n,n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D/><D/><D/><D>139,586</D></ITAG></ITAG>The agency has submitted a copy of this proposed rule to OMB for its reviewof these information collections. Interested persons are requested to sendcomments regarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collectionof information, including suggestions for reducing this burden to, FDA'sDockets Management Branch (address above), and to the Office of Informationand Regulatory Affairs, OMB, Rm. 3208, New Executive Office Bldg., Washington,DC 20503, Attn: Desk Officer for FDA.<ITAG tagnum="84">X. Request for Comments</ITAG>Interested persons may, on or before October 10, 1989, submit to the DocketsManagement Branch (address above) written comments regarding this proposal.Two copies of any comments are to be submitted, except that individualsmay submit one copy. Comments are to be identified with the docket numberfound in brackets in the heading of this document. Received comments maybe seen in the office above between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>21 CFR Part 10Administrative practice and procedure, News media.21 CFR Part 310Administrative practice and procedure, Drugs, Medical devices, Reportingand recordkeeping requirements.21 CFR Part 314Administrative practice and procedure, Drugs, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements.21 CFR Part 320Drugs, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.Therefore, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and under authoritydelegated to the Commissioner, it is proposed that Parts 10, 310, 314,and 320 be amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 10_ADMINISTRATIVE PRACTICES AND PROCEDURES</ITAG>1. The authority citation for 21 CFR Part 10 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 201 <T3>et seq.,</T3> Pub. L. 717, 52 Stat. 1040 as amended (21 U.S.C. 321<T3>et seq.</T3>); sec. 1 <T3>et seq.,</T3> Pub. L. 410, 58 Stat. 682 as amended (42 U.S.C. 201 <T3>et seq.</T3>); sec. 4, Pub. L. 91-513, 84 Stat. 1241 (42 U.S.C. 257a);sec. 301 <T3>et seq.,</T3> Pub. L. 91-513, 84 Stat. 1253 (21 U.S.C. 821 <T3>et seq.</T3>); sec. 409(b), Pub. L. 242, 81 Stat. 600 (21 U.S.C. 679(b));sec. 24(b), Pub. L. 85-172, 82 Stat. 807 (21 U.S.C. 467f(b)); sec. 2 <T3>et seq.,</T3> Pub. L. 91-597, 84 Stat. 1620 (21 U.S.C. 1031 <T3>et seq.</T3>); secs. 1-9, Pub. L. 625, 44 Stat. 1101-1103 as amended(21 U.S.C. 141-149); secs. 1-10, Ch. 358, 29 Stat. 604-607 as amended (21U.S.C. 41-50); sec. 2 <T3>et seq.,</T3> Pub. L. 783, 44 Stat. 1406 as amended (15 U.S.C. 401<T3>et seq.</T3>); sec. 1 <T3>et seq.,</T3> Pub. L. 89-755, 80 Stat. 1296 as amended (15 U.S.C. 1451<T3>et seq.</T3>); sec. 101, Pub. L. 98-417, 98 Stat. 1585 (21 U.S.C. 355).</ITAG>2. Section 10.30 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph(e)(2) and by adding a new paragraph (e)(4) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 10.30 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Citizen petition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) * * *(2) Except as provided in paragraph (e)(4) of this section, the Commissionershall furnish a response to each petitioner within 180 days of receiptof the petition. The response will either:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) The Commissioner shall furnish a response to each petitioner within90 days of receipt of a petition filed under section 505(j)(2)(C) of theact. The response will either approve or disapprove the petition. Agencyaction on a petition shall be governed by andSection; 314.93 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>3. Section 10.45 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph(d) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 10.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Court review of final administrative action; exhaustion of administrativeremedies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) The Commissioner's final decision constitutes final agency action (reviewablein the courts under 5 U.S.C. 701 et seq. and, where appropriate, 28 U.S.C.2201) on a petition submitted under andSection; 10.25(a), on a petition forreconsideration submitted under andSection; 10.33, on a petition for stayof action submitted under andSection; 10.35, on an advisory opinion issuedunder andSection; 10.85, on a guideline issued under andSection; 10.90, ona matter involving administrative action which is the subject of an opportunityfor a hearing under andSection; 16.1(b) of this chapter, or on the issuanceof a final regulation published in accordance with andSection; 10.40, exceptthat the agency's response to a petition filed under section 505(j)(2)(C)of the act and andSection; 314.93 of this chapter will not constitute finalagency action until any petition for reconsideration submitted by the petitioneris acted on by the Commissioner.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 310_NEW DRUGS</ITAG>4. The authority citation for 21 CFR Part 310 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 501, 502, 503, 505, 701, 704, 705, 52 Stat. 1049-1053as amended, 52 Stat. 1055-1056 as amended, 67 Stat. 477 as amended, 52Stat. 1057-1058 (21 U.S.C. 351, 352, 353, 355, 371, 374, 375); 5 U.S.C.553; 21 CFR 5.10 and 5.11.</ITAG>5. Section 310.305 is amended by revising paragraph (a), by removing theword ``significant'' in paragraph (b)(2), by revising the first sentencein paragraph (c)(4) and by removing the words ``(Drug Experience Report)''and replacing them with ``(Adverse Reaction Report)'' in paragraph (d)(1),to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 310.305</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Records and reports concerning adverse drug experiences on marketedprescription drugs for human use without approved new drug applications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope.</T3> FDA is requiring manufacturers, packers, and distributorsof marketed prescription drug products that are not the subject of an approvednew drug or abbreviated new drug application to establish and maintainrecords and make reports to FDA of:(1) All serious, unexpected adverse drug experiences associated with theuse of their drug products,(2) Any significant increase in the frequency of a serious, expected adversedrug experience, and(3) Any significant increase in the frequency of therapeutic failure (lackof effect).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">These reports will enable FDA to protect the public health by helpingto monitor the safety of marketed drug products and to assure that thesedrug products are not adulterated or misbranded.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) * * *(4) Each person identified in paragraph (c)(1) of this section shall reviewperiodically (at least once each year) the frequency of reports of adversedrug experiences that are both serious and expected and reports of therapeuticfailure (lack of effect), received or otherwise obtained, and report anysignificant increase in frequency as soon as possible but in any case within15 working days of determining that a significant increase in frequencyexists.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 314_APPLICATIONS FOR FDA APPROVAL TO MARKET A NEW DRUG OR ANANTIBIOTIC DRUG</ITAG>6. Part 314 is amended by redesignating existing Subparts C, D, E, andF as Subparts D, E, F, and G, respectively, by adding new Subpart C, consistingof andSection;andSection; 314.92 through 314.99, and by revising the tableof contents and the authority citation to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.1 Scope of this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.2 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.50 Content and format of an application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.52 Notice of certification of invalidity or noninfringement ofa patent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.53 Submission of patent information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.54 Procedure for submission of an application requiring investigationsfor approval of a new indication for, or other change from, a listed drug.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.60 Amendments to an unapproved application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.65 Withdrawal by the applicant of an unapproved application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.70 Supplements and other changes to an approved application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.71 Procedures for submission of a supplement to an approved application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.72 Change in ownership of an application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.80 Postmarketing reporting of adverse drug experiences.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.81 Other postmarketing reports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.90 Waivers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Abbreviated Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.92 Drug products for which abbreviated applications may be submitted.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.93 Petition to request a change from a listed drug.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.94 Content and format of an abbreviated application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.95 Notice of certification of invalidity or noninfringement ofa patent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.96 Amendments to an unapproved abbreviated application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.97 Supplements and other changes to an approved abbreviated application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.98 Postmarketing reports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.99 Other responsibilities of an applicant of an abbreviated application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart D_FDA Action on Applications and Abbreviated Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.100 Time frames for reviewing applications and abbreviated applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.101 Filing an application and an abbreviated antibiotic applicationand receiving an abbreviated new drug application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.102 Communications between FDA and applicants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.103 Dispute resolution.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.104 Drugs with potential for abuse.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.105 Approval of an application and an abbreviated application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.106 Foreign data.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.107 Effective date of approval of a 505(b)(2) application or abbreviatednew drug application under section 505(j) of the act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.108 New drug product exclusivity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.110 Approvable letter to the applicant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.120 Not approvable letter to the applicant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.122 Submitting an application for, or a 505(j)(2)(C) petitionthat relies on, a listed drug that is no longer marketed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.125 Refusal to approve an application or abbreviated antibioticapplication.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.126 Adequate and well-controlled studies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.127 Refusal to approve an abbreviated new drug application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.150 Withdrawal of approval of an application or abbreviated application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.151 Withdrawal of approval of an abbreviated new drug applicationpursuant to section 505(j)(5) of the act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.152 Notice of withdrawal of approval of an application or abbreviatedapplication for a new drug.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.153 Suspension of approval of an abbreviated new drug application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.160 Approval of an application or abbreviated application forwhich approval was previously refused, suspended, or withdrawn.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.161 Determination of reasons for voluntary withdrawal of a listeddrug.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.162 Removal of a drug product from the list.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.170 Adulteration and misbranding of an approved drug.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Hearing Procedures for New Drugs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.200 Notice of opportunity for hearing; notice of participationand request for hearing; grant or denial of hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.201 Procedure for hearings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.235 Judicial review.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart F_Administrative Procedures for Antibiotics</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.300 Procedure for the issuance, amendment, or repeal of regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Miscellaneous Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.410 Imports and exports of new drugs and antibiotics.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.420 Drug master files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.430 Availability for public disclosure of data and informationin an application or abbreviated application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.440 Addresses for applications and abbreviated applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">314.445 Guidelines.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 501, 502, 503, 505, 506, 507, 701, 52 Stat. 1049-1053as amended, 1055-1056 as amended, 98 Stat. 1585, 55 Stat. 851, 59 Stat.463 as amended (21 U.S.C. 351, 352, 353, 355, 356, 357, 371); 21 CFR 5.10,5.11.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>7. Section 314.1 <T3>Scope of this part</T3> is amended in paragraphs (a)(1) and (2) byadding the phrase ``or abbreviated application'' after the word ``application''.8. Section 314.3 is amended by revising paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) The following definitions of terms apply to this part: ``Abbreviated application'' means the application described under andSection;314.94, including all amendments and supplements to the application. ``Abbreviatedapplication'' applies to both an abbreviated new drug application and anabbreviated antibiotic application. ``Act'' means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (sections 201-901,52 Stat. 1040 et seq., as amended (21 U.S.C. 301-392)). ``Applicant'' means any person who submits an application or abbreviatedapplication or an amendment or supplement to them under this part to obtainFDA approval of a new drug or an antibiotic drug and any person who ownsan approved application or abbreviated application. ``Application'' means the application described under andSection; 314.50,including all amendments and supplements to the application. ``Approvable letter'' means a written communication to an applicant fromFDA stating that the agency will approve the application or abbreviatedapplication if specific additional information or material is submittedor specific conditions are met. An approvable letter does not constituteapproval of any part of an application or abbreviated application and doesnot permit marketing of the drug that is the subject of the applicationor abbreviated application. ``Approval letter'' means a written communication to an applicant fromFDA approving an application or an abbreviated application. ``Drug product'' means a finished dosage form, for example, tablet, capsule,or solution, that contains a drug substance, generally, but not necessarily,in association with one or more other ingredients. ``Drug substance'' means an active ingredient that is intended to furnishpharmacological activity or other direct effect in the diagnosis, cure,mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or to affect the structureor any function of the human body, but does not include intermediates usedin the synthesis of such ingredient. ``FDA'' means the Food and Drug Administration. ``Listed drug'' means a new drug product that has been approved for safetyand effectiveness under section 505(c) or approved under section 505(j)of the act, the approval of which has not been withdrawn or suspended undersection 505(e) (1) through (5) or (j)(5) of the act, and which has notbeen withdrawn from sale for what FDA has determined are reasons of safetyor effectiveness. Listed drug status is evidenced by the drug product'sinclusion in the current edition of FDA's ``Approved Drug Products withTherapeutic Equivalence Evaluations'' (the list) or any current supplementto the list. A drug product is deemed to be included in the list on thedate of approval of the application or abbreviated application for thatdrug product. For a drug product that is subject to FDA's Drug EfficacyStudy Implementation (DESI) program, FDA will consider the applicable DESInotice published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a listed drug until a drug product subject tothe notice meets the conditions for approval of effectiveness set forthin the notice and becomes a listed drug. ``Not approvable letter'' means a written communication to an applicantfrom FDA stating that the agency does not consider the application or abbreviatedapplication approvable because one or more deficiencies in the applicationor abbreviated application preclude the agency from approving it. ``Reference listed drug'' means the listed drug identified in an abbreviatednew drug application or identified by FDA as the drug product upon whichan applicant relies in seeking approval of its abbreviated application.``Right of reference or use'' means the authority to rely upon, and otherwiseuse an investigation for the purpose of obtaining approval of an application,including the ability to make available the underlying raw data from theinvestigation for FDA audit, if necessary. ``The list'' means the current edition of FDA's publication ``ApprovedDrug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations'' and any currentsupplement to the publication. ``505(b)(2) application'' means an application submitted under section505(b)(1) of the act for a drug for which the investigations describedin section 505(b)(1)(A) and relied upon by the applicant for approval ofthe application were not conducted by or for the applicant and for whichthe applicant has not obtained a right of reference or use from the personby or for whom the investigations were conducted. 9. Section 314.50 is amended by revising the first and fifth sentencesin the introductory paragraph, paragraph (a)(2), the second sentence inparagraph (c)(1), by adding new paragraph (g)(3), by redesignating existingparagraph (h) as paragraph (k), and by adding new paragraphs (h), (i),and (j) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Content and format of an application. </ITAG>Applications and supplements to approved applications are required to besubmitted in the form and contain the information, as appropriate for theparticular submission, required under this section. * * * These includean application of the type described in section 505(b)(2) of the act, anamendment, and a supplement. * * * (a) * * * (2) A statement whether the submission is an original submission, a 505(b)(2)application, a resubmission, or a supplement to an application under andSection;314.70. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Summary.</T3> (1) * * * The summary is not required for supplementsunder andSection; 314.70. * * * <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(g) * * * (3) If an applicant who submits a new drug application under section 505(b)of the act obtains a ``right of reference or use,'' as defined under andSection;314.3(b), to an investigation described in clause (A) of section 505(b)(1)of the act, the applicant shall include in its application a written statementsigned by the owner of the data from each such investigation that the applicantmay rely on in support of the approval of its application, and provideFDA access to, the underlying raw data that provide the basis for the reportof the investigation submitted in its application. (h) <T3>Patent information.</T3> The application is required to contain thepatent information described under andSection; 314.53. (i) <T3>Patent certification</T3>_(1) <T3>Contents.</T3> A 505(b)(2) application is required to contain the following:(i) <T3>Patents claiming drug, drug product, or method of use. </T3>(<T3>a</T3>) Except as provided in paragraph (i)(2) of this section, a certificationwith respect to each patent issued by the United States Office of Patentand Trademark that, in the opinion of the applicant and to the best ofits knowledge, claims the drug or drugs on which investigations that arerelied upon by the applicant for approval of its application were conductedor that claims an approved use for such drug or drugs and for which informationis required to be filed under section 505 (b) and (c) of the act and andSection;314.53. For each such patent, the applicant shall provide the patent numberand certify, in its opinion and to the best of its knowledge, one of thefollowing circumstances: (<T3>1</T3>) That the patent information has not been submitted to FDA.The applicant shall entitle such a certification ``Paragraph I Certification'';(<T3>2</T3>) That the patent has expired. The applicant shall entitle sucha certification ``Paragraph II Certification''; (<T3>3</T3>) The date on which the patent will expire. The applicant shallentitle such a certification ``Paragraph III Certification''; or (<T3>4</T3>) That the patent is invalid or will not be infringed by themanufacture, use, or sale of the drug product for which the applicationis submitted. The applicant shall entitle such a certification ``ParagraphIV Certification.'' This certification shall be submitted in the followingform:<ITAG tagnum="21">I, (<T3>name of applicant</T3>), certify that Patent No. (<T3>is invalid or will not be infringed by the manufacture, use, or saleof</T3>) (<T3>name of proposed drug product</T3>) for which this application is submitted.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The certification shall be accompanied by a statement that the applicantwill comply with the requirements under andSection; 314.52(a) with respectto providing a notice to each owner of the patent or their representativesand to the holder of the approved application for the drug product whichis claimed by the patent or a use of which is claimed by the patent andwith the requirements under andSection; 314.52(c) with respect to the contentof the notice.(<T3>b</T3>) If the drug on which investigations that are relied upon bythe applicant were conducted is itself a licensed generic drug of a patenteddrug first approved under section 505(b) of the act, the appropriate patentcertification under this section with respect to each patent that claimsthe first-approved patented drug or that claims an approved use for suchdrug. (ii) <T3>No relevant patents.</T3> If, in the opinion of the applicant and tothe best of its knowledge, there are no patents described in paragraph(i)(1)(i) of this section, a certification in the following form:<ITAG tagnum="21">In the opinion and to the best knowledge of (<T3>name of applicant</T3>), there are no patents that claim the drug ordrugs on which investigations that are relied upon in this applicationwere conducted or that claim a use of such drug or drugs.</ITAG>(iii) <T3>Method of use patent.</T3> (<T3>a</T3>) If information that is submitted under section 505 (b) or (c)of the act and andSection; 314.53 is for a method of use patent, and thelabeling for the drug product for which the applicant is seeking approvaldoes not include any indications that are covered by the use patent, astatement explaining that the method of use patent does not claim any ofthe proposed indications.(<T3>b</T3>) If the labeling of the drug product for which the applicantis seeking approval includes an indication that, according to the patentinformation submitted under section 505 (b) or (c) of the act and andSection;314.53 or in the opinion of the applicant, is claimed by a use patent,the applicant shall submit an applicable certification under paragraph(i)(1)(i) of this section. (2) <T3>Method of manufacturing patent.</T3> An applicant is not required tomake a certification with respect to any patent that claims only a methodof manufacturing the drug product for which the applicant is seeking approval.(3) <T3>Licensing agreements.</T3> If a 505(b)(2) application is for a drugor method of using a drug claimed by a patent and the applicant has a licensingagreement with the patent owner, the applicant shall submit a certificationunder paragraph (i)(1)(i)(<T3>a</T3>)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section (``Paragraph IV Certification'') as to thatpatent and a statement that it has been granted a patent license. If thepatent owner consents to an immediate effective date upon approval of the505(b)(2) application, the application shall contain a written statementfrom the patent owner that it has a licensing agreement with the applicantand that it consents to an immediate effective date. (4) <T3>Late submission of patent information.</T3> If a patent described inparagraph (i)(1)(i)(<T3>a</T3>) of this section is issued and the holder of the approved applicationfor the patented drug does not submit the required information on the patentwithin 30 days of issuance of the patent, an applicant who submitted a505(b)(2) application that before the submission of the patent informationcontained an appropriate patent certification is not required to submitan amended certification. An applicant whose 505(b)(2) application is filedafter a late submission of patent information or whose 505(b)(2) applicationwas previously filed but did not contain an appropriate patent certificationat the time of the patent submission shall submit a certification underparagraph (i)(1)(i) or (ii) or a statement under paragraph (i)(1)(iii)of this section as to that patent. (5) <T3>Disputed patent information.</T3> If an applicant disputes the accuracyor relevance of patent information submitted to FDA, the applicant mayseek a confirmation of the correctness of the patent information in accordancewith the procedures under andSection; 314.53(f). Unless the patent informationis withdrawn or changed, the applicant must submit an appropriate certificationfor each relevant patent. (6) <T3>Amended certifications.</T3> A certification submitted under paragraphs(i)(1)(i) through (iii) of this section may be amended at any time beforethe effective date of the approval of the application. An applicant shallsubmit an amended certification as an amendment to a pending applicationor by letter to an approved application. Once an amendment or letter forthe change in certification has been submitted, the application will nolonger be considered to be one containing the prior certification. (i) <T3>After finding of infringement.</T3> An applicant who has submitteda certification under paragraph (i)(1)(i)(<T3>a</T3>)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section and is sued for patent infringement within45 days of the receipt of notice sent under andSection; 314.52, shall amendthe certification if a final judgment in the action is entered findingthe patent to be infringed. In the amended certification, the applicantshall certify under paragraph (i)(1)(i)(<T3>a</T3>)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section that the patent will expire on a specific date.(ii) <T3>After removal of a patent from the list. </T3>If a patent is removedfrom the list for any reason other than because the patent has been declaredinvalid in a lawsuit brought within 45 days of a notice issued under andSection;314.52, after one or more applicants have made certifications under paragraph(i)(1)(i)(<T3>a</T3>)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section on that patent, any applicant with a pendingapplication or delayed effective date who has made such a certificationshall amend the certification. In the amended certification, the applicantshall certify under paragraph (i)(1)(ii) of this section, if applicable,that no patents described in paragraph (i)(1)(i) of this section claimthe drug. If other relevant patents claim the drug, the applicant shallinstead submit a request to withdraw the certification under paragraph(i)(1)(i)(<T3>a</T3>)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section. (iii) <T3>Other amendments.</T3> (<T3>a</T3>) Except as provided in paragraphs (i)(4) and (i)(6)(iii)(<T3>b</T3>) of this section, an applicant shall amend a submitted certificationif, at any time before the effective date of the approval of the application,the applicant learns that the submitted certification is no longer accurate.(<T3>b</T3>) An applicant is not required to amend a submitted certificationwhen information on an otherwise applicable patent is submitted after the505(b)(2) application is approved, whether or not the approval of the abbreviatedapplication is effective. (j) <T3>Claimed exclusivity.</T3> A new drug product, upon approval, may beentitled to a period of marketing exclusivity under the provisions of andSection;314.108. If an applicant believes its drug product is entitled to a periodof exclusivity, it shall submit to the new drug application prior to approvalthe following information: (1) A statement that the applicant is claiming exclusivity. (2) A reference to the appropriate paragraph under andSection; 314.108 thatsupports its claim. (3) If the applicant claims exclusivity under andSection; 314.108(b)(2),information to show that no drug has previously been approved under section505(b) of the act containing any active moiety in the drug for which theapplicant is seeking approval. (4) If the applicant claims exclusivity under andSection; 314.108(b)(4) or(5), the following information to show that the clinical investigationsin its application are ``new clinical investigations,'' ``essential toapproval of the application or supplement,'' and were ``conducted or sponsoredby the applicant'': (i) ``<T3>New clinical lnvestigations.</T3>'' A certification that to the bestof the applicant's knowledge the clinical investigations included in theapplication meet the definitions of ``new'' and ``clinical investigations''set forth in andSection; 314.108(a).(ii) ``<T3>Essential to approval.</T3>'' A list of all published studies or publiclyavailable reports of clinical investigations known to the applicant througha literature search that are relevant to the conditions for which the applicantis seeking approval, a certification that the applicant has thoroughlysearched the scientific literature and, to the best of the applicant'sknowledge, the list is complete and accurate and, in the applicant's opinion,such published studies or publicly available reports do not provide a sufficientbasis for the approval of the conditions for which the applicant is seekingapproval without reference to the new clinical investigation(s) in theapplication, and an explanation as to why the studies or reports are insufficient.(iii) ``<T3>Conducted or sponsored by.</T3>'' If the applicant was the sponsornamed in the Form FDA-1571 for an investigational new drug (IND) underwhich the new clinical investigation(s) that is essential to the approva1of its application was conducted, identification of the IND by number.If the applicant was not the sponsor of the IND under which the clinicalinvestigation(s) was conducted, a certification that the applicant or itspredecessor in interest provided substantial support for the clinical investigation(s)that is essential to the approval of its application, and information supportingthe certification. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>10. New andSection;andSection; 314.52, 314.53, and 314.54 are added to SubpartB to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of certification of invalidity or noninfringement of a patent.</ITAG>(a) For each patent which claims the drug or drugs on which investigationsthat are relied upon by the applicant for approval of its application wereconducted or which claims a use for such drug or drugs and which the applicantcertifies under andSection; 314.50(i)(1)(i)(<T3>a</T3>)(<T3>4</T3>) that a patent is invalid or will not be infringed, the applicantshall send notice of such certification by registered or certified mail,return receipt requested to each of the following persons: (1) Each owner of the patent that is the subject of the certification orthe representative designated by the owner to receive the notice. The nameand address of the patent owner or its representative may be obtained fromthe United States Patent and Trademark Office; and (2) The holder of the approved application under section 505(b) of theact for each drug product which is claimed by the patent or a use of whichis claimed by the patent and for which the applicant is seeking approval,or, if the application holder does not reside or maintain a place of businesswithin the United States, the application holder's attorney, agent, orother authorized official. The name and address of the application holderor its attorney, agent, or authorized official may be obtained from theDivision of Drug Information Resources (HFD-80), Center for Drug Evaluationand Research, Food and Drug Administration, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville,MD 20857. (3) This paragraph does not apply to a use patent that claims no uses forwhich the applicant is seeking approval. (b) The applicant shall send the notice required by paragraph (a) of thissection when it receives from FDA an acknowledgment letter stating thatits application has been filed. At the same time, the appIicant shall amendits application to include a statement certifying that the notice has beenprovided to each person identified under paragraph (a) of this sectionand that the notice met the content requirement under paragraph (c) ofthis section. (c) <T3>Content of a notice. </T3>In the notice, the applicant shall cite section505(b)(3)(B) of the act and shall include, but not be limited to, the followinginformation: (1) A statement that a 505(b)(2) application submitted by the applicanthas been filed by FDA. (2) The application number. (3) The established name, if any, as defined in section 502(e)(3) of theact, of the proposed drug product. (4) The active ingredient, strength, and dosage form of the proposed drugproduct. (5) The patent number and expiration date, as submitted to the agency oras known to the applicant, of each patent alleged to be invalid or notinfringed.(6) A detailed statement of the factual and legal basis of the applicant'sopinion that the patent is not valid or will not be infringed. The applicantshall include in the detailed statement: (i) For each claim of a patent alleged not to be infringed, an explanationof why the claim is not infringed. (ii) For each claim of a patent alleged to be invalid, an explanation ofthe grounds supporting the allegation, including all statutory bases, affirmativedefenses, reasoning, and evidence supporting the allegation, citing anyrelevant case precedent upon which the allegation is based, providing acopy of any patent or publication which is alleged to invalidate such claimand the reasons supporting such allegation. (iii) For formulation or composition patents, a description of a mechanismthrough which the applicant agrees to make the formulation or compositionof the proposed drug product known to the patent owner or to a designatedintermediary who will act as a referee. (7) If the applicant does not reside or have a place of business in theUnited States, the name and address of an agent in the United States authorizedto accept service of process for the applicant. (d) <T3>Amendment to an application. </T3>If an application is amended to includethe certification described in andSection; 314.50(i), the applicant shallsend the notice required by paragraph (a) of this section at the same timethat the amendment to the application is submitted to FDA.(e) <T3>Documentation of receipt of notice. </T3>The applicant shall amendits application to document receipt of the notice required under paragraph(a) of this section by each person provided the notice. The applicant shallinclude a copy of the return receipt or other similar evidence of the datethe notification was received. FDA will accept as adequate documentationof the date of receipt a return receipt or a letter acknowledging receiptby the person provided the notice. An applicant may rely on another formof documentation only if FDA has agreed to such documentation in advance.A copy of the notice itself need not be submitted to the agency. (f) If the above requirements are met, the agency will presume the noticeto be complete and sufficient, and it will count the day following thedate of receipt of the notice by the patent owner or its representativeor by the approved application holder if the holder is an exclusive patentlicensee as the first day of the 45-day period provided for in section505(c)(3)(C) of the act. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.53</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submission of patent information. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Who must submit patent information. </T3>This section applies to anyapplicant who submits to FDA a new drug application or an amendment toit under section 505(b) of the act and andSection; 314.50 or a supplementto an approved application under andSection; 314.70, except as provided inparagraph (d)(2) of this section. (b) <T3>Patents for which information must be submitted.</T3> An applicantdescribed in paragraph (a) of this section shall submit information oneach patent that claims the drug or a method of using the drug that isthe subject of the new drug application or amendment or supplement to itand with respect to which a claim of patent infringement could reasonablybe asserted if a person not licensed by the owner of the patent engagedin the manufacture, use, or sale of the drug product. For purposes of thispart, such patents consist of drug (ingredient) patents, drug product (formulationand composition) patents, and method of use patents. Process patents arenot covered by this section and information on process patents may notbe submitted to FDA. For patents that claim a drug or drug product, theapplicant shall submit information only on those patents that claim anapproved drug product or a drug product for which the applicant has submittedan application to obtain FDA approval. For patents that claim a methodof use, the applicant shall submit information only on those patents thatclaim approved indications or other conditions of use or that claim indicationsor other conditions of use for which the applicant is seeking approvalin an application. (c) <T3>Reporting requirements. </T3>(1) <T3>General requirements. </T3>An applicant described in paragraph (a)of this section shall submit the following information for each patentdescribed in paragraph (b) of this section:(i) Patent number and the date on which the patent will expire. (ii) Type of patent, i.e., drug, drug product, or method of use. (iii) Name of the patent owner. (iv) If the patent owner or applicant does not reside or have a place ofbusiness within the United States, the name of an agent (representative)of the patent owner or applicant who resides or maintains a place of businesswithin the United States authorized to receive notice of patent certificationunder sections 505(b)(3) and 505(j)(2)(B) of the act and andSection;andSection;314.52 and 314.95. (2) <T3>Formulation or composition patents. </T3>(i) <T3>Original certification. </T3>For each formulation or composition patent,in addition to the patent information described in paragraph (c)(1) ofthis section the applicant shall submit the following certification: <ITAG tagnum="21">The undersigned certifies that the drug and the formulation or compositionof <T3>(name of drug product)</T3> is claimed by Patent No. <T2>XXXXXXXX</T2>. This product is <T3>(currently approved under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, andCosmetic Act) [or] (the subject of this application for which approvalis being sought). </T3></ITAG>(ii) <T3>Amendment of patent information upon approval. </T3>Within 30 daysafter the date of approval of its application, if the application containeda certification required under paragraph (c)(2)(i) of this section, theapplicant shall by letter amend the certification to identify each patentthat claims the formulation and composition that has been approved. (3) <T3>Method of use patents.</T3>_(i) <T3>Original certification. </T3>For a patent that claims a method of usingthe drug product, the patent information described in paragraph (c)(1)of this section shall be accompanied by the following certification thatidentifies each relevant patent that claims indications or other conditionsof use that are approved or are the subject of the application for whichapproval is being sought: <ITAG tagnum="21">The undersigned certifies that Patent No. <T2>XXXXXXXX</T2> covers the use of <T3>(name of drug product)</T3> that is <T3>(approved) [or] (the subject of this application for which approvalis being sought):</T3> <T2>XXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXX</T2>.</ITAG>(ii) <T3>Amendment of patent information upon approval. </T3>Within 30 daysafter the date of approval of its application, if the application containeda certification required under paragraph (c)(3)(i) of this section, theapplicant shall by letter amend the certification to identify the specificindications or other conditions of use that have been approved and eachpatent that claims the approved indications or other conditions of use.(4) <T3>No relevant patents. </T3>If the applicant believes that there areno patents which claim the drug or the drug product or which claim a methodof using the drug product and with respect to which a claim of patent infringementcould reasonably be asserted if a person not licensed by the owner of thepatent engaged in the manufacture, use, or sale of the drug product, itshall so certify. (5) <T3>Authorized signature. </T3>The certifications required by this sectionshall be signed by the applicant or patent owner, or the applicant's orpatent owner's attorney, agent (representative), or other authorized official.(d) <T3>When and where to submit patent information.</T3>_(1) <T3>Original application. </T3>An applicant shall submit with its originalapplication submitted under this part, including an application describedin section 505(b)(2) of the act, the information described in paragraph(c) of this section on each drug (ingredient), drug product (formulationand composition), and method of use patent issued before the applicationis filed with FDA and for which patent information is required to be submittedunder this section. If a patent is issued after the application is filedwith FDA but before the application is approved, the applicant shall submitthe required patent information in an amendment to the application underandSection; 314.60. (2) <T3>Supplements. </T3>(i) If a patent is issued for a drug, drug product,or method of use after an application is approved, the applicant shallsubmit to FDA the required patent information within 30 days of the dateof issuance of the patent. (ii) An applicant shall submit patent information required under paragraph(c) of this section for a patent that claims the product or method of usingthe product for which approval is sought in any of the following supplements:(A) To change the formulation; (B) To add a new indication or other condition of use, including a changein route of administration; (C) To change the strength; (D) To make any other patented change. (iii) If the applicant submits a supplement for one of the changes listedunder paragraph (d)(2)(ii) of this section and existing patents for whichinformation has already been submitted to FDA claim the changed product,the applicant shall submit a certification with the supplement identifyingthe patents that claim the changed product. (iv) If the applicant submits a supplement for one of the changes listedunder paragraph (d)(2)(ii) of this section and no patents, including previouslysubmitted patents, claim the changed product, it shall so certify. (v) The applicant shall comply with the requirements for amendment of formulationor composition and method of use patent information under paragraphs (c)(2)(ii)and (3)(ii) of this section.(3) The applicant shall submit two copies of each submission of patentinformation, an archival copy and a copy for the chemistry, manufacturingand controls section of the review copy, to the Central Document Room,Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration,Park Bldg. (Rm. 214), 12420 Parklawn Dr., Rockville, MD 20857. The applicantshall submit the patent information by letter separate from, but at thesame time as, submission of the supplement. (4) Patent information shall be considered to be submitted to FDA as ofthe date the information is received by the Central Document Room. (5) Each submission of patent information, except information submittedwith an original application, and its mailing cover shall bear prominentidentification as to its contents, i.e., ``Patent Information,'' or, ifsubmitted after approval of an application, ``Time Sensitive Patent Information.''(e) <T3>Public disclosure of patent information. </T3>FDA will publish in thelist the patent number and expiration date of each patent that is requiredto be, and is, submitted to FDA by an applicant, and for each use patent,the approved indications or other conditions of use covered by a patentand any unapproved indications or condition of use to which the applicantcertified. FDA will publish such patent information upon approval of theapplication, or, if the patent information is submitted by the applicantafter approval of an application as provided under paragraph (d)(2) ofthis section, as soon as possible after the submission to the agency ofthe patent information. Patent information submitted by the last workingday of a month will be published in that month's supplement to the list.Patent information received by the agency between monthly publication ofsupplements to the list will be placed on public display in FDA's Freedomof Information Staff. A request for copies of the file shall be sent inwriting to the Freedom of Information Staff (HFI-35), Food and Drug Administration,Rm. 12A-16, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857. (f) <T3>Correction of patent information errors. </T3>If any person disputesthe accuracy or relevance of patent information submitted to the agencyunder this section and published by FDA in the list, or believes that anapplicant has failed to submit required patent information, that personmust first notify the agency in writing stating the grounds for the disagreement.Such notification should be directed to the Office of Drug Standards (HFD-200),Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration,5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857. The agency will then request ofthe applicable new drug application holder that the correctness of thepatent information or omission of patent information be confirmed. Unlessthe application holder withdraws or amends its patent information in responseto FDA's request, the agency will not change the patent information inthe list. If the new drug application holder does not change the patentinformation submitted to FDA, a 505(b)(2) application or an abbreviatednew drug application under section 505(j) of the act submitted for a drugthat is claimed by a patent for which information has been submitted must,despite any disagreement as to the correctness of the patent information,contain an appropriate certification for each listed patent. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.54</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedure for submission of an application requiring investigationsfor approval of a new indication for, or other change from, a listed drug.</ITAG>(a) The act does not permit approval of an abbreviated new drug applicationfor a new indication, nor does it permit approval of other changes in alisted drug if investigations, other than bioavailability or bioequivalencestudies, are essential to the approval of the change. Any person seekingapproval of a drug product that represents a modification of a listed drug(e.g., a new indication or new dosage form) and for which investigations,other than bioavailability or bioequivalence studies, are essential tothe approval of the change may, except as provided in paragraph (b), submita 505(b)(2) application. This application need contain only that informationneeded to support the modification(s) of the listed drug.(1) The applicant shall submit a complete archival copy of the applicationthat contains the following: (i) The information required under andSection; 314.50(a), (b), (c), (d)(1)and (3), (e), and (g). (ii) The information required under andSection; 314.50(d)(2), (4) (if ananti-infective drug), (5), and (6), and (f) as needed to support the safetyand effectiveness of the drug product. (iii) Identification of the listed drug for which FDA has made a findingof safety and effectiveness and on which finding the applicant relies inseeking approval of its proposed drug product by established name, if any,proprietary name, dosage form, strength, route of administration, nameof listed drug's application holder, and listed drug's approved applicationnumber. (iv) If the applicant is seeking approval only for a new indication andnot for the indications approved for the listed drug on which the applicantrelies, a certification so stating. (v) Any patent information required under andSection; 314.53 with respectto any patent which claims the drug for which approval is sought or a methodof using such drug and to which a claim of patent infringement could reasonablybe asserted if a person not licensed by the owner of the patent engagedin the manufacture, use, or sale of the drug product. (vi) Any patent certification or statement required under andSection; 314.50(i)with respect to any relevant patents that claim the listed drug or thatclaim any other drugs on which investigations relied on by the applicantfor approval of the application were conducted, or that claim a use forthe listed or other drug. (vii) If the applicant believes the change for which it is seeking approvalis entitled to a period of exclusivity, the information required underandSection; 314.50(j). (2) The applicant shall submit a review copy that contains the technicalsections described in andSection; 314.50(d)(1) and (3), and the technicalsections described in andSection; 314.50(d)(2), (4), (5), and (6), and (f)when needed to support the modification. Each of the technical sectionsin the review copy is required to be separately bound with a copy of theinformation required under andSection; 314.50(a), (b), and (c) and a copyof the proposed labeling. (3) The information required by andSection; 314.50(d)(2), (4) (if an anti-infectivedrug), (5), (6), and (f) for the listed drug on which the applicant reliesshall be satisfied by reference to the listed drug under paragraph (a)(1)(iii)of this section. (b) An application may not be submitted under this section for a drug productwhose only difference from the reference listed drug is that the extentto which its active ingredient(s) is absorbed or is otherwise made availableto the site of action is less than that of the reference listed drug.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.55 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>11. Section 314.55 <T3>Abbreviated application </T3>is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.56 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>12. Section 314.56 <T3>Drug products for which abbreviated applications are suitable </T3>isremoved.12a. Section 314.60 is amended by redesignating the existing paragraphas paragraph (a) and by revising the first sentence, and by adding a newparagraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.60 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendments to an unapproved application.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, the applicantmay submit an amendment to an application that is filed under andSection;314.100, but not yet approved. * * *(b)(1) An unapproved application may not be amended if all of the followingconditions apply:(i) The unapproved application is for a drug for which a previous applicationhas been approved and granted a period of exclusivity under andSection; 314.108(b)(2)that has not expired;(ii) The applicant seeks to amend the unapproved application to includea published report of an investigation that was conducted or sponsoredby the applicant entitled to exclusivity for the drug;(iii) The applicant has not obtained a right of reference to the investigationdescribed in paragraph (b)(1)(ii) of this section; and(iv) The report of the investigation described in paragraph (b)(1)(ii)of this section would be essential to the approval of the unapproved application.(2) The submission of an amendment described in paragraph (b)(1) will causethe unapproved application to be deemed to be withdrawn by the applicantunder andSection; 314.65 on the date of receipt by FDA of the amendment.The amendment will be considered a resubmission of the application, whichmay not be accepted except as provided under andSection; 314.108(b)(2).13. Section 314.70 is amended by adding new paragraphs (e) and (f) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.70 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Supplements and other changes to an approved application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) <T3>Claimed exclusivity. </T3>If an applicant claims exclusivity underandSection; 314.108 upon approval of a supplemental application for a changeto its previously approved drug product, the applicant shall include withits supplemental application the information required under andSection; 314.50(j).(f) <T3>Patent information. </T3>The applicant shall comply with the patentinformation requirements under andSection; 314.53(d)(2).14. Section 314.71 is amended in paragraph (b) by revising the first sentenceto read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.71 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for submission of a supplement to an approved application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) All procedures and actions that apply to an application under andSection;314.50 also apply to supplements, except that the information requiredin the supplement is limited to that needed to support the change. * **<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>15. Section 314.80 is amended by removing the word ``significant'' under``Adverse drug experience'' in paragraph (a), by revising paragraph (b),the first sentence in paragraph (c)(1)(ii), and the last sentence in paragraph(d)(1) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.80 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Postmarketing reporting of adverse drug experiences.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Review of adverse drug experiences. </T3>Each applicant having an approvedapplication under andSection; 314.50 or in the case of a 505(b)(2) application,an effective approved application under andSection; 314.107 shall promptlyreview all adverse drug experience information obtained or otherwise receivedby the applicant from any source, foreign or domestic, including informationderived from commercial marketing experience, postmarketing clinical investigations,postmarketing epidemiological/surveillance studies, reports in the scientificliterature, and unpublished scientific papers.(c) * * *(1) * * *(ii) The applicant shall review periodically (at least as often as theperiodic reporting cycle) the frequency of reports of adverse drug experiencesthat are both serious and expected and reports of therapeutic failure (lackof effect), regardless of source, and report any significant increase infrequency as soon as possible but in any case within 15 working days ofdetermining that a significant increase in frequency exists. * * *<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) <T3>Scientific literature. </T3>(1) * * * The 15-day reporting requirementsin paragraph (c)(1)(ii) of this section (i.e., a significant increase infrequency of a serious, expected adverse drug experience or of a therapeuticfailure) apply only to reports found in scientific and medical journalseither as the result of a formal clinical trial, or from epidemiologicalstudies or analyses of experience in a monitored series of patients.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>16. Section 314.81 is amended in paragraph (a) by removing ``505(j)'' andreplacing it with ``505(k)'' and by adding new paragraph (b)(3)(iii) toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.81 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other postmarketing reports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(3) * * *(iii) <T3>Withdrawal of approved drug product from sale.</T3>(<T3>a</T3>) The applicant shall submit on Form FDA 2657 (Drug Product Listing),within 15 working days of the withdrawal from sale of a drug product, thefollowing information:(<T3>1</T3>) The National Drug Code (NDC) number.(<T3>2</T3>) The identity of the drug product by established name and byproprietary name.(<T3>3</T3>) The new drug application or abbreviated application number.(<T3>4</T3>) The date of withdrawal from sale. It is requested but not requiredthat the reason for withdrawal of the drug product from sale be includedwith the information.(<T3>b</T3>) The applicant shall submit each Form FDA-2657 to the Drug ListingBranch (HFD-315), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and DrugAdministration, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857.(<T3>c</T3>) Reporting under paragraph (b)(3)(iii) of this section constitutescompliance with the requirements under andSection; 207.30(a) to report ``atthe discretion of the registrant when the change occurs.''<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>17. New Subpart C consisting of andSection;andSection; 314.92 to 314.99 isadded to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Abbreviated Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.92 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Drug products for which abbreviated applications may be submitted.</ITAG>(a) Abbreviated applications are suitable for the following drug productswithin the limits set forth under andSection; 314.93:(1) Drug products that are the same as a listed drug. A ``listed drug''is defined in andSection; 314.3. For determining the suitability of an abbreviatednew drug application, the term ``same as'' means identical in active ingredient(s),dosage form, strength, route of administration, and conditions of use,except that conditions of use for which approval cannot be granted becauseof exclusivity or an existing patent may be omitted. If a listed drug hasbeen voluntarily withdrawn from or not offered for sale by its manufacturer,a person who wishes to submit an abbreviated new drug application for thedrug shall comply with andSection; 314.122.(2) Drug products that meet the monograph for an antibiotic drug for whichFDA has approved an application.(3) Drug products for which FDA made a finding that an abbreviated newdrug application was suitable and such finding was announced by noticein the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.(4) Drug products that have been declared suitable for an abbreviated newdrug application submission by FDA through the petition procedures setforth under andSection; 10.30 of this chapter and andSection; 314.93.(b) FDA will publish in the list listed drugs for which abbreviated applicationsmay be submitted. The list is available from the Superintendent of Documents,U.S. Government Printing Office, Washington, DC 20402, 202-783-3238.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.93 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Petition to request a change from a listed drug.</ITAG>(a) The only changes from a listed drug for which the agency will accepta petition under this section are those changes described in paragraph(b). Petitions to submit abbreviated new drug applications for other changesfrom a listed drug will not be approved.(b) A person who wants to submit an abbreviated new drug application fora drug product which is not identical to a listed drug in route of administration,dosage form, and strength, or in which one active ingredient is substitutedfor one of the active ingredients in a listed combination drug, must firstobtain permission from FDA to submit such an abbreviated application.(c) To obtain permission to submit an abbreviated new drug applicationfor a change described in paragraph (b) of this section, a person mustsubmit and obtain approval of a petition requesting the change. A personseeking permission to request such a change from a reference listed drugshall submit a petition in accordance with andSection; 10.20 of this chapterand in the format specified in andSection; 10.30 of this chapter. The petitionshall contain the information specified in andSection; 10.30 of this chapterand any additional information required by this section. If any provisionof andSection; 10.20 of this chapter or andSection; 10.30 of this chapter isinconsistent with any provision of this section, the provisions of thissection apply.(d) The petitioner shall identify a listed drug and include a copy of theproposed labeling for the drug product that is the subject of the petitionand a copy of the approved labeling for the listed drug. The petitionermay, under limited circumstances, identify more than one listed drug, forexample, when the proposed drug product is a combination product with onedifferent active ingredient than the combination reference listed drugand the different active ingredient itself is a listed drug. The petitionershall also include information to show that:(1) The active ingredients of its proposed drug product are of the samepharmacological or therapeutic class as those of the reference listed drug.(2) The drug product can be expected to have the same therapeutic effectas the reference listed drug when administered to patients for each conditionof use in the reference listed drug's labeling for which the applicantseeks approval.(3) If the proposed drug product is a combination product with one differentactive ingredient, including a different ester or salt, from the referencelisted drug, that the different active ingredient has previously been approvedin a listed drug or is a drug that does not meet the definition of ``newdrug'' in section 201(p) of the act.(e) No later than 90 days after the date a petition that is permitted underparagraph (a) of this section is submitted, FDA will approve or disapprovethe petition.(1) FDA will approve a petition properly submitted under this section unlessit finds that:(i) Investigations must be conducted to show the safety and effectivenessof the drug product or of any of its active ingredients, its route of administration,dosage form, or strength which differs from the reference listed drug;or(ii) For a petition that seeks to change an active ingredient, the drugproduct that is the subject of the petition is not a combination drug;or(iii) For a combination drug product that is the subject of the petitionand has an active ingredient different from the reference listed drug:(A) The drug product may not be adequately evaluated for approval as safeand effective on the basis of the information required to be submittedunder andSection; 314.94; or(B) The petition does not contain information to show that the differentactive ingredient of the drug product is of the same pharmacological ortherapeutic class as the ingredient of the reference listed drug that isto be changed and that the drug product can be expected to have the sametherapeutic effect as the reference listed drug when administered to patientsfor each condition of use in the listed drug's labeling for which the applicantseeks approval; or(C) The different active ingredient is not an active ingredient in a listeddrug or a drug that meets the requirements of section 201(p) of the act;or(D) The remaining active ingredients are not identical to those of thelisted combination drug; or(iv) Any of the proposed changes from the listed drug would jeopardizethe safe or effective use of the product so as to necessitate significantnew labeling changes to address the newly introduced safety or effectivenessproblem; or(v) FDA has determined that the reference listed drug has been withdrawnfrom sale for safety or effectiveness reasons under andSection; 314.161,or the reference listed drug has been voluntarily withdrawn from sale andthe agency has not determined whether the withdrawal is for safety or effectivenessreasons.(2) For purposes of this paragraph, ``investigations must be conducted''means that information derived from animal or clinical studies is necessaryto show that the drug product is safe or effective. Such information maybe contained in published or unpublished reports.(3) If FDA approves a petition submitted under this section, the agency'sresponse may describe what additional information, if any, will be requiredto support an abbreviated new drug application for the drug product. FDAmay, at any time during the course of its review of an abbreviated newdrug application, request additional information required to evaluate thechange approved under the petition.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.94 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Content and format of an abbreviated application.</ITAG>Abbreviated applications are required to be submitted in the form and containthe information required under this section. Two copies of the applicationare required, an archival copy and a review copy. FDA will maintain guidelineson the format and content of applications to assist applicants in theirpreparation.(a) <T3>Abbreviated new drug applications. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph(b) of this section, the applicant shall submit a complete archival copyof the abbreviated new drug application that includes the following:(1) <T3>Application form. </T3>The applicant shall submit a completed and signedapplication form that contains the information described under andSection;314.50(a) (1), (3), (4), and (5). The applicant shall state whether thesubmission is an abbreviated application under andSection; 314.94 or a supplementto an abbreviated application under andSection; 314.97.(2) <T3>Table of contents. </T3>The archival copy of the abbreviated new drugapplication is required to contain a table of contents that shows the volumenumber and page number of the contents of the submission.(3) <T3>Basis for abbreviated new drug application submission. </T3>An abbreviatednew drug application must refer to a listed drug. Ordinarily that listeddrug will be the drug product selected by the agency as the reference standardfor conducting bioequivalence testing. The application shall contain:(i) The name of the reference listed drug, including its dosage form andstrength. For an abbreviated new drug application based on an approvedpetition pursuant to andSection; 10.30 of this chapter or andSection; 314.93,the reference listed drug must be the same as the listed drug referredto in the petition. If the abbreviated new drug application is submittedon the basis of an FDA finding published by notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> that an abbreviated new drug application is suitablefor the product that is the subject of the abbreviated application, andthere is no listed drug, the <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice will be considered the listed drug, andthe application must contain a reference to the <T4>Federal Register</T4> citation.(ii) A statement as to whether according to the information published inthe list, the reference listed drug is entitled to a period of marketingexclusivity under section 505(j)(4)(D) of the act.(iii) For an abbreviated new drug application based on an approved petitionpursuant to andSection; 10.30 of this chapter or andSection; 314.93, a referenceto FDA-assigned docket number for the petition and a copy of FDA's correspondenceapproving the petition.(4) <T3>Conditions of use. </T3>(i) A statement that the conditions of useprescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling proposed for thedrug product have been previously approved for the reference listed drug.(ii) A reference to the applicant's annotated proposed labeling and tothe currently approved labeling for the reference listed drug providedunder paragraph (a)(8) of this section.(5) <T3>Active ingredients. </T3>(i) For a single-active-ingredient drug product,information to show that the active ingredient is the same as that of thereference single-active-ingredient listed drug, as follows:(A) A statement that the active ingredient of the proposed drug productis the same as that of the reference listed drug.(B) A reference to the applicant's annotated proposed labeling and to thecurrently approved labeling for the reference listed drug provided underparagraph (a)(8) of this section.(ii) For a combination drug product, information to show that the activeingredients are the same as those of the reference listed drug except forany different active ingredient that has been the subject of an approvedpetition, as follows:(A) A statement that the active ingredients of the proposed drug productare the same as those of the reference listed drug, or if one of the activeingredients differs from one of the active ingredients of the referencelisted drug and the abbreviated application is submitted pursuant to theapproval of a petition under andSection; 314.93 to vary such active ingredient,information to show that the other active ingredients of the drug productare the same as the other active ingredients of the reference listed drug,information to show that the different active ingredient is an active ingredientof another listed drug or of a drug which does not meet the definitionof ``new drug'' in section 201(p) of the act, and such other informationabout the different active ingredient that FDA may require.(B) A reference to the applicant's annotated proposed labeling and to thecurrently approved labeling for the reference listed drug provided underparagraph (a)(8) of this section.(6) <T3>Route of administration, dosage form, and strength. </T3>(i) Informationto show that the route of administration, dosage form, and strength ofthe drug product are the same as those of the reference listed drug exceptfor any differences that have been the subject of an approved petition,as follows:(A) A statement that the route of administration, dosage form, and strengthof the proposed drug product are the same as those of the reference listeddrug.(B) A reference to the applicant's annotated proposed labeling and to thecurrently approved labeling for the reference listed drug provided underparagraph (a)(8) of this section.(ii) If the route of administration, dosage form, or strength of the drugproduct differs from the reference listed drug and the abbreviated applicationis submitted pursuant to an approved petition under andSection; 314.93, suchinformation about the different route of administration, dosage form, orstrength that FDA may require.(7) <T3>Bioequivalence. </T3>(i) Information which shows that the drug productis bioequivalent to the reference listed drug upon which the applicantrelies or to the standard identified in an applicable <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice permitting the submission of an abbreviatednew drug application for the drug product, or(ii) If the abbreviated new drug application is submitted pursuant to apetition to vary an active ingredient, approved under andSection; 314.93,the results of any bioavailability or bioequivalence testing required bythe agency, and any other information required by the agency to show thatthe different active ingredient is of the same pharmacological or therapeuticclass as that of the changed ingredient in the reference listed drug, andthat the proposed drug product can be expected to have the same therapeuticeffect as the reference listed drug. FDA will consider a proposed drugproduct to have the same therapeutic effect as the reference listed drugif the applicant provides information demonstrating that:(A) There is an adequate scientific basis for determining that substitutionof the specific proposed dose of the different active ingredient for thedose of the member of the same pharmacological or therapeutic class inthe reference listed drug will yield a resulting drug product of the samesafety and effectiveness.(B) The unchanged active ingredients in the proposed drug product are bioequivalentto those in the reference listed drug.(C) The different active ingredient in the proposed drug product is bioequivalentto an approved dosage form containing that ingredient and approved forthe same indication as the proposed drug product or is bioequivalent toa drug product offered for that indication which does not meet the definitionof ``new drug'' under section 201(p) of the act.(iii) For each in vivo bioequivalence study contained in the abbreviatednew drug application, a description of the analytical and statistical methodsused in each study and a statement with respect to each study that it eitherwas conducted in compliance with the institutional review board regulationsin Part 56 of this chapter, or was not subject to the regulations underandSection; 56.104 or 56.105 of this chapter and that each study was conductedin compliance with the informed consent regulations in Part 50 of thischapter.(8) <T3>Labeling</T3>_(i) <T3>Listed drug labeling. </T3>A copy of the currently approved labelingfor the listed drug referred to in the abbreviated new drug application,if the abbreviated new drug application relies on a reference listed drug.(ii) <T3>Proposed labeling. </T3>Copies of the label and all labeling for thedrug product (4 copies of draft labeling or 12 copies of final printedlabeling).(iii) A statement that the applicant's proposed labeling is the same asthe labeling of the reference listed drug except for differences annotatedand explained under paragraph (a)(8)(iv) of this section.(iv) A side-by-side comparison of the applicant's proposed labeling withthe approved labeling for the reference listed drug with all differencesannotated and explained. Labeling (including the container label and packageinsert) proposed for the drug product must be the same as the labelingapproved for the reference listed drug, except for changes required becauseof differences approved under a petition filed under andSection; 314.93 orbecause the drug product and the reference listed drug are produced ordistributed by different manufacturers. Such differences between the applicant'sproposed labeling and labeling approved for the reference listed drug mayinclude differences in expiration date, formulation, bioavailability, orpharmacokinetics, labeling revisions made to comply with current FDA labelingguidelines or other guidance, or omission of an indication protected bypatent or accorded exclusivity under section 505(j)(4)(D) of the act.(9) <T3>Chemistry, manufacturing, and controls. </T3>(i) The information requiredunder andSection; 314.50(d)(1).(ii) <T3>Inactive ingredients. </T3>If an applicant seeks approval of a drugproduct which differs from the reference listed drug in one or more inactiveingredients or composition, the applicant shall identify and characterizethese differences and provide information demonstrating that the differencesdo not affect the safety of the proposed drug product.(iii) <T3>Inactive ingredient changes permitted in drug products intended forparenteral use. </T3>Generally, a drug product intended for parenteraluse shall contain the same inactive ingredients and in the same concentrationas the reference listed drug identified by the applicant under andSection;314.94(a)(3). However, an applicant may seek approval of a drug productthat differs from the reference listed drug in preservative, buffer, orantioxidant provided that the applicant identifies and characterizes thedifferences and provides information demonstrating that the differencesdo not affect the safety of the proposed drug product.(iv) <T3>Inactive ingredient changes permitted in drug products intended forophthalmic or otic use. </T3>Generally, a drug product intended for ophthalmicor otic use shall contain the same inactive ingredients and in the sameconcentration as the reference listed drug identified by the applicantunder andSection; 314.94(a)(3). However, an applicant may seek approval ofa drug product that differs from the reference listed drug in preservative,buffer, substance to adjust tonicity, or thickening agent provided thatthe applicant identifies and characterizes the differences and providesinformation demonstrating that the differences do not affect the safetyof the proposed drug product, except that in a product intended for ophthalmicuse, an applicant may not change a buffer or substance to adjust tonicityfor the purpose of claiming a therapeutic advantage over or differencefrom the listed drug, e.g., by using a balanced salt solution as a diluentas opposed to an isotonic saline solution, or by making a significant changein the pH or other change that may raise questions of irritability.(10) <T3>Samples. </T3>The information required under andSection; 314.50(e) (1)and (2)(i). Samples need not be submitted until requested by FDA.(11) <T3>Other. </T3>The information required under andSection; 314.50(g).(12) <T3>Patent certification_</T3>(i) <T3>Patents claiming drug, drug product, or method of use. </T3>(A) Exceptas provided in paragraphs (a)(12)(iv) of this section, a certificationwith respect to each patent issued by the United States Patent and TrademarkOffice that, in the opinion of the applicant and to the best of its knowledge,claims the reference listed drug or that claims a use of such listed drugfor which the applicant is seeking approval under section 505(j) of theact and for which information is required to be filed under section 505(b) and (c) of the act and andSection; 314.53. For each such patent, theapplicant shall provide the patent number and certify, in its opinion andto the best of its knowledge, one of the following circumstances:(<T3>1</T3>) That the patent information has not been submitted to FDA.The applicant shall entitle such a certification ``Paragraph I Certification;''(<T3>2</T3>) That the patent has expired. The applicant shall entitle sucha certification ``Paragraph II Certification;'' (<T3>3</T3>) The date on which the patent will expire. The applicant shallentitle such a certification ``Paragraph III Certification;'' or (<T3>4</T3>) That the patent is invalid or will not be infringed by themanufacture, use, or sale of the drug product for which the abbreviatedapplication is submitted. The applicant shall entitle such a certification``Paragraph IV Certification.'' This certification shall be submitted inthe following form:<ITAG tagnum="21">I (<T3>name of applicant</T3>), certify that Patent No. <T2>XXXX</T2> (<T3>is invalid or will not be infringed by the manufacture, use, or saleof</T3>) (<T3>name of proposed drug product</T3>) for which this application is submitted.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The certification shall be accompanied by a statement that the applicantwill comply with the requirements under andSection; 314.95(a) with respectto providing a notice to each owner of the patent or their representativesand to the holder of the approved application for the listed drug, andwith the requirements under andSection; 314.95(c) with respect to the contentof the notice.(B) If the abbreviated new drug application refers to a listed drug thatis itself a licensed generic product of a patented drug first approvedunder section 505(b) of the act, the appropriate patent certification underparagraph (a)(12)(i) of this section with respect to each patent that claimsthe first-approved patented drug or that claims a use for such drug. (ii) <T3>No relevant patents. </T3>If, in the opinion of the applicant and tothe best of its knowledge, there are no patents described in paragraph(a)(12)(i) of this section, a certification in the following form:<ITAG tagnum="21">In the opinion and to the best knowledge of (<T3>name of applicant</T3>), there are no patents that claim the listeddrug referred to in this application or that claim a use of the listeddrug.</ITAG>(iii) <T3>Method of use patent. </T3>(A) If patent information is submitted undersection 505 (b) or (c) of the act and andSection; 314.53 for a patent claiminga method of using the listed drug, and the labeling for the drug productfor which the applicant is seeking approval does not include any indicationsthat are covered by the use patent, a statement explaining that the methodof use patent does not claim any of the proposed indications.(B) If the labeling of the drug product for which the applicant is seekingapproval includes an indication that, according to the patent informationsubmitted under section 505 (b) or (c) of the act and andSection; 314.53or in the opinion of the applicant, is claimed by a use patent, an applicablecertification under paragraph (a)(12)(i) of this section. (iv) <T3>Method of manufacturing patent. </T3>An applicant is not required tomake a certification with respect to any patent that claims only a methodof manufacturing the listed drug. (v) <T3>Licensing agreements. </T3>If the abbreviated new drug applicationis for a drug or method of using a drug claimed by a patent and the applicanthas a licensing agreement with the patent owner, a certification underparagraph (a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) (``Paragraph IV Certification'') as to that patent and a statementthat it has been granted a patent license. If the patent owner consentsto an immediate effective date upon approval of the abbreviated application,the abbreviated application shall contain a written statement from thepatent owner that it has a licensing agreement with the applicant and thatit consents to an immediate effective date. (vi) <T3>Late submission of patent information. </T3>If a patent on the listeddrug is issued and the holder of the approved application for the listeddrug does not submit the required information on the patent within 30 daysof issuance of the patent, an applicant who submitted an abbreviated newdrug application for that drug that contained an appropriate patent certificationbefore the submission of the patent information is not required to submitan amended certification. An applicant whose abbreviated new drug applicationis submitted after a late submission of patent information, or whose pendingabbreviated application was previously submitted but did not contain anappropriate patent certification at the time of the patent submission,shall submit a certification under paragraph (a)(12)(i) or a statementunder paragraph (a)(12)(iii) of this section as to that patent. (vii) <T3>Disputed patent information. </T3>If an applicant disputes the accuracyor relevance of patent information submitted to FDA, the applicant mayseek a confirmation of the correctness of the patent information in accordancewith the procedures under andSection; 314.53(f). Unless the patent informationis withdrawn or changed, the applicant shall submit an appropriate certificationfor each relevant patent. (viii) <T3>Amended certifications. </T3>A certification submitted under paragraphs(a)(12) (i) through (iii) of this section may be amended at any time beforethe effective date of the approval of the application. An applicant shallsubmit an amended certification as an amendment to a pending applicationor by letter to an approved application. Once an amendment or letter issubmitted, the application will no longer be considered to contain theprior certification. (A) <T3>After finding of infringement. </T3>An applicant who has submitteda certification under paragraph (a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section and is sued for patent infringement within45 days of the receipt of notice sent under andSection; 314.95, shall amendthe certification if a final judgment in the action against that applicantis entered finding the patent to be infringed. In the amended certification,the applicant shall certify under paragraph (a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section that the patent will expire on a specific date.Once an amendment or letter for the change has been submitted, the applicationwill no longer be considered to be one containing a certification underparagraph (a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section. (B) <T3>After removal of a patent from the list. </T3>If a patent is removedfrom the list, for any reason other than because the patent has been declaredinvalid in a lawsuit brought pursuant to a notice under andSection; 314.95,after one or more applicants have submitted certifications under paragraph(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section on that patent, any applicant with a pendingapplication or with an approved application with a delayed effective datewho has made such a certification shall amend the certification. The applicantshall certify under paragraph (a)(12)(ii) of this section, if applicable,that no patents described in paragraph (a)(12)(i) of this section claimthe drug. If other relevant patents claim the drug, the applicant shallinstead submit a request to withdraw the certification under paragraph(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section. Once an amendment or letter for the changehas been submitted, the application will no longer be considered to beone containing a certification under paragraph (a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section. (C) <T3>Other amendments. </T3>(<T3>1</T3>) Except as provided in paragraphs (a)(12)(iv) and (viii)(C)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section, an applicant shall amend a submitted certificationif, at any time before the effective date of the approval of the applicationthe applicant learns that the submitted certification is no longer accurate.(<T3>2</T3>) An applicant is not required to amend a submitted certificationwhen information on a patent on the listed drug is submitted after theabbreviated application is approved, whether or not the approval of theabbreviated application is effective. (b) <T3>Drug products subject to the Drug Efficacy Study Implementation (DESI)review. </T3>(1) If the abbreviated new drug application is for a duplicateof a drug product that is subject to FDA's Drug Efficacy Study Implementation(DESI) review (a review of drug products approved as safe between 1938and 1962) or other DESI-like review and the drug product evaluated in thereview is a listed drug, the applicant shall comply with the provisionsof paragraph (a) of this section.(2) If the abbreviated new drug application is for a duplicate of a drugproduct that is subject to FDA's DESI review or other DESI-like reviewand the drug product evaluated in the review is not a listed drug at thetime of submission of the abbreviated application, the applicant shallcomply with the conditions set forth in the applicable DESI notice or othernotice with respect to conditions of use and labeling and with the provisionsof paragraph (a) of this section. However, if a drug product has been approvedpursuant to a DESI notice and later withdrawn from sale, the applicantshall follow the procedures in andSection; 314.122.(c) <T3>Abbreviated antibiotic application.</T3> For applications submittedunder section 507 of the act, the applicant shall submit a complete archivalcopy of the abbreviated application that contains the information describedunder andSection; 314.50(a) (1), (3), (4), and (5), (b), (d) (1) and (3),(e), and (g). The applicant shall state whether the submission is an abbreviatedapplication under andSection; 314.94 or a supplement to an abbreviated applicationunder andSection; 314.97.(d) <T3>Format of an abbreviated application.</T3> (1) The applicant shallsubmit a complete archival copy of the abbreviated application as requiredunder paragraphs (a) and (c) of this section. FDA will maintain the archivalcopy during the review of the application to permit individual reviewersto refer to information that is not contained in their particular technicalsections of the application, to give other agency personnel access to theapplication for official business, and to maintain in one place a completecopy of the application. An applicant may submit all or portions of thearchival copy of the abbreviated application in any form (e.g., microfiche)that the applicant and FDA agree is acceptable.(2) For abbreviated new drug applications, the applicant shall submit areview copy of the abbreviated application that contains two separately-boundsections. One section shall contain the information described under paragraphs(a) (3) through (6), (8), (9), and (12) of this section and 1 copy of theanalytical methods and descriptive information needed by FDA's laboratoriesto perform tests on samples of the proposed drug product and to validatethe applicant's analytical methods. The other section shall contain theinformation described under paragraphs (a) (3), (7), and (8) of this section.Each of the sections in the review copy is required to contain a copy ofthe application form described under andSection; 314.50(a).(3) For abbreviated antibiotic applications, the applicant shall submita review copy that contains the technical sections described in andSection;314.50(d) (1) and (3). Each of the technical sections in the review copyis required to be separately bound with a copy of the application formrequired under andSection; 314.50(a).(4) The applicant may obtain from FDA sufficient folders to bind the archivaland the review copies of the abbreviated application.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.95</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of certification of invalidity or noninfringement of a patent.</ITAG>(a) For each patent that claims the listed drug or that claims a use forsuch listed drug for which the applicant is seeking approval and that theapplicant certifies under andSection; 314.94(a)(12) is invalid or will notbe infringed, the applicant shall send notice of such certification byregistered or certified mail, return receipt requested to each of the followingpersons:(1) Each owner of the patent which is the subject of the certificationor the representative designated by the owner to receive the notice. Thename and address of the patent owner or its representative may be obtainedfrom the United States Patent and Trademark Office; and(2) The holder of the approved application under section 505(b) of theact for the listed drug that is claimed by the patent and for which theapplicant is seeking approval, or, if the application holder does not resideor maintain a place of business within the United States, the applicationholder's attorney, agent, or other authorized official. The name and addressof the application holder or its attorney, agent, or authorized officialmay be obtained from the Division of Drug Information Resources (HFD-80),Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration,5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857.(3) This paragraph does not apply to a use patent that claims no uses forwhich the applicant is seeking approval.(b) The applicant shall send the notice required by paragraph (a) of thissection when it receives from FDA an acknowledgment letter stating thatits abbreviated new drug application is sufficiently complete to permita substantive review. At the same time, the applicant shall amend its abbreviatednew drug application to include a statement certifying that the noticehas been provided to each person identified under paragraph (a) of thissection and that the notice met the content requirements under paragraph(c) of this section.(c) <T3>Content of a notice.</T3> In the notice, the applicant shall cite section505(j)(2)(B)(ii) of the act and shall include, but not be limited to, thefollowing information:(1) A statement that FDA has received an abbreviated new drug applicationsubmitted by the applicant containing any required bioavailability or bioequivalencedata or information.(2) The abbreviated application number.(3) The established name, if any, as defined in section 502(e)(3) of theact, of the proposed drug product.(4) The active ingredient, strength, and dosage form of the proposed drugproduct.(5) The patent number and expiration date, as submitted to the agency oras known to the applicant, of each patent alleged to be invalid or notinfringed.(6) A detailed statement of the factual and legal basis of the applicant'sopinion that the patent is not valid or will not be infringed. The applicantshall include in the detailed statement:(i) For each claim of a patent alleged not to be infringed, an explanationof why the claim is not infringed.(ii) For each claim of a patent alleged to be invalid, an explanation ofthe grounds supporting the allegation, including all statutory bases, affirmativedefenses, reasoning, and evidence supporting the allegation, citing anyrelevant case precedent upon which the allegation is based, providing acopy of any patent or publication relied upon, and indicating that portionof each such patent or publication which is alleged to invalidate suchclaim and the reasons supporting such allegation.(iii) For formulation or composition patents, a description of a mechanismthrough which the applicant agrees to make the formulation or compositionof the proposed drug product known to the patent owner or to a designatedintermediary who will act as a referee.(7) If the applicant does not reside or have a place of business in theUnited States, the name and address of an agent in the United States authorizedto accept service of process for the applicant.(d) <T3>Amendment to abbreviated application. </T3>If an abbreviated applicationis amended to include the certification described in andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>), the applicant shall send the notice required by paragraph(a) of this section at the same time that the amendment to the abbreviatedapplication is submitted to FDA.(e) <T3>Documentation of receipt of notice.</T3> The applicant shall amendits abbreviated application to document receipt of the notice requiredunder paragraph (a) of this section by each person provided the notice.The applicant shall include a copy of the return receipt or other similarevidence of the date the notification was received. FDA will accept asadequate documentation of the date of receipt a return receipt or a letteracknowledging receipt by the person provided the notice. An applicant mayrely on another form of documentation only if FDA has agreed to such documentationin advance. A copy of the notice itself need not be submitted to the agency.(f) If the above requirements are met, FDA will presume the notice to becomplete and sufficient, and it will count the day following the date ofreceipt of the notice by the patent owner or its representative or by theapproved application holder if the holder is an exclusive patent licenseeas the first day of the 45-day period provided for in section 505(j)(4)(B)(iii)of the act. FDA may, if the applicant amends its ANDA with a written statementthat a later date should be used, count from such later date.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.96</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendments to an unapproved abbreviated application.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Abbreviated new drug application.</T3> (1) An applicant may amend anabbreviated new drug application that is submitted under andSection; 314.94,but not yet approved, to revise existing information or provide additionalinformation.(2) Ordinarily, an amendment submitted before the end of the 180-day reviewperiod will not extend the review period. If, however, the agency concludesthat an amendment contains significant new data requiring additional timefor agency review, FDA will extend the review period, but only for thelength of time needed to review the submission and for no more than 180days. The agency will notify the applicant of the length of the extension.(3) Submission of an amendment to resolve substantial deficiencies in theapplication as set forth in a not approvable letter issued under andSection;314.120 will extend the review period for 120 days from the date of receiptby FDA of the amendment. The submission of such an amendment constitutesan agreement by FDA and the applicant under section 505(j)(4)(A) of theact to extend the date by which the agency is required to reach a decisionon the abbreviated new drug application. (b) <T3>Abbreviated antibiotic application.</T3> The applicant shall complywith the provisions of andSection; 314.60. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.97</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Supplements and other changes to an approved abbreviated application.</ITAG>The applicant shall comply with the requirements of andSection;andSection;314.70 and 314.71 regarding the submission of supplemental applicationsand other changes to an approved abbreviated application. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3 14.98</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Postmarketing reports. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and ( c) of this section, eachapplicant having an approved abbreviated antibiotic application under andSection;314.94 or approved abbreviated new drug application under andSection; 314.94that is effective under andSection; 314.107 shall comply with the requirementsof andSection; 314.80 regarding the reporting of adverse drug experiences.(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this section, the applicantshall submit one copy of each report required under andSection; 314.80 tothe Division of Epidemiology and Surveillance (HFD-730), Center for DrugEvaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 5600 Fishers Lane,Rockville, MD 20857. (c) Periodic reporting of adverse drug experiences under andSection; 314.80(c)(2)is not required if no adverse drug experience reports have been receivedand no labeling changes have been initiated by the applicant during thereporting interval. (d) Each applicant shall make the reports required under andSection; 314.81and sections 505(k) and 507(g) of the act for each of its approved abbreviatedapplications. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.99</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other responsibilities of an applicant of an abbreviated application.</ITAG>(a) An applicant shall comply with the requirements of andSection; 314.65regarding withdrawal by the applicant of an unapproved abbreviated applicationand andSection; 314.72 regarding a change in ownership of an abbreviatedapplication. (b) An applicant may ask FDA to waive under this section any requirementthat applies to the applicant under andSection;andSection; 314.92 through 314.99.The applicant shall comply with the requirements for a waiver under andSection;314.90. 18. Part 314 is amended by revising the heading for Subpart D, andSection;andSection;314.100, 314.101, and 314.102 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart D_FDA Action on Applications and Abbreviated Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Time frames for reviewing applications and abbreviated applications.</ITAG>(a) Within 180 days of receipt of an application for a new drug under section505(b) of the act, or of an abbreviated application for a new drug undersection 505(j) of the act, or of an application or abbreviated applicationfor an antibiotic drug under section 507 of the act, FDA will review itand send the applicant either an approval letter under andSection; 314.105,an approvable letter under andSection; 314.110, or a not approvable letterunder andSection; 314.120. This 180-day period is called the ``review clock.''(b) During the review period an applicant may withdraw an application underandSection; 314.65 or an abbreviated application under andSection; 314.99 andlater resubmit it. FDA will treat the resubmission as a new applicationor abbreviated application. (c) The review clock may be extended by mutual agreement between FDA andan applicant or as provided in andSection;andSection; 314.60 and 314.96, asthe result of a major amendment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filing an application and an abbreviated antibiotic application andreceiving an abbreviated new drug application. </ITAG>(a)(1) Within 60 days after FDA receives an application or abbreviatedantibiotic application, the agency will determine whether the applicationor abbreviated antibiotic application may be filed. The filing of an applicationor abbreviated antibiotic application means that FDA has made a thresholddetermination that the application or abbreviated antibiotic applicationis sufficiently complete to permit a substantive review. (2) If FDA finds that none of the reasons in paragraphs (d) and (e) ofthis section for refusing to file the application or abbreviated antibioticapplication apply, the agency will file the application or abbreviatedantibiotic application and notify the applicant in writing. The date offiling will be the date 60 days after the date FDA received the applicationor abbreviated antibiotic application. The date of filing begins the 180-dayperiod described in section 505(c) of the act. This 180-day period is calledthe ``filing clock.'' (3) If FDA refuses to file the application or abbreviated antibiotic application,the agency will notify the applicant in writing and state the reason underparagraph (d) or (e) of this section for the refusal. If FDA refuses tofile the application or abbreviated antibiotic application under paragraph(d) of this section, the applicant may request in writing within 30 daysof the date of the agency's notification an informal conference with theagency about whether the agency should file the application or abbreviatedantibiotic application. If following the informal conference the applicantrequests that FDA file the application or abbreviated antibiotic application(with or without amendments to correct the deficiencies), the agency willfile the application or abbreviated antibiotic application over protestunder paragraph (a)(2) of this section, notify the applicant in writing.and review it as filed. If the application or abbreviated antibiotic applicationis filed over protest, the date of filing will be the date 60 days afterthe date the applicant requested the informal conference. The applicantneed not resubmit a copy of an application or abbreviated antibiotic applicationthat is filed over protest. If FDA refuses to file the application or abbreviatedantibiotic application under paragraph (e) of this section, the applicantmay amend the application or abbreviated antibiotic application and resubmitit and the agency will make a determination under this section whetherit may be filed. (b)(1) An abbreviated new drug application will be reviewed after it issubmitted to determine whether the abbreviated application may be received.Receipt of an abbreviated new drug application means that FDA has madea threshold determination that the abbreviated application is sufficientlycomplete to permit a substantive review. (2) If FDA finds that none of the reasons in paragraphs (d) and (e) ofthis section for considering the abbreviated new drug application not tohave been received apply, the agency will receive the abbreviated new drugapplication and notify the applicant in writing. (3) If FDA considers the abbreviated new drug application not to have beenreceived under paragraphs (d) or (e) of this section, FDA will notify theapplicant, ordinarily by telephone. The applicant may then: (i) Withdraw the abbreviated new drug application pursuant to andSection;314.99, or (ii) Amend the abbreviated new drug application to correct the deficiencies,or (iii) Take no action, in which case FDA will refuse to receive the abbreviatednew drug application. (c) [Reserved] (d) FDA may refuse to file an application or abbreviated antibiotic applicationor may not consider an abbreviated new drug application to be receivedif any of the following applies. (1) The application or abbreviated application does not contain a completedapplication form.(2) The application or abbreviated application is not submitted in theform required under andSection; 314.50 or andSection; 314.94.(3) The application or abbreviated application is incomplete because itdoes not on its face contain information required under section 505(b),section 505(j), or section 507 of the act and andSection; 314.50 or andSection;314.94. (4) The applicant fails to submit a complete environmental assessment whichaddresses each of the items specified in the applicable format under andSection;25.31 of this chapter or fails to provide sufficient information to establishthat the requested action is subject to categorical exclusion under andSection;25.24 of this chapter. (5) The application or abbreviated application does not contain an accurateand complete English translation of each part of the application that isnot in English. (6) The application does not contain a statement for each nonclinical laboratorystudy that it was conducted in compliance with the requirements set forthin Part 58, or, for each study not conducted in compliance with Part 58,a brief statement of the reason for the noncompliance.(7) The application does not contain a statement for each clinical studythat it was conducted in compliance with the institutional review boardregulations in Part 56 of this chapter, or was not subject to those regulations,and that it was conducted in compliance with the informed consent regulationsin Part 50; or, if the study was subject to but was not conducted in compliancewith those regulations, the application does not contain a brief statementof the reason for the noncompliance.(8) The abbreviated new drug application contains a certification underandSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>), but does not contain the results of any required and completedbioequivalence or bioavailability study, or, if appropriate, a requestfor waiver of such study requirement. (e) The agency will refuse to file an application or abbreviated antibioticapplication or will consider an abbreviated new drug application not tohave been received if any of the following applies: (1) The drug product that is the subject of the submission is already coveredby an approved application or abbreviated application and the applicantof the submission is merely a distributor and/or a repackager of the alreadyapproved drug product. (2) The drug product is subject to licensing by FDA under the Public HealthService Act (58 Stat. 632 as amended (42 U.S.C. 201 <T3>et seq</T3>.)) and Subchapter F of Chapter I of Title 21 of the Codeof Federal Regulations.(f)(1) Within 180 days after the date of filing, plus the period of timethe review period was extended (if any), FDA will either (i) approve theapplication or abbreviated antibiotic application or (ii) issue a noticeof opportunity for hearing if the applicant asked FDA to provide it anopportunity for a hearing on an application or abbreviated antibiotic applicationin response to an approvable letter or a not approvable letter.(2) Within 180 days after the date of receipt, plus the period of timethe review clock was extended (if any), FDA will either approve or disapprovethe abbreviated new drug application. If FDA disapproves the abbreviatednew drug application, FDA will issue a notice of opportunity for hearingif the applicant asked FDA to provide it an opportunity for a hearing onan abbreviated new drug application in response to a not approvable letter.(3) This paragraph does not apply to applications or abbreviated applicationsthat have been withdrawn from FDA review by the applicant.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.102</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Communications between FDA and applicants.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General principles. </T3>During the course of reviewing an applicationor an abbreviated application, FDA shall communicate with applicants aboutscientific, medical, and procedural issues that arise during the reviewprocess. Such communication may take the form of telephone conversations,letters, or meetings, whichever is most appropriate to discuss the particularissue at hand. Communications shall be appropriately documented in theapplication in accordance with andSection; 10.65. Further details on theprocedures for communication between FDA and applicants are contained ina staff manual guide that is publicly available.(b) <T3>Notification of easily correctable deficiencies. </T3>FDA reviewersshall make every reasonable effort to communicate promptly to applicantseasily correctable deficiencies found in an application or an abbreviatedapplication when those deficiencies are discovered, particularly deficienciesconcerning chemistry, manufacturing, and controls issues. The agency willalso inform applicants promptly of its need for more data or informationor for technical changes in the application or the abbreviated applicationneeded to facilitate the agency's review. This early communication is intendedto permit applicants to correct such readily identified deficiencies relativelyearly in the review process and to submit an amendment before the reviewperiod has elapsed. Such early communication would not ordinarily applyto major scientific issues, which require consideration of the entire pendingapplication or abbreviated application by agency managers as well as reviewingstaff. Instead, major scientific issues will ordinarily be addressed inan action letter.(c) <T3>Ninety-day conference. </T3>Approximately 90 days after the agencyreceives the application, FDA will provide applicants with an opportunityto meet with agency reviewing officials. The purpose of the meeting willbe to inform applicants of the general progress and status of their applications,and to advise applicants of deficiencies which have been identified bythat time and which have not already been communicated. This meeting willbe available on applications for all new chemical entities and major newindications of marketed drugs. Such meetings will be held at the applicant'soption, and may be held by telephone if mutually agreed upon. Such meetingswould not ordinarily be held on abbreviated applications because they arenot submitted for new chemical entities or new indications.(d) <T3>End of review conference. </T3>At the conclusion of FDA's review ofan application or an abbreviated application as designated by the issuanceof an approvable or not approvable letter, FDA will provide applicantswith an opportunity to meet with agency reviewing officials. The purposeof the meeting will be to discuss what further steps need to be taken bythe applicant before the application or abbreviated application can beapproved. This meeting will be available on all applications or abbreviatedapplications, with priority given to applications for new chemical entitiesand major new indications for marketed drugs and for the first duplicatesfor such drugs. Requests for such meetings shall be directed to the directorof the division responsible for reviewing the application or abbreviatedapplication.(e) <T3>Other meetings. </T3>Other meetings between FDA and applicants maybe held, with advance notice, to discuss scientific, medical, and otherissues that arise during the review process. Requests for meetings shallbe directed to the director of the division responsible for reviewing theapplication or abbreviated application. FDA will make every attempt togrant requests for meetings that involve important issues and that canbe scheduled at mutually convenient times. However, ``drop-in'' visits(i.e., an unannounced and unscheduled visit by a company representative)are discouraged except for urgent matters, such as to discuss an importantnew safety issue.19. Section 314.103 is amended by revising paragraph (a), the first sentencein paragraph (b), and the fourth sentence in paragraph (c)(2), to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.103 Dispute resolution.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>FDA is committed to resolving differences between applicantsand FDA reviewing divisions with respect to technical requirements forapplications or abbreviated applications as quickly and amicably as possiblethrough the cooperative exchange of information and views.(b) <T3>Administrative and procedural issues. </T3>When administrative or proceduraldisputes arise, the applicant should first attempt to resolve the matterwith the division responsible for reviewing the application or abbreviatedapplication, beginning with the consumer safety officer assigned to theapplication or abbreviated application. * * *(c) * * *(2) * * * Requests for such meetings shall be directed to the directorof the division responsible for reviewing the application or abbreviatedapplication.* * *<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>20. Part 314 is amended by revising andSection;andSection; 314.104 and 314.105to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.104 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Drugs with potential for abuse.</ITAG>The Food and Drug Administration will inform the Drug Enforcement Administrationunder section 201(f) of the Controlled Substances Act (21 U.S.C. 801) whenan application or abbreviated application is submitted for a drug thatappears to have an abuse potential.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of an application and an abbreviated application.</ITAG>(a) The Food and Drug Administration will approve an application or anabbreviated antibiotic application and send the applicant an approval letterif none of the reasons in andSection; 314.125 for refusing to approve theapplication or abbreviated antibiotic application apply. The date of theagency's approval letter is the date of approval of the application orabbreviated antibiotic application. When FDA sends an applicant an approvalletter for an antibiotic, it will promulgate a regulation under andSection;314.300 providing for certification of the drug, if necessary. A new drugproduct or antibiotic approved under this paragraph may not be marketeduntil an approval letter is issued, except that a new drug product subjectto a 505(b)(2) application may not be marketed until approval of the applicationis effective under andSection; 314.107. Marketing of an antibiotic need notawait the promulgation of a regulation under andSection; 314.300.(b) FDA will approve an application or abbreviated antibiotic applicationand issue the applicant an approval letter (rather than an approvable letterunder andSection; 314.110) on the basis of draft labeling if the only deficienciesin the application or abbreviated antibiotic application concern editorialor similar minor deficiencies in the draft labeling. Such approval willbe conditioned upon the applicant incorporating the specified labelingchanges exactly as directed, and upon the applicant submitting to FDA acopy of the final printed labeling prior to marketing.(c) FDA will approve an application after it determines that the drug meetsthe statutory standards for safety and effectiveness, manufacturing andcontrols, and labeling, and an abbreviated antibiotic application afterit determines that the drug meets the statutory standards for manufacturingand controls, and labeling. While the statutory standards apply to alldrugs, the many kinds of drugs that are subject to the statutory standardsand the wide range of uses for those drugs demand flexibility in applyingthe standards. Thus FDA is required to exercise its scientific judgmentto determine the kind and quantity of data and information an applicantis required to provide for a particular drug to meet the statutory standards.FDA makes its views on drug products and classes of drugs available throughguidelines, recommendations, and other statements of policy.(d) FDA will approve an abbreviated new drug application and send the applicantan approval letter if none of the reasons in andSection; 314.127 for refusingto approve the abbreviated new drug application apply. The date of theagency's approval letter is the date of approval of the abbreviated newdrug application. A new drug product approved under this paragraph maynot be introduced or delivered for introduction into interstate commerceuntil approval of the abbreviated new drug application is effective underandSection; 314.107. Ordinarily, the effective date of approval will be statedin the approval letter.21. Part 314 is amended by adding andSection;andSection; 314.107 and 314.108to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.107 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effective date of approval of a 505(b)(2) application or abbreviatednew drug application under section 505(j) of the act.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> A drug product may be introduced or delivered for introductioninto interstate commerce when approval of the application or abbreviatedapplication for the drug product becomes effective. Except as providedin this section, approval of an application or abbreviated applicationfor a drug product becomes effective on the date FDA issues an approvalletter under andSection; 314.105 for the application or abbreviated application.(b) <T3>Effect of patent on the listed drug.</T3> If approval of an abbreviatednew drug application submitted under section 505(j) of the act or of a505(b)(2) application is granted, that approval will become effective inaccordance with the following:(1) <T3>Date of approval letter.</T3> Except as provided in paragraph (c) ofthis section, approval will become effective on the date FDA issues anapproval letter under andSection; 314.105 if the applicant certifies underandSection; 314.50(i) or andSection; 314.94(a)(12) that:(i) There are no relevant patents, or(ii) The applicant is aware of a relevant patent but the patent informationrequired under section 505 (b) or (c) of the act has not been submittedto FDA, or(iii) The relevant patent has expired, or(iv) The relevant patent is invalid or will not be infringed.(A) The patent owner or its representative or the exclusive patent licenseehas not brought suit for patent infringement within 45 days of the receiptof the applicant's notice of certification required under andSection; 314.52or andSection; 314.95, or(B) The drug product is covered by a patent licensing agreement and theabbreviated new drug application or 505(b)(2) application includes:(<T3>1</T3>) A statement that the applicant has been granted a patent license;(<T3>2</T3>) A statement from the patent owner that it has a licensing agreementwith the applicant covering the proposed drug product and consents to animmediate effective date; and(<T3>3</T3>) The patent owner's name and address.(2) <T3>Upon patent expiration.</T3> If the applicant certifies under andSection;314.50(i) or andSection; 314.94(a)(12) that the relevant patent will expireon a specified date, approval will become effective on the specified date.(3) <T3>Upon disposition of patent litigation.</T3> (i)(A) Except as providedin paragraphs (b)(3) (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this section, if the applicantcertifies under andSection; 314.50(i) or andSection; 314.94(a)(12) that therelevant patent is invalid or will not be infringed, and the patent owneror its representative or the exclusive patent licensee brings suit forpatent infringement within 45 days of receipt of the notice of certificationfrom the applicant under andSection; 314.52 or andSection; 314.95, approvalwill be made effective 30 months after the date of the receipt of the noticeof certification by the patent owner or by the exclusive licensee (or theirrepresentatives) unless the court has extended or reduced the period becauseof a failure of either the plaintiff or defendant to cooperate reasonablyin expediting the action, or(B) If the patented drug product qualifies for 5 years of exclusive marketingunder andSection; 314.108(b)(2) and the patent owner or its representativeor the exclusive patent licensee brings suit for patent infringement duringthe 1-year period beginning 4 years after the date the patented drug wasapproved and within 45 days of receipt of the notice of certification,the 30-month period will be extended by an amount of time, if any, thatis required for 7\1/2\ years to have elapsed from the date of approvalof the application for the patented drug product and approval will be madeeffective at the expiration of the 7\1/2\ years.(ii) If before the expiration of the 30-month period, or 7\1/2\ years whereapplicable, the court issues a final order that the patent is invalid ornot infringed, approval will be made effective on the date the court entersjudgment,(iii) If before the expiration of the 30-month period, or 7\1/2\ yearswhere applicable, the court issues a final order that the patent has beeninfringed, approval will be made effective on the date the court determinesthat the patent will expire or otherwise orders, or(iv) If before the expiration of the 30-month period, or 7\1/2\ years whereapplicable, the court grants a preliminary injunction prohibiting the applicantfrom engaging in the commercial manufacture or sale of the drug productuntil the court decides the issues of patent validity and infringement,and if the court later decides that the patent is invalid or not infringed,approval will be made effective on the date the court enters final judgment.(4) <T3>Multiple certifications.</T3> If the applicant has submitted certificationsunder andSection; 314.50(i) or andSection; 314.94(a)(12) for more than onepatent, the date of approval will be calculated for each certification,and the approval will become effective on the last applicable date.(c) <T3>Subsequent abbreviated new drug application submission. </T3>(1) Ifan abbreviated new drug application contains a certification that a relevantpatent is invalid or will not be infringed and the application is for ageneric copy of the same listed drug for which an abbreviated new drugapplication was previously submitted containing a certification that thesame patent was invalid or would not be infringed and the previous applicanthas been sued for patent infringement within 45 days of the patent owner'sreceipt of notice submitted under andSection; 314.95, approval of the subsequentabbreviated new drug application will be made effective no sooner than180 days from whichever of the following dates is earlier:(i) The date the first of the previous applicants to submit a substantiallycomplete abbreviated new drug application containing a certification thata patent on the listed drug was invalid or not infringed and to be suedwithin 45 days of the patent owner's receipt of notice submitted underandSection; 314.95 first commences commercial marketing of its drug product,or(ii) The date of a decision of the court holding the relevant patent invalidor not infringed.(2) For purposes of paragraph (c)(1) of this section, an abbreviated newdrug application will be considered to have been ``previously submitted''with respect to another application for the same listed drug if the dateon which the first application was both substantially complete and containeda certification that the patent was invalid or not infringed is earlierthan the date on which the second application was both substantially completeand contained the same certification. A ``substantially complete'' applicationmust contain the results of any required bioequivalence studies, or, ifapplicable, a request for a waiver of such studies.(3) For purposes of paragraph (c)(1) of this section, if the ``first applicant''described in paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section has not yet received approvalof its abbreviated new drug application, FDA will make the approval ofsubsequent abbreviated applications immediately effective if FDA concludesthat the first applicant is not actively pursuing approval of its abbreviatedapplication.(4) For purposes of paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section, the first applicantthat makes a certification that one or more patents on a drug is invalidor will not be infringed and that has been sued for patent infringementshall notify FDA of the date that it commences commercial marketing ofits drug product. Commercial marketing commences with the first date ofintroduction or delivery for introduction into interstate commerce outsidethe control of the manufacturer of a drug product, except for investigationaluse under 21 CFR Part 312, but does not include transfer of the drug productfor reasons other than sale within the control of the manufacturer or applicationholder. If an applicant does not promptly notify FDA of such date, theeffective date of approval shall be deemed to be the date of the commencementof first commercial marketing. (d) <T3>Delay due to exclusivity. </T3>The agency will also delay the effectivedate of the approval of an abbreviated new drug application under section505(j) of the act or a 505(b)(2) application if delay is required by theexclusivity provisions in andSection; 314.108. When the effective date ofan application is delayed under both this section and andSection; 314.108,the effective date will be the later of the 2 days specified under thissection and andSection; 314.108.(e)(1) References to actions of ``the court'' in paragraphs (b) and (c)of this section are to the court that enters final judgment from whichno appeal can be or has been taken.(2) For purposes of establishing the effective date of approval based ona court judgment, the applicant shall submit to the Division of GenericDrugs (HFN-230), within 10 working days of a final judgment, a copy ofthe entry of judgment.(f) <T3>Computation of 45-day time clock. </T3>(1) The 45-day clock describedin paragraph (b)(3) of this section begins on the day after the date ofreceipt of the applicant's notice of certification by the patent owneror its representative, or by the approved application holder if the holderis an exclusive patent licensee. When the 45th day falls on Saturday, Sunday,or on a Federal holiday, the 45th day will be the next day that is nota Saturday, Sunday, or a Federal holiday.(2) If the applicant of the abbreviated new drug application or 505(b)(2)application does not notify FDA in writing before the expiration of the45-day time period or the completion of the agency's review of the application,whichever occurs later, that a legal action for patent infringement wasfiled within 45 days of receipt of the notice of certification, approvalof the abbreviated new drug application or 505(b)(2) application will bemade effective immediately upon expiration of the 45 days or upon completionof the agency's review and approval of the application, whichever is later.The 505(b)(2) applicant or abbreviated new drug applicant shall notifyFDA of the filing of any such legal action and shall include in such notification:(i) The abbreviated new drug application or 505(b)(2) application number.(ii) The name of the abbreviated new drug application or 505(b)(2) applicant.(iii) The established name of the drug, if any, strength, and dosage form.(iv) A certification that action to defend the patent, identified by number,has been filed in an appropriate court on a specified date. The applicantof an abbreviated new drug application shall send the notification to FDA'sDivision of Generic Drugs (HFD-230). A 505(b)(2) applicant shall send thenotification to the appropriate division in the Center for Drug Researchand Evaluation reviewing the application.(3) If the patent owner or approved application holder who is an exclusivepatent licensee waives its opportunity to file a legal action for patentinfringement within 45 days of receipt of the notice of certification andthe patent owner or approved application holder who is an exclusive patentlicensee submits to FDA a valid waiver before the 45 days elapses, approvalof the abbreviated new drug application or 505(b)(2) application will bemade effective upon completion of the agency's review and approval of theapplication. FDA will only accept a waiver in the following form:<ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>Name of patent owner or exclusive patent licensee</T3>) has receivednotice from (<T3>name of applicant</T3>) under (<T3>section 505(b)(3) or 505(j)(2)(B) of the act</T3>) and does not intendto file an action for patent infringement against (<T3>name of applicant</T3>) concerning the drug (<T3>name of drug</T3>) before (<T3>date on which 45 days elapses</T3>). (<T3>Name of patent owner or exclusive patent licensee</T3>) waives theopportunity provided by (<T3>section 505(c)(3)(C) or 505(j)(4)(B)(iii) of the act</T3>) and doesnot object if (<T3>name of applicant</T3>)'s (<T3>505(b)(2) or abbreviated new drug application</T3>) for (<T3>name of drug</T3>) is approved with an immediate effective date onor after the date of this letter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.108 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">New drug product exclusivity.</ITAG>(a) The following definitions of terms apply to this section:``Active moiety'' means the molecule or ion, excluding those appended portionsof the molecule that cause the drug to be an ester, salt (including a saltwith hydrogen or coordination bonds) or other noncovalent derivative (suchas a complex, chelate, or clathrate) of the molecule, responsible for thephysiological or pharmacological action of the drug substance.``Approved under section 505(b)'' means an application submitted undersection 505(b) and approved on or after October 10, 1962, or an applicationthat was ``deemed approved'' under section 107(c)(2) of Pub. L. 87-781.``Clinical investigation'' means any experiment other than a bioavailabilitystudy in which a drug is administered or dispensed to, or used on humansubjects.``Conducted or sponsored by the applicant'' with regard to an investigationmeans that before or during the investigation, the applicant was namedin Form FDA 1571 filed with FDA as the sponsor of the investigational newdrug application under which the investigation was conducted, or the applicantor the applicant's predecessor in interest, provided substantial supportfor the investigation. Ordinarily, substantial support will mean providing50 percent or more of the cost of conducting the study. A predecessor ininterest is an entity, e.g., a corporation, that the applicant has takenover, merged with, or purchased, or from which the applicant has purchasedall rights to the drug. Purchase of a clinical investigation itself orthe rights to an investigation after it is completed is not sufficientto satisfy this definition.``Date of approval'' means the date on the letter from the Food and DrugAdministration (FDA) stating that the new drug application is approved,whether or not final printed labeling or other materials must yet be submittedas long as approval of such labeling or materials is not expressly required.``Essential to approval'' with regard to an investigation means that theapplication could not be approved by FDA without that investigation, evenwith a delayed effective date.``New chemical entity'' means a drug that contains no active moiety thathas been approved by FDA in any other application submitted under section505(b) of the act.``New clinical investigation'' means an investigation in humans the resultsof which have not been relied on by FDA to demonstrate substantial evidenceof effectiveness of a previously approved drug product for any indicationor of safety for a new patient population and do not duplicate the resultsof another investigation that was relied on by the agency to demonstratethe effectiveness or safety in a new patient population of a previouslyapproved drug product. For purposes of this section, data from a clinicalinvestigation previously submitted for use in the comprehensive evaluationof the safety of a drug product but not to support the effectiveness ofthe drug product would be considered new.(b) <T3>Submission of and effective date of approval of an abbreviated newdrug application submitted under section 505(j) of the act or a 505(b)(2)application. </T3>(1) If a drug product that contains a new chemical entitywas approved between January 1, 1982, and September 24, 1984, in an applicationsubmitted under section 505(b) of the act, the agency will not make effectivefor a period of 10 years from the date of approval of the first approvednew drug application the approval of a 505(b)(2) application or an abbreviatednew drug application submitted under section 505(j) of the act for a drugproduct that contains the same active moiety in the new chemical entityin the first approved application.(2) If a drug product that contains a new chemical entity was approvedafter September 24, 1984, in an application submitted under section 505(b)of the act, no person may submit a 505(b)(2) application or abbreviatednew drug application under section 505(j) of the act for a drug productthat contains the same active moiety as in the new chemical entity fora period of 5 years from the date of approval of the first approved newdrug application, except that the 505(b)(2) application or abbreviatedapplication may be submitted after 4 years if it contains a certificationof patent invalidity or noninfringement described in andSection; 314.50(i)(1)(i)(<T3>a</T3>)(<T3>4</T3>) or andSection; 314.94(a)(12)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>).(3) The approval of a 505(b)(2) application or abbreviated applicationdescribed in paragraph (b)(2) of this section will become effective asprovided in andSection; 314.107(b) (1) or (2), unless the owner of a patentthat claims the drug or the patent owner's representative, or exclusivelicensee brings suit for patent infringement against the applicant duringthe 1-year period beginning 48 months after the date of approval of thenew drug application for the new chemical entity and within 45 days afterreceipt of the notice described at andSection; 314.52 or andSection; 314.95,in which case, approval of the 505(b)(2) application or abbreviated applicationwill be made effective as provided in andSection; 314.107(b)(3).(4) If an application:(i) Was submitted under section 505(b) of the act;(ii) Was approved after September 24, 1984;(iii) Was for a drug product that contains an active moiety that has beenpreviously approved in another application under section 505(b) of theact; and(iv) Contained reports of new clinical investigations (other than bioavailabilitystudies) conducted or sponsored by the applicant that were essential toapproval of the application, the agency will not make effective for a periodof 3 years after the date of approval of the application the approval of:a 505(b)(2) application or an abbreviated new drug application for theconditions of approval of the original application, or an abbreviated newdrug application submitted pursuant to an approved petition under section505(j)(2)(C) of the act that relies on the information supporting the conditionsof approval of an original new drug application.(5) If a supplemental application:(i) Was approved after September 24, 1984, and(ii) Contained reports of new clinical investigations (other than bioavailabilitystudies) that were conducted or sponsored by the applicant that were essentialto approval of the supplemental application, the agency will not make effectivefor a period of 3 years after the date of approval of the supplementalapplication the approval of a 505(b)(2) application or an abbreviated newdrug application for a change, or an abbreviated new drug application submittedpursuant to an approved petition under section 505(j)(2)(C) of the actthat relies on the information supporting a change approved in the supplementalnew drug application.22. Part 314 is amended by revising andSection;andSection; 314.110 and 314.120to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.110 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approvable letter to the applicant.</ITAG>(a) In selected circumstances it is useful at the end of the review periodfor the Food and Drug Administration to indicate to the applicant thatthe application or abbreviated application is basically approvable providingcertain issues are resolved. An approvable letter may be issued in suchcircumstances. FDA will send the applicant an approvable letter if theapplication or abbreviated application substantially meets the requirementsof this part and the agency believes that it can approve the applicationor abbreviated application if specific additional information or materialis submitted or specific conditions (for example, certain changes in labeling)are agreed to by the applicant. The approvable letter will describe theinformation or material FDA requires or the conditions the applicant isasked to meet. As a practical matter, the approvable letter will servein most instances as a mechanism for resolving outstanding issues on drugsthat are about to be approved and marketed. For an application or an abbreviatedantibiotic application, the applicant shall, within 10 days after the dateof the approvable letter:(1) Amend the application or abbreviated antibiotic application or notifyFDA of an intent to file an amendment. The filing of an amendment or noticeof intent to file an amendment constitutes an agreement by the applicantto extend the review period for 45 days after the date FDA receives theamendment. The extension is to permit the agency to review the amendment;(2) Withdraw the application or abbreviated antibiotic application. FDAwill consider the applicant's failure to respond within 10 days to an approvableletter to be a request by the applicant to withdraw the application underandSection; 314.65 or the abbreviated antibiotic application under andSection;314.99. A decision to withdraw an application or abbreviated antibioticapplication is without prejudice to a refiling; (3) For a new drug application, ask the agency to provide the applicantan opportunity for a hearing on the question of whether there are groundsfor denying approval of the application under section 505(d) of the act.The applicant shall submit the request to the Division of Regulatory Affairs(HFD-360), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration,5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857. Within 60 days of the date of theapprovable letter, or within a different time period to which FDA and theapplicant agree, the agency will either approve the application under andSection;314.105 or refuse to approve the application under andSection; 314.125 andgive the applicant written notice of an opportunity for a hearing underandSection; 314.200 and section 505(c)(2) of the act on the question of whetherthere are grounds for denying approval of the application under section505(d) of the act; (4) For an antibiotic, file a petition or notify FDA of an intent to filea petition proposing the issuance, amendment, or repeal of a regulationunder andSection; 314.300 and section 507(F) of the act; or (5) Notify FDA that the applicant agrees to an extension of the reviewperiod under section 505(c) of the act, so that the applicant can determinewhether to respond further under paragraphs (a) (1), (2), (3), or (4) ofthis section. The applicant's notice is required to state the length ofthe extension. FDA will honor any reasonable request for such an extension.FDA will consider the applicant's failure to respond further within theextended review period to be a request to withdraw the application underandSection; 314.65 or the abbreviated antibiotic application under andSection;314.99. A decision to withdraw an application or abbreviated antibioticapplication is without prejudice to a refiling. (b) FDA will send the applicant of an abbreviated new drug applicationan approvable letter only if the application substantially meets the requirementsof this part and the agency believes that it can approve the abbreviatedapplication if minor deficiencies in the draft labeling are corrected andfinal printed labeling is submitted. The approvable letter will describethe labeling deficiencies and state a time period within which the applicantmust respond. Unless the applicant corrects the deficiencies by amendmentor submits final printed labeling within the specified time period, FDAwill refuse to approve the abbreviated application under andSection; 314.127.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.120</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Not approvable letter to the applicant. </ITAG>(a) The Food and Drug Administration will send the applicant a not approvableletter if the agency believes that the application or abbreviated antibioticapplication may not be approved for one of the reasons given in andSection;314.125 or the abbreviated new drug application may not be approved forone of the reasons given in andSection; 314.127. The not approvable letterwill describe the deficiencies in the application or abbreviated application.Except as provided in paragraph (b), within 10 days after the date of thenot approvable letter, the applicant shall: (1) Amend the application or abbreviated application or notify FDA of anintent to file an amendment. The filing of an amendment or a notice ofintent to file an amendment constitutes an agreement by the applicant toextend the review period under andSection; 314.60 or andSection; 314.96;(2) Withdraw the application or abbreviated application. Except as providedin paragraph (b), FDA will consider the applicant's failure to respondwithin 10 days to a not approvable letter to be a request by the applicantto withdraw the application under andSection; 314.65 or abbreviated applicationunder andSection; 314.99. A decision to withdraw the application or abbreviatedapplication is without prejudice to refiling; (3) For a new drug application, ask the agency to provide the applicantan opportunity for a hearing on the question of whether there are groundsfor denying approval of the application under section 505(d) or section505(j)(3) of the act. The applicant shall submit the request to the Divisionof Regulatory Affairs (HFD-360), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research,Food and Drug Administration, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857. Within60 days of the date of the not approvable letter, or within a differenttime period to which FDA and the applicant agree, the agency will eitherapprove the application or abbreviated application under andSection; 314.105or refuse to approve the application or abbreviated antibiotic applicationunder andSection; 314.125 or abbreviated new drug application under andSection;314.127 and give the applicant written notice of an opportunity for a hearingunder andSection; 314.200 and section 505(c)(1)(B) or 505(j)(4)(C) of theact on the question of whether there are grounds for denying approval ofthe application under section 505(d) or 505(j)(3) of the act;(4) For an antibiotic application, file a petition or notify FDA of anintent to file a petition proposing the issuance, amendment, or repealof a regulation under andSection; 314.300 and section 507(F) of the act;or (5) Notify FDA that the applicant agrees to an extension of the reviewperiod under section 505(c)(1) or 505(j)(4)(A) of the act, so that theapplicant can determine whether to respond further under paragraphs (a)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section. The applicant's notice is requiredto state the length of the extension. FDA will honor any reasonable requestfor such an extension. FDA will consider the applicant's failure to respondfurther within the extended review period to be a request to withdraw theapplication under andSection; 314.65 or abbreviated application under andSection;314.99. A decision to withdraw an application or abbreviated applicationis without prejudice to a refiling. (b) The 10-day time period in this section for responding to a not approvableletter does not apply to abbreviated new drug applications. FDA may considerthe applicant's failure to respond within 180 days to a not approvableletter to be a request by the applicant to withdraw the abbreviated newdrug application under andSection; 314.99.23. New andSection; 314.122 is added to Subpart D to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.122</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submitting an application for, or a 505(j)(2)(C) petition that relieson, a listed drug that is no longer marketed. </ITAG>(a) An abbreviated new drug application that refers to, or a petition undersection 505(j)(2)(C) of the act and andSection; 314.93 that relies on, alisted drug that has been voluntarily withdrawn from sale in the UnitedStates must be accompanied by a petition seeking a determination whetherthe listed drug was withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons. Thepetition must be submitted under andSection;andSection; 10.25(a) and 10.30of this chapter and must contain all evidence available to the petitionerconcerning the reasons for the withdrawal from sale. (b) When a petition described in paragraph (a) of this section is submitted,the agency will consider the evidence in the petition and any other evidencebefore the agency, and determine whether the listed drug is withdrawn fromsale for safety or effectiveness reasons, in accordance with the proceduresin andSection; 314.161. (c) An abbreviated new drug application described in paragraph (a) of thissection will be disapproved, pursuant to andSection; 314.127(k), and a 505(j)(2)(C)petition described in paragraph (a) of this section will be disapproved,pursuant to andSection; 314.93(e)(1)(iv), unless the agency determines thatthe withdrawal of the listed drug was not for safety or effectiveness reasons.(d) Certain drug products approved for safety and effectiveness that wereno longer marketed on September 24, 1984, are not included in the list.Any person who wishes to obtain marketing approval for such a drug productunder an abbreviated new drug application must petition FDA for a determinationwhether the drug product was withdrawn from the market for safety or effectivenessreasons and request that the list be amended to include the drug product.A person seeking such a determination shall use the petition proceduresestablished in andSection; 10.30 of this chapter. The petitioner shall includein the petition information to show that the drug product was approvedfor safety and effectiveness and all evidence available to the petitionerconcerning the reason that marketing of the drug product ceased. 24. Section 314.125 is amended by revising the section heading, the introductorytext of paragraph (a), the introductory text of paragraph (b), paragraphs(b) (7), (9), (10), (12), (14), (15), (16), and by adding new paragraph(b)(17) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.125 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Refusal to approve an application or abbreviated antibiotic application.</ITAG>(a) The Food and Drug Administration will refuse to approve the applicationor abbreviated antibiotic application and for a new drug give the applicantwritten notice of an opportunity for a hearing under andSection; 314.200on the question of whether there are grounds for denying approval of theapplication under section 505(d) of the act, or for an antibiotic publisha proposed regulation based on an acceptable petition under andSection; 314.300,if: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) FDA may refuse to approve an application or abbreviated antibioticapplication for any of the following reasons: * * * (7) The application or abbreviated antibiotic application contains an untruestatement of a material fact. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(9) The application or abbreviated antibiotic application does not containbioavailability or bioequivalence data required under Part 320. (10) A reason given in a letter refusing to file the application or abbreviatedantibiotic application under andSection; 314.101(d), if the deficiency isnot corrected. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(12) The applicant does not permit a properly authorized officer or employeeof the Department of Health and Human Services an adequate opportunityto inspect the facilities, controls, and any records relevant to the applicationor abbreviated antibiotic application. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(14) The application or abbreviated antibiotic application does not containan explanation of the omission of a report of any investigation of thedrug product sponsored by the applicant, or an explanation of the omissionof other information about the drug pertinent to an evaluation of the applicationor abbreviated antibiotic application that is received or otherwise obtainedby the applicant from any source. (15) A nonclinical laboratory study that is described in the applicationor abbreviated antibiotic application and that is essential to show thatthe drug is safe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended,or suggested in its proposed labeling was not conducted in compliance withthe good laboratory practice regulations in Part 58 of this chapter andno reason for the noncompliance is provided or, if it is, the differencesbetween the practices used in conducting the study and the good laboratorypractice regulations do not support the validity of the study. (16) Any clinical investigation involving human subjects described in theapplication or abbreviated antibiotic application, subject to the institutionalreview board regulations in Part 56 or informed consent regulations inPart 50 of this chapter, was not conducted in compliance with those regulationssuch that the rights or safety of human subjects were not adequately protected.(17) For a new drug, the application failed to contain the patent informationrequired by section 505(b)(1) of the act and andSection; 314.53. 24a. New andSection; 314.127 is added to Subpart D to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.127 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Refusal to approve an abbreviated new drug application. </ITAG>FDA will refuse to approve an abbreviated application for a new drug undersection 505(j) of the act for any of the following reasons: (a) The methods used in, or the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture,processing, and packing of the drug product are inadequate to assure andpreserve its identity, strength, quality, and purity; (b) Information submitted with the abbreviated new drug application isinsufficient to show that each of the proposed conditions of use have beenpreviously approved for the listed drug referred to in the application;(c)(1) If the reference listed drug has only one active ingredient, informationsubmitted with the abbreviated new drug application is insufficient toshow that the active ingredient is the same as that of the reference listeddrug.(2) If the reference listed drug has more than one active ingredient, informationsubmitted with the abbreviated new drug application is insufficient toshow that the active ingredients are the same as the active ingredientsof the reference listed drug, or (3) If the reference listed drug has more than one active ingredient andif the abbreviated new drug application is for a drug product which hasan active ingredient different from the reference listed drug, (i) Information submitted with the abbreviated new drug application isinsufficient to show: (A) That the other active ingredients are the same as the active ingredientsof the reference listed drug, or (B) That the different active ingredient is an active ingredient of a listeddrug or a drug which does not meet the requirements of section 201(p) ofthe act, or (ii) No petition to submit an abbreviated application for the drug productwith the different active ingredient was approved under andSection; 314.93;(d)(1) If the abbreviated new drug application is for a drug product whoseroute of administration, dosage form, or strength purports to be the sameas that of the listed drug referred to in the abbreviated new drug application,information submitted in the abbreviated new drug application is insufficientto show that the route of administration, dosage form, or strength is thesame as that of the reference listed drug, or(2) If the abbreviated new drug application is for a drug product whoseroute of administration, dosage form, or strength is different from thatof the listed drug referred to in the application, no petition to submitan abbreviated new drug application for the drug product with the differentroute of administration, dosage form, or strength was approved under andSection;314.93. (e) If the abbreviated new drug application was submitted pursuant to theapproval of a petition under andSection; 314.93, the abbreviated new drugapplication did not contain the information required by FDA with respectto the active ingredient, route of administration, dosage form, or strengththat is not the same as that of the reference listed drug; (f)(1) Information submitted in the abbreviated new drug application isinsufficient to show that the drug product is bioequivalent to the listeddrug referred to in the abbreviated new drug application or, (2) if theabbreviated new drug application was submitted pursuant to a petition approvedunder andSection; 314.93, information submitted in the abbreviated new drugapplication is insufficient to show that the active ingredients of thedrug product are of the same pharmacological or therapeutic class as thoseof the reference listed drug and that the drug product can be expectedto have the same therapeutic effect as the reference listed drug when administeredto patients for each condition of use approved for the reference listeddrug;(g) Information submitted in the abbreviated new drug application is insufficientto show that the labeling proposed for the drug is the same as the labelingapproved for the listed drug referred to in the abbreviated new drug applicationexcept for changes required because of differences approved in a petitionunder andSection; 314.93 or because the drug product and the reference listeddrug are produced or distributed by different manufacturers; (h)(1) Information submitted in the abbreviated new drug application orany other information available to FDA shows that: (i) The inactive ingredients of the drug product are unsafe for use, asdescribed in paragraph (h)(2) of this section, under the conditions prescribed,recommended, or suggested in the labeling proposed for the drug product,or (ii) The composition of the drug product is unsafe, as described in paragraph(h)(2) of this section, under the conditions prescribed, recommended, orsuggested in the proposed labeling because of the type or quantity of inactiveingredients included or the manner in which the inactive ingredients areincluded; (2)(i) FDA will consider the inactive ingredients or composition of a drugproduct unsafe and refuse to approve an abbreviated new drug applicationunder paragraph (h)(1) of this section if, on the basis of informationavailable to the agency, there is a reasonable basis to conclude that oneor more of the inactive ingredients of the proposed drug or  its compositionraise serious questions of safety. From its experience with reviewing inactiveingredients, and from other information available to it, FDA may identifychanges in inactive ingredients or composition that may adversely affecta drug product's safety. The inactive ingredients or composition of a proposeddrug product will be considered to raise serious questions of safety ifthe product incorporates one or more of these changes. Examples of thechanges that raise serious questions of safety include: (A) change in an inactive ingredient so that the product does not complywith an official compendium. (B) A change in composition to include an inactive ingredient that hasnot been previously approved in a drug product for human use by the sameroute of administration. (C) A change in the composition of a parental drug product to include aninactive ingredient that has not been previously approved in a parentaldrug product. (D) A change in composition of a drug product for ophthalmic use to includean inactive ingredient that has not been previously approved in a drugfor ophthalmic use. (E) The use of a controlled release mechanism never before approved forthe drug. (F) A change in composition to include a significantly higher concentrationof one or more inactive ingredients than previously used in the drug product.(G) If the drug product is intended for topical administration, a changein the properties of the vehicle or base that might increase absorptionof certain potentially toxic active ingredients thereby affecting the safetyof the drug product, or a change in the lipophilic properties of a vehicleor base, e.g., a change from an oleaginous to a water soluble vehicle orbase.(ii) FDA will consider an inactive ingredient in, or the composition of,a drug product intended for parenteral use to be unsafe and will refuseto approve the abbreviated new drug application unless it contains thesame inactive ingredients, other than preservatives, buffers, and antioxidants,in the same concentration as the listed drug, and, if it differs from thelisted drug in a preservative, buffer, or antioxidant, the applicationcontains sufficient information to demonstrate that the difference doesnot affect the safety of the drug product.(iii) FDA will consider an inactive ingredient in, or the composition of,a drug product intended for ophthalmic or otic use unsafe and will refuseto approve the abbreviated new drug application unless it contains thesame inactive ingredients, other than preservatives, buffers, substancesto adjust toxicity or thickening agents, in the same concentration as thelisted drug, and if it differs from the listed drug in a preservative,buffer, substance to adjust toxicity or thickening agent, the applicationcontains sufficient information to demonstrate that the difference doesnot affect the safety of the drug product and the labeling does not claimany therapeutic advantage over or difference from the listed drug.(i) Approval of the listed drug referred to in the abbreviated new drugapplication has been withdrawn or suspended for grounds described in andSection;314.150(a) or FDA has published a notice of opportunity for hearing towithdraw approval of the reference listed drug under andSection; 314.150(a);(j) Approval of the reference listed drug has been withdrawn under andSection;314.151 or FDA has proposed to withdraw approval of the reference listeddrug under andSection; 314.151(a);(k) FDA has determined that the reference listed drug has been withdrawnfrom sale for safety or effectiveness reasons under andSection; 314.161,or the reference listed drug has been voluntarily withdrawn from sale andthe agency has not determined whether the withdrawal is for safety or effectivenessreasons, or approval of the reference listed drug has been suspended underandSection; 314.153, or the agency has issued an initial decision proposingto suspend the reference listed drug under andSection; 314.153(a)(1);(l) The abbreviated new drug application does not meet any other requirementunder section 505(j)(2)(A) of the act; or(m) The abbreviated new drug application contains an untrue statement ofmaterial fact.25. Section 314.150 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.150 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Withdrawal of approval of an application or abbreviated application.</ITAG>(a) The Food and Drug Administration will notify the applicant, and, ifappropriate, all other persons who manufacture or distribute identical,related, or similar drug products as defined in andSection;andSection; 310.6and 314.151(a) and for a new drug afford an opportunity for a hearing ona proposal to withdraw approval of the application or abbreviated new drugapplication under section 505(e) of the act and under the procedure inandSection; 314.200, or, for an antibiotic, rescind a certification or release,or amend or repeal a regulation providing for certification under section507 of the act and under the procedure in andSection; 314.300, if any ofthe following applies:(1) The Secretary of Health and Human Services has suspended the approvalof the application or abbreviated application for a new drug on a findingthat there is an imminent hazard to the public health. FDA will promptlyafford the applicant an expedited hearing following summary suspensionon a finding of imminent hazard to health.(2) FDA finds:(i) That clinical or other experience, tests, or other scientific datashow that the drug is unsafe for use under the conditions of use upon thebasis of which the application or abbreviated application was approved;or(ii) That new evidence of clinical experience, not contained in the applicationor not available to FDA until after the application or abbreviated applicationwas approved, or tests by new methods, or tests by methods not deemed reasonablyapplicable when the application or abbreviated application was approved,evaluated together with the evidence available when the application orabbreviated application was approved, reveal that the drug is not shownto be safe for use under the conditions of use upon the basis of whichthe application or abbreviated application was approved; or(iii) Upon the basis of new information before FDA with respect to thedrug, evaluated together with the evidence available when the applicationor abbreviated application was approved, that there is a lack of substantialevidence from adequate and well-controlled investigations as defined inandSection; 314.126, that the drug will have the effect it is purported oris represented to have under the conditions of use prescribed, recommended,or suggested in its labeling; or(iv) That the application or abbreviated application contains any untruestatement of a material fact; or(v) That the patent information prescribed by section 505(c) of the actwas not submitted within 30 days after the receipt of written notice fromFDA specifying the failure to submit such information.(b) FDA may notify the applicant, and, if appropriate, all other personswho manufacture or distribute identical, related, or similar drug productsas defined in andSection; 310.6, and for a new drug afford an opportunityfor a hearing on a proposal to withdraw approval of the application orabbreviated new drug application under section 505(e) of the act and underthe procedure in andSection; 314.200, or, for an antibiotic, rescind a certificationor release, or amend or repeal a regulation providing for certificationunder section 507 of the act and the procedure in andSection; 314.300, ifthe agency finds:(1) That the applicant has failed to establish a system for maintainingrequired records, or has repeatedly or deliberately failed to maintainrequired records or to make required reports under section 505(k) or 507(g)of the act and andSection;andSection; 314.80, 314.81, or 314.98, or that theapplicant has refused to permit access to, or copying or verification of,its records.(2) That on the basis of new information before FDA, evaluated togetherwith the evidence available when the application or abbreviated applicationwas approved, the methods used in, or the facilities and controls usedfor, the manufacture, processing, and packing of the drug are inadequateto assure and preserve its identity, strength, quality, and purity andwere not made adequate within a reasonable time after receipt of writtennotice from the agency.(3) That on the basis of new information before FDA, evaluated togetherwith the evidence available when the application or abbreviated applicationwas approved, the labeling of the drug, based on a fair evaluation of allmaterial facts, is false or misleading in any particular; and the labelingwas not corrected by the applicant within a reasonable time after receiptof written notice from the agency. (4) That the applicant has failed to comply with the notice requirementsof section 510(j)(2) of the act. (5) That the applicant has failed to submit bioavailability or bioequivalencedata required under Part 320 of this chapter. (6) The application or abbreviated application does not contain an explanationof the omission of a report of any investigation of the drug product sponsoredby the applicant, or an explanation of the omission of other informationabout the drug pertinent to an evaluation of the application or abbreviatedapplication that is received or otherwise obtained by the applicant fromany source. (7) That any nonclinical laboratory study that is described in the applicationor abbreviated application and that is essential to show that the drugis safe for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggestedin its labeling was not conducted in compliance with the good laboratorypractice regulations in Part 58 of this chapter and no reason for the noncompliancewas provided or, if it was, the differences between the practices usedin conducting the study and the good laboratory practice regulations donot support the validity of the study. (8) Any clinical investigation involving human subjects described in theapplication or abbreviated application, subject to the institutional reviewboard regulations in Part 56 of this chapter or informed consent regulationsin Part 50 of this chapter was not conducted in compliance with those regulationssuch that the rights or safety of human subjects were not adequately protected.(c) FDA will withdraw approval of an application or abbreviated applicationif the applicant requests its withdrawal because the drug subject to theapplication or abbreviated application is no longer being marketed, providednone of the conditions listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sectionapply to the drug. FDA will consider a written request for withdrawal underthis paragraph to be a waiver of an opportunity for hearing otherwise providedfor in this section. Withdrawal of approval of an application or abbreviatedapplication under this paragraph is without prejudice to refiling. (d) FDA may notify an applicant that it believes a potential problem associatedwith a drug is sufficiently serious that the drug should be removed fromthe market and may ask the applicant to waive the opportunity for hearingotherwise provided for under this section, to permit FDA to withdraw approvalof the application or abbreviated application for the product, and to removevoluntarily the product from the market. If the applicant agrees, the agencywill not make a finding under paragraph (b) of this section, but will withdrawapproval of the application or abbreviated application in a notice publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> that contains a brief summary of the agency'sand the applicant's views of the reasons for withdrawal. 26. New andSection; 314.151 is added to Subpart D to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.151</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Withdrawal of approval of an abbreviated new drug application pursuantto section 505(j)(5) of the act. </ITAG>(a) Approval of an abbreviated new drug application approved under andSection;314.105(d) may be withdrawn when the agency withdraws approval, under andSection;314.150(a) or under this section, of the approved drug referred to in theabbreviated new drug application. If the agency proposes to withdraw approvalof a listed drug under andSection; 314.150(a), the holder of an approvedapplication for the listed drug has a right to notice and opportunity forhearing. The published notice of opportunity for hearing will identifyall drug products approved under andSection; 314.105(d) whose applicationsare subject to withdrawal under this section if the listed drug is withdrawn,and will propose to withdraw such drugs. Holders of approved applicationsfor the identified drug products will be provided notice and an opportunityto respond to the proposed withdrawal of their applications as describedin paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section. (b)(1) The published notice of opportunity for hearing on the withdrawalof the listed drug will serve as notice to holders of identified abbreviatednew drug applications of the grounds for the proposed withdrawal. (2) Holders of applications for drug products identified in the noticeof opportunity for hearing may submit written comments on the notice ofopportunity for hearing issued on the proposed withdrawal of the listeddrug. If an abbreviated new drug application holder submits comments onthe notice of opportunity for hearing and a hearing is granted, the abbreviatednew drug application holder may participate in the hearing as a nonpartyparticipant as provided for in andSection; 12.89 of this chapter. (3) Except as provided in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this section, the approvalof an abbreviated new drug application for a drug product identified inthe notice of opportunity for hearing on the withdrawal of a listed drugwill be withdrawn when the agency has completed the withdrawal of approvalof the listed drug.(c)(1) If the holder of an application for a drug identified in the noticeof opportunity for hearing has submitted timely comments but does not havean opportunity to participate in a hearing because a hearing is not requestedor is settled, the submitted comments will be considered by the agency,which will issue an initial decision. The initial decision will respondto the comments, and contain the agency's decision whether there are groundsto withdraw approval of the listed drug and of the abbreviated new drugapplications on which timely comments were submitted. The initial decisionwill be sent to each abbreviated new drug application holder that has submittedcomments. (2) Abbreviated new drug application holders to whom the initial decisionwas sent, may, within 30 days of the issuance of the initial decision submitwritten objections. (3) The agency may, at its discretion, hold a limited oral hearing to resolvedispositive factual issues that cannot be resolved on the basis of writtensubmissions. (4) If there are no timely objections to the initial decision, it willbecome final at the expiration of 30 days. (5) If timely objections are submitted, they will be reviewed and respondedto in a final decision. (6) The written comments received, the initial decision, the evidence reliedon in the comments and in the initial decision, the objections to the initialdecision, and, if a limited oral hearing has been held, the transcriptof that hearing and any documents submitted therein, shall form the recordupon which the agency shall make a final decision. (7) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this section, any abbreviatednew drug application whose holder submitted comments on the notice of opportunityfor hearing shall be withdrawn upon the issuance of a final decision concludingthat the listed drug should be withdrawn for grounds as described in andSection;314.150(a). The final decision shall be in writing and shall constitutefinal agency action, reviewable in a judicial proceeding. (8) Documents in the record will be publicly available in accordance withandSection; 10.20(j) of this chapter. Documents available for examinationor copying will be placed on public display in the office of the DocketsManagement Branch promptly upon receipt in that office. (d) If the agency determines, based upon information submitted by the holderof an abbreviated new drug application, that the grounds for withdrawalof the listed drug are not applicable to a drug identified in the noticeof opportunity for hearing, the final decision will state that the approvalof the abbreviated new drug application for such drug is not withdrawn.27. Section 314.152 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.152 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of withdrawal of approval of an application or abbreviatedapplication for a new drug. </ITAG>If the Food and Drug Administration withdraws approval of an applicationor abbreviated application for a new drug, FDA will publish a notice inthe <T4>Federal Register</T4> announcing the withdrawal of approval. If theapplication or abbreviated application was withdrawn for grounds describedin andSection; 314.150(a) or andSection; 314.151, the notice will announcethe removal of the drug from the list of approved drugs published pursuantto section 505(j)(6) of the act and shall satisfy the requirement of andSection;314.162(b). 28. New andSection; 314.153 is added to Subpart D to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.153 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Suspension of approval of an abbreviated new drug application. </ITAG>(a) The approval of an abbreviated new drug application approved pursuantto andSection; 314.105(d) shall be suspended for the period stated when:(1) The Secretary, pursuant to the imminent hazard authority of section505(e) of the act or the authority of this paragraph, suspends approvalof a listed drug referred to in the abbreviated new drug application, forthe period of the suspension; (2) The agency, in the notice described in paragraph (b) of this section,or in any subsequent written notice given an abbreviated new drug applicationholder by the agency, concludes that the risk of continued marketing anduse of the drug is inappropriate, pending completion of proceedings towithdraw or suspend approval under andSection; 314.151 or paragraph (b) ofthis section; or (3) The agency, pursuant to the procedures set forth in paragraph (b) ofthis section, issues a final decision stating his determination that theabbreviated application is suspended because the listed drug on which theapproval of the abbreviated new drug application depends has been withdrawnfrom sale for reasons of safety or effectiveness or has been suspendedunder paragraph (b) of this section. The suspension will take effect onthe date stated in the decision and will remain in effect until the agencydetermines that the marketing of the drug has resumed or that the withdrawalis not for safety or effectiveness reasons. (b) <T3>Procedures for suspension of abbreviated new drug applications whena listed drug is voluntarily withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons.</T3>(1) If a listed drug is voluntarily withdrawn from sale, and the agencydetermines that the withdrawal from sale was for reasons of safety or effectiveness,the agency will send each holder of an approved abbreviated new drug applicationthat is subject to suspension as a result of the determination a copy ofthe agency's initial decision setting forth the reasons for the determination.The initial decision will also be placed on file with the Dockets ManagementBranch (HFA-305), Food and Drug Administration, Rm. 4-62, Rockville, MD20857. (2) Each abbreviated new drug application holder will have 30 days fromthe issuance of the initial decision to present, in writing, comments andinformation bearing on the initial decision. If no comments or informationare received, the initial decision will become final at the expirationof 30 days. (3) Comments and information received within 30 days of the issuance ofthe initial decision will be considered by the agency and responded toin a final decision.(4) The agency may, in its discretion, hold a limited oral hearing to resolvedispositive factual issues that cannot be resolved on the basis of writtensubmissions. (5) If the final decision affirms the agency's initial decision that thelisted drug was withdrawn for reasons of safety or effectiveness, the decisionwill be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> in compliance with andSection; 314.152, and will,except as provided in paragraph (b)(6) of this section, suspend approvalof all abbreviated new drug applications identified pursuant to paragraph(b)(1) of this section and remove from the list the listed drug and anydrug whose approval was suspended pursuant to this paragraph. The noticewill satisfy the requirement of andSection; 314.162(b). The agency's finaldecision and copies of materials on which it relies will also be filedwith the Dockets Management Branch (address in paragraph (b)(1) of thissection). (6) If the agency determines in its final decision that the listed drugwas withdrawn for reasons of safety or effectiveness but, based upon informationsubmitted by the holder of an abbreviated new drug application, also determinesthat the reasons for the withdrawal of the listed drug are not relevantto the safety and effectiveness of the drug subject to such abbreviatednew drug application, the final decision will state that the approval ofsuch abbreviated new drug application is not suspended. (7) Documents in the record will be publicly available in accordance withandSection; 10.20(j) of this chapter. Documents available for examinationor copying will be placed on public display in the Dockets Management Branch(address in paragraph (b)(1) of this section) promptly upon receipt inthat office. 29. Section 314.160 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.160 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of an application or abbreviated application for which approvalwas previously refused, suspended, or withdrawn. </ITAG>Upon the Food and Drug Administration's own initiative or upon requestof an applicant, FDA may, on the basis of new data, approve an applicationor abbreviated application which it had previously refused, suspended,or withdrawn approval. FDA will publish a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> announcing the approval. 30. New andSection;andSection; 314.161 and 314.162 are added to Subpart D toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.161 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determination of reasons for voluntary withdrawal of a listed drug.</ITAG>(a) A determination whether a listed drug that has been voluntarily withdrawnfrom sale was withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons may be madeby the agency at any time after the drug has been voluntarily withdrawnfrom sale, but must be made: (1) Prior to approving an abbreviated new drug application that refersto the listed drug; (2) Whenever a listed drug is voluntarily withdrawn from sale and abbreviatednew drug applications that referred to the listed drug have been approved;and (3) When a person petitions for such a determination under andSection;andSection;10.25(a) and 10.30 of this chapter. (b) Any person may petition under andSection;andSection; 10.25(a) and 10.30of this chapter for a determination whether a listed drug has been voluntarilywithdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons. Any such petition must containall evidence available to the petitioner concerning the reason that thedrug is withdrawn from sale. (c) If the agency determines that a listed drug is withdrawn from salefor safety or effectiveness reasons, the agency will, except as providedin paragraph (d) of this section, publish a notice of the determinationin the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. (d) If the agency determines under paragraph (a) of this section that alisted drug is withdrawn from sale for safety or effectiveness reasonsand there are approved abbreviated new drug applications that are subjectto suspension under section 505(j)(5) of the act, FDA will initiate a proceedingin accordance with andSection; 314.153(b). (e) A drug that the agency determines is withdrawn for safety or effectivenessreasons will be removed from the list, pursuant to andSection; 314.162. Thedrug may be relisted if the agency has evidence that marketing of the drughas resumed or that the withdrawal is not for safety or effectiveness reasons.A determination that the drug is not withdrawn for safety or effectivenessreasons may be made at any time after its removal from the list, upon theagency's initiative or upon the submission of a petition pursuant to andSection;andSection;10.25(a) and 10.30 of this chapter. If the agency determines that the drugis not withdrawn for safety or effectiveness reasons, the agency shallpublish a notice of this determination in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The notice will also announce that the drugis relisted, pursuant to andSection; 314.162(c). The notice will also serveto reinstate approval of all suspended abbreviated new drug applicationsthat referred to the listed drug.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.162 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Removal of a drug product from the list. </ITAG>(a) FDA will remove a previously approved new drug product from the listfor the period stated when: (1) The agency withdraws or suspends approval of a new drug applicationor an abbreviated new drug application pursuant to andSection; 314.150(a)or andSection; 314.151 or pursuant to the imminent hazard authority of section505(e) of the act, for the same period as the withdrawal or suspensionof the application; or (2) The agency, in accordance with the procedures in andSection; 314.153(b)or andSection; 314.161, issues a final decision stating that the listed drugwas withdrawn from sale for safety or effectiveness reasons, or suspendedpursuant to andSection; 314.153(b), until the agency, determines that thewithdrawal from the market has ceased or is not for safety or effectivenessreasons. (b) FDA will publish a notice announcing the removal of a drug from thelist in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. (c) At the end of the period specified in paragraph (a) (1) or (2) of thissection, FDA will relist a drug that has been removed from the list. Theagency will publish a notice announcing the relisting of the drug in the<T4>Federal Register</T4>. 31. Section 314.200 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph(a), paragraphs (b) (1) and (2), the last sentence in paragraph (c)(1),and paragraph (c)(3), and the first sentence in paragraph (g)(1) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.200 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of opportunity for hearing; notice of participation and requestfor hearing; grant or denial of hearing. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice of opportunity for hearing. </T3>The Director of the Centerfor Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, will givethe applicant, and all other persons who manufacture or distribute identical,related, or similar drug products as defined in andSection; 310.6 of thischapter, notice and an opportunity for a hearing on the Center's proposalto refuse to approve an application or abbreviated application or to withdrawthe approval of an application or abbreviated application pursuant to section505(e) of the act. The notice will state the reasons for the action andthe proposed grounds for the order. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (1) To any person who has submitted an application or abbreviated application,by delivering the notice in person or by sending it by registered or certifiedmail to the last address shown in the application or abbreviated application.(2) To any person who has not submitted an application or abbreviated applicationbut who is subject to the notice under andSection; 310.6 of this chapter,by publication of the notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. (c)(1) <T3>Notice of participation and request for a hearing, and submission ofstudies and comments. </T3>* * * The applicant, or other person, may incorporateby reference the raw data underlying a study if the data were previouslysubmitted to FDA as part of an application, abbreviated application orother report.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(3) Any other interested person who is not subject to the notice of opportunityfor a hearing may also submit comments on the proposal to withdraw approvalof the application or abbreviated application. The comments are requestedto be submitted within the time and under the conditions specified in thissection. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(g) * * *(1) Where a specific notice of opportunity for hearing (as defined in paragraph(a)(1) of this section) is used, the Commissioner will enter summary judgmentagainst a person who requests a hearing, making findings and conclusions,denying a hearing, if it conclusively appears from the face of the data,information, and factual analyses in the request for the hearing that thereis no genuine and substantial issue of fact which precludes the refusalto approve the application or abbreviated application or the withdrawalof approval of the application or abbreviated application; for example,no adequate and well-controlled clinical investigations meeting each ofthe precise elements of andSection; 314.126 and, for a combination drug product,andSection; 300.50 of this chapter, showing effectiveness have been identified.* * * <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>32. Section 314.430 is amended by revising the section heading, paragraphs(a), (b), (c), and (d), the introductory text of paragraph (e), paragraphs(f) (5) and (6), and the introductory text of paragraph (g), to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.430 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Availability for public disclosure of data and information in an applicationor abbreviated application. </ITAG>(a) The Food and Drug Administration will determine the public availabilityof any part of an application or abbreviated application under this sectionand Part 20 of this chapter. For purposes of this section, the applicationor abbreviated application includes all data and information submittedwith or incorporated by reference in the application or abbreviated application,including investigational new drug applications, drug master files underandSection; 314.420, supplements submitted under andSection; 314.70 or andSection;314.97, reports under andSection; 314.80 or andSection; 314.98, and other submissions.For purposes of this section, safety and effectiveness data include allstudies and tests of a drug on animals and humans and all studies and testsof the drug for identity, stability, purity, potency, and bioavailability.(b) FDA will not publicly disclose the existence of an application or abbreviatedapplication before an approvable letter is sent to the applicant underandSection; 314.110, unless the existence of the application or abbreviatedapplication has been previously publicly disclosed or acknowledged. TheCenter for Drug Evaluation and Research will maintain and make availablefor public disclosure a list of applications or abbreviated applicationsfor which the agency has sent an approvable letter to the applicant. (c) If the existence of an unapproved application or abbreviated applicationhas not been publicly disclosed or acknowledged, no data or informationin the application or abbreviated application is available for public disclosure.(d) If the existence of an application or abbreviated application has beenpublicly disclosed or acknowledged before the agency sends an approvalletter to the applicant, no data or information contained in the applicationor abbreviated application is available for public disclosure before theagency sends an approval letter, but the Commissioner may, in his or herdiscretion, disclose a summary of selected portions of the safety and effectivenessdata that are appropriate for public consideration of a specific pendingissue, for example, for consideration of an open session of an FDA advisorycommittee. (e) After FDA sends an approval letter to the applicant, the followingdata and information in the application or abbreviated application areimmediately available for public disclosure, unless the applicant showsthat extraordinary circumstances exist. A list of approved applicationsand abbreviated applications, entitled ``Approved Drug Products with TherapeuticEquivalence Evaluations,'' is available from the Government Printing Office,Washington DC 20402. The list is updated monthly. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(f) * * * (5) For applications submitted under section 505(b) of the act, the effectivedate of the approval of the first abbreviated application submitted undersection 505(j) of the act which refers to such drug, or the date on whichthe approval of an abbreviated application under section 505(j) which refersto such drug could be made effective if such an abbreviated applicationhad been submitted. (6) For applications or abbreviated applications submitted under sections505(j), 506, and 507 of the act, when FDA sends an approval letter to theapplicant. (g) The following data and information in an application or abbreviatedapplication are not available for public disclosure unless they have beenpreviously disclosed to the public as set forth in andSection; 20.81 of thischapter or they relate to a product or ingredient that has been abandonedand they do not represent a trade secret or confidential commercial orfinancial information under andSection; 20.61 of this chapter: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>33. Section 314.440 is amended by revising the section heading and paragraph(a), introductory text, and paragraphs (a) (1) and (2) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 314.440 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Addresses for applications and abbreviated applications. </ITAG>(a) Applicants shall send applications, abbreviated applications, and othercorrespondence relating to matters covered by this part, except for productslisted in paragraph (b) of this section, to the Center for Drug Evaluationand Research, Food and Drug Administration, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville,MD 20857, and directed to the appropriate office identified below: (1) An application under andSection; 314.50 or andSection; 314.54 submittedfor filing should be directed to the Central Document Room, Center forDrug Evaluation and Research, Park Bldg., Rm. 214, 12420 Parklawn Dr.,Rockville, MD 20852. Applicants may obtain folders for binding applicationsfrom that office. After FDA has filed the application, the agency willinform the applicant which division is responsible for the application.Amendments, supplements, resubmissions, requests for waivers, and othercorrespondence about an application that has been filed should be directedto the appropriate division. (2) An abbreviated application under andSection; 314.94, and amendments,supplements, resubmissions, and other correspondence about an abbreviatedapplication should be directed to the Division of Generic Drugs (HFD-230).Applicants may obtain folders for binding abbreviated applications fromthat office. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 320_BIOAVAILABILITY AND BIOEQUIVALENCE REQUIREMENTS </ITAG>34. Part 320 is amended by revising the table of contents, by adding anauthority citation to follow the table of contents, and by removing theauthority citations following andSection; 320.1 and the authority citationsfollowing the headings for Subparts B and C to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56"> PART 320_BIOAVAILABILITY AND BIOEQUIVALENCE REQUIREMENTS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72"> Subpart A_General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70"> Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26"> 320.1 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76"> Subpart B_Procedures for Determining the Bioavailability or Bioequivalenceof Drug Products</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26"> 320.21 Requirements for submission of in vivo bioavailability andbioequivalence data.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.22 Criteria for waiver of evidence of in vivo bioavailabilityor bioequivalence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.23  Basis for demonstrating bioavailability or bioequivalence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.24 Types of evidence to establish bioavailability or bioequivalence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.25 Guidelines for the conduct of an in vivo bioavailability study.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.26 Guidelines on the design of a single-dose in vivo bioavailabilitystudy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.27 Guidelines on the design of a multiple-dose in vivo bioavailabilitystudy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.28 Correlation of bioavailability with an acute pharmacologicaleffect or clinical evidence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.29 Analytical methods for an in vivo bioavailability study.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.30 Inquiries regarding bioavailability and bioequivalence requirementsand review of protocols by the Food and Drug Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.31 Applicability of requirements regarding an ``InvestigationalNew Drug Application''.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.32 Criteria and evidence to assess actual or potential bioequivalenceproblems.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.33 Requirements for batch testing and certification by the Foodand Drug Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.34 Requirements for in vitro testing of each batch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">320.35 Requirements for maintenance of records of bioequivalence testing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 201(p), 501, 502, 505, 701(a) (21 U.S.C. 321(p),351, 352, 355, 371(a)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 320.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Amended]</ITAG> 35. Section 320.1 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and (e), and byremoving paragraph (f) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">329 andSection; 320.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG> (a) ``Bioavailability'' means the rate and extent to which the activeingredient or active moiety is absorbed from a drug product and becomesavailable at the site of action. For drug products that are not intendedto be absorbed into the bloodstream, bioavailability may be assessed bymeasurements intended to reflect the rate and extent to which the activeingredient or active moiety becomes available at the site of action. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(e) ``Bioequivalence'' means the absence of a significant difference inthe rate and extent to which the active ingredient or active moiety inpharmaceutical equivalents or pharmaceutical alternatives becomes availableat the site of drug action when administered at the same molar dose undersimilar conditions in an appropriately designed study. Where there is anintentional difference in rate (e.g., in certain controlled release dosageforms), certain pharmaceutical equivalents or alternatives may be consideredbioequivalent if there is no significant difference in the extent to whichthe active ingredient or moiety from each product becomes available atthe site of drug action. This applies only if the difference in the rateat which the active ingredient or moiety becomes available at the siteof drug action is reflected in the proposed labeling, is not essentialto the attainment of effective body drug concentrations on chronic use,and is considered medically insignificant for the drug.36. Part 320 is amended by revising the heading for Subpart B, andSection;andSection;320.21, 320.22, 320.23, 320.24, 320.30, and 320.31, and by removing theheading for Subpart C to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart B_Procedures for Determining the Bioavailability or Bioequivalenceof Drug Products</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.21 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for submission of in vivo bioavailability and bioequivalencedata.</ITAG>(a) Any person submitting a full new drug application to the Food and DrugAdministration (FDA) shall include in the application either: (1) Evidence demonstrating the in vivo bioavailability of the drug productthat is the subject of the application; or (2) Information to permit FDA to waive the submission of evidence demonstratingin vivo bioavailability. (b) Any person submitting an abbreviated new drug application to FDA shallinclude in the application either:(1) Evidence demonstrating that the drug product that is the subject ofthe abbreviated new drug application is bioequivalent to the referencelisted drug (defined in andSection; 314.3(b)); or, (2) Information to show that the drug product is bioequivalent to thereference listed drug which would permit FDA to waive the submission ofevidence demonstrating bioequivalence as provided in paragraph (f) of thissection. (c) Any person submitting a supplemental application to FDA shall includein the supplemental application the evidence or information set forth inparagraph (a) and (b) of this section if the supplemental application proposesany of the following changes: (1) A change in the manufacturing process, including a change in productformulation or dosage strength, beyond the variations provided for in theapproved application. (2) A change in the labeling to provide for a new indication for use ofthe drug product, if clinical studies are required to support the new indicationfor use. (3) A change in the labeling to provide for a new dosage regimen or foran additional dosage regimen for a special patient population, e.g., infants,if clinical studies are required to support the new or additional dosageregimen. (d) FDA may approve a full new drug application, or a supplemental applicationproposing any of the changes set forth in paragraph (c) of this section,that does not contain evidence of in vivo bioavailability or informationto permit waiver of the requirement for in vivo bioavailability data, ifall of the following conditions are met: (1) The application was under review by FDA on July 7, 1977. (2) The application is otherwise approvable. (3) The applicant agrees to submit, within the time specified by FDA,either: (i) Evidence demonstrating the in vivo bioavailability of the drug productthat is the subject of the application; or, (ii) Information to permit FDA to waive demonstration of in vivo bioavailability.(e) Evidence demonstrating the in vivo bioavailability and bioequivalenceof a drug product shall be obtained using one of the approaches for determiningbioavailability set forth in andSection; 320.24. (f) Information to permit FDA to waive the submission of evidence demonstratingin vivo bioavailability or bioequivalence shall meet the criteria set forthin andSection; 320.22. (g) Any person holding an approved full or abbreviated new drug applicationshall submit to FDA a supplemental application containing new evidencedemonstrating the in vivo bioavailability or bioequivalence of the drugproduct that is the subject of the application if notified by FDA that:(1) There are data demonstrating that the dosage regimen in the labelingis based on incorrect assumptions or facts regarding the pharmacokineticsof the drug product and that following this dosage regimen could potentiallyresult in subtherapeutic or toxic levels; or, (2) There are data demonstrating significant intra-batch and batch-to-batchvariability, e.g., plus or minus 25 percent, in the bioavailability ofthe drug product.(h) The requirements of this section regarding the submission of evidencedemonstrating in vivo bioavailability and bioequivalence apply only toa full or abbreviated new drug application or a supplemental applicationfor a finished dosage formulation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.22 Criteria for waiver of evidence of in vivo bioavailabilityor bioequivalence.</ITAG>(a) Any person submitting a full or abbreviated new drug application, ora supplemental application proposing any of the changes set forth in andSection;320.21(c), may request the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) to waivethe requirement for the submission of evidence demonstrating the in vivobioavailability or bioequivalence of the drug product that is the subjectof the application. An applicant shall submit a request for waiver withthe application. Except as provided in paragraph (g) of this section, FDAshall waive the requirement for the submission of evidence of in vivo bioavailabilityor bioequivalence if the drug product meets any of the provisions of paragraphs(b), (c), (d), or (e) of this section.(b) For certain drug products the in vivo bioavailability or bioequivalenceof the drug product may be self-evident. FDA shall waive the requirementfor the submission of evidence obtained in vivo demonstrating the bioavailabilityor bioequivalence of these drug products. A drug product's in vivo bioavailabilityor bioequivalence is considered self-evident if the product meets one ofthe following criteria: (1) The drug product: (i) Is a solution intended solely for intravenous administration, and(ii) Contains the same active and inactive ingredients in the same concentrationas a drug product that is the subject of an approved full new drug application.(2) The drug product: (i) Is administered by inhalation as a gas, e.g., a medicinal or an inhalationanesthetic, and (ii) Contains an active drug ingredient in the same dosage form as a drugproduct that is the subject of an approved full new drug application. (3) The drug product: (i) Is an oral solution, elixir, syrup, tincture, or similar other solubilizedform, (ii) Contains an active drug ingredient in the same concentration and dosageform as a drug product that is the subject of an approved full new drugapplication, and (iii) Contains no inactive ingredient that may significantly affect absorptionof the active drug ingredient or active moiety. (c) FDA shall waive the requirement for the submission of evidence demonstratingthe in vivo bioavailability of a parenteral drug product that is determinedto be effective for at least one indication in a Drug Efficacy Study Implementationnotice or that, upon submission of evidence, is shown to be identical inboth active and inactive ingredient formulation to that drug as currentlyapproved in a new drug application, if the drug product is not one of thefollowing: (1) A drug in suspension form. (2) Phenytoin sodium powder for injection. (d) FDA shall waive the requirement for the submission of evidence demonstratingthe in vivo bioavailability of a solid oral dosage form (other than anenteric coated or controlled release dosage form) of a drug product determinedto be effective for at least one indication in a Drug Efficacy Study Implementationnotice or which is identical, related, or similar to such a drug productunder andSection; 310.6 of this chapter unless FDA has evaluated the drugproduct under the criteria set forth in andSection; 320.32, included thedrug product in the Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic EquivalenceEvaluations List, and rated the drug product as having a known or potentialbioequivalence problem. A drug product so rated reflects a determinationby FDA that an in vivo bioequivalence study is required. (e) For certain drug products bioavailability or bioequivalence may bedemonstrated by evidence obtained in vitro in lieu of in vivo data. FDAshall waive the requirement for the submission of evidence obtained invivo demonstrating the bioavailability of the drug product if the drugproduct meets one of the following criteria: (1) [Reserved] (2) The drug product is in the same dosage form, but in a different strength,and is proportionally similar in its active and inactive ingredients toanother drug product for which the same manufacturer has obtained approvaland the following conditions are met: (i) The bioavailability of this other drug product has been demonstrated,(ii) Both drug products meet an appropriate in vitro test approved by FDA,and (iii) The applicant submits evidence showing that both drug products areproportionally similar in their active and inactive ingredients. (3) The drug product is, on the basis of scientific evidence submittedin the application, shown to meet an in vitro test that has been correlatedwith in vivo data.(4) The drug product is a reformulated product that is identical, exceptfor a different color, flavor, or preservative that could not affect thebioavailability of the reformulated product, to another drug product forwhich the same manufacturer has obtained approval and the following conditionsare met:(i) The bioavailability of the other product has been demonstrated, and(ii) Both drug products meet an appropriate in vitro test approved by FDA.(f) FDA, for good cause, may waive a requirement for the submission ofevidence of in vivo bioavailability if waiver is compatible with the protectionof the public health. For full new drug applications, FDA may defer a requirementfor the submission of evidence of in vivo bioavailability if deferral iscompatible with the protection of the public health. (g) FDA, for good cause, may require evidence of in vivo bioavailabilityor bioequivalence for any drug product if the agency determines that anydifference between the drug product and a listed drug may affect the bioavailabilityor bioequivalence of the drug product. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.23 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basis for demonstrating in vivo bioavailability or bioequivalence.</ITAG>(a)(1) The in vivo bioavailability of a drug product is demonstrated ifthe product's rate and extent of absorption, as determined by comparisonof measured  338 parameters, e.g., concentration of the active drug ingredientin the blood, urinary excretion rates, or pharmacological effects, do notindicate a significant difference from the reference material's rate andextent of absorption. For drug products that are not intended to be absorbedinto the bloodstream, bioavailability may be assessed by measurements intendedto reflect the rate and extent to which the active ingredient or activemoiety becomes available at the site of action. (2) Statistical techniques used shall be of sufficient sensitivity to detectdifferences in rate and extent of absorption that are not attributableto subject variability. (3) A drug product that differs from the reference material in its rateof absorption, but not in its extent of absorption, may be considered tobe bioavailable if the difference in the rate of absorption is intentional,is appropriately reflected in the labeling, is not essential to the attainmentof effective body drug concentrations on chronic use, and is consideredmedically insignificant for the drug product. (b) Two drug products will be considered bioequivalent drug products ifthey are pharmaceutical equivalents or pharmaceutical alternatives whoserate and extent of absorption do not show a significant difference whenadministered at the same molar dose of the active moiety under similarexperimental conditions, either single dose or multiple dose. Some pharmaceuticalequivalents or pharmaceutical alternatives may be equivalent in the extentof their absorption but not in their rate of absorption and yet may beconsidered bioequivalent because such differences in the rate of absorptionare intentional and are reflected in the labeling, are not essential tothe attainment of effective body drug concentrations on chronic use, andare considered medically insignificant for the particular drug productstudied.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.24 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Types of evidence to establish bioavailability or bioequivalence.</ITAG>(a) Bioavailability or bioequivalence may be determined by several in vivoand in vitro methods. FDA may require in vivo or in vitro testing, or both,to establish the bioavailability of a drug product or the bioequivalenceof specific drug products. Information on bioequivalence requirements forspecific products is included in the current edition of FDA's publication``Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations'' andany current supplement to the publication. The selection of the methodused to meet an in vivo or in vitro testing requirement depends upon thepurpose of the study, the analytical methods available, and the natureof the drug product. Applicants shall conduct bioavailability and bioequivalencetesting using the most accurate, sensitive, and reproducible approach availableamong those set forth in paragraph (b) of this section. The method usedmust be capable of demonstrating bioavailability or bioequivalence, asappropriate, for the product being tested.(b) The following in vivo and in vitro approaches, in descending orderof accuracy, sensitivity, and reproducibility are acceptable for determiningthe bioavailability or bioequivalence of a drug product. (1)(i) An in vivo test in humans in which the concentration of the activeingredient or active moiety and its active metabolites, in whole blood,plasma, serum, or other appropriate biological fluid is measured as a functionof time. This approach is particularly applicable to dosage forms intendedto deliver the active moiety to the bloodstream for systemic distributionwithin the body; or (ii) An in vitro test that has been correlated with and is predictive ofhuman in vivo bioavailability data; or (iii) An in vivo test in animals that has been correlated with and is predictiveof human bioavailability data. (2) An in vivo test in humans in which the urinary excretion of the activemoiety and its active metabolites are measured as a function of time. Theintervals at which measurements are taken should ordinarily be as shortas possible so that the measure of the rate of elimination is as accurateas possible. Depending on the nature of the drug product, this approachmay be applicable to the category of dosage forms described in paragraph(b)(1)(i) of this section. This method is not appropriate where urinaryexcretion is not a significant mechanism of elimination. (3) An in vivo test in humans in which an appropriate acute pharmacologicaleffect of the active moiety and its active metabolites are measured asa function of time if such effect can be measured with sufficient accuracy,sensitivity, and reproducibility. This approach is applicable to the categoryof dosage forms described in paragraph (b)(1)(i) of this section only whenappropriate methods are not available for measurement of the concentrationof the active moiety and its active metabolites in biological fluids orexcretory products but a method is available for the measurement of anappropriate acute pharmacological effect. This approach may be particularlyapplicable to dosage forms that are not intended to deliver the activemoiety to the bloodstream for systemic distribution. (4) Well-controlled clinical trials in humans that establish the safetyand effectiveness of the drug product, for purposes of establishing bioavailabilityor, appropriately designed comparative clinical trials, for purposes ofdemonstrating bioequivalence. This approach is the least accurate, sensitive,and reproducible of the general approaches for determining bioavailabilityor bioequivalence. For dosage forms intended to deliver the active moietyto the bloodstream for systemic distribution, this approach may be consideredacceptable only when analytical methods cannot be developed to permit useof one of the approaches outlined in paragraphs (b)(1)(i) and (2) of thissection, when the approaches described in paragraphs (b)(1) (ii) and (iii)and (b)(3) are not available. This approach may also be considered sufficientlyaccurate for determining the bioavailability or bioequivalence of dosageforms intended to deliver the active moiety locally, e.g., topical preparationsfor the skin, eye, and mucous membranes; oral dosage forms not intendedto be absorbed, e.g., an antacid or radiopaque medium; and bronchodilatorsadministered by inhalation if the onset and duration of pharmacologicalactivity are defined. (5) Any other approach deemed adequate to establish bioavailability orbioequivalence by the Food and Drug Administration (FDA). (c) FDA may, notwithstanding prior requirements for establishing bioavailabilityor bioequivalence, require in vivo testing in humans of a product at anytime if the agency has evidence that the product: (1) May not produce therapeutic effects comparable to a pharmaceuticalequivalent or alternative with which it is intended to be used interchangeably;(2) May not be bioequivalent to a pharmaceutical equivalent or alternativewith which it is intended to be used interchangeably; or (3) Has greater than anticipated potential toxicity related to pharmacokineticor other characteristics.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inquiries regarding bioavailability and bioequivalence requirementsand review of protocols by the Food and Drug Administration.</ITAG>(a) The Commissioner of Food and Drugs strongly recommends that, to avoidthe conduct of an improper study and unnecessary human research, any personplanning to conduct a bioavailability or bioequivalence study submit theproposed protocol for the study to the Food and Drug Administration (FDA)for review prior to the initiation of the study.(b) FDA may review a proposed protocol for a bioavailability or bioequivalencestudy and will offer advice with respect to whether the following conditionsare met:(1) The design of the proposed bioavailability or bioequivalence studyis appropriate.(2) The reference material to be used in the bioavailability or bioequivalencestudy is appropriate.(3) The proposed chemical and statistical analytical methods are adequate.(c)(1) General inquiries relating to in vivo bioavailability requirementsand methodology shall be submitted to the Food and Drug Administration,Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Division of Biopharmaceutics (HFD-420),5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857.(2) General inquiries relating to bioequivalence requirements and methodologyshall be submitted to the Food and Drug Administration, Center for DrugEvaluation and Research, Division of Bioequivalence (HFD-250), 5600 FishersLane, Rockville, MD 20857.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability of requirements regarding an ``Investigational New DrugApplication.''</ITAG>(a) Any person planning to conduct an in vivo bioavailability or bioequivalencestudy in humans shall submit an ``Investigational New Drug Application''(IND) if:(1) The test product contains a new chemical entity as defined in andSection;314.108(a) of this chapter; or(2) The study involves a radioactively labeled drug product; or(3) The study involves a cytotoxic drug product. (b) Any person planning to conduct a bioavailability study in humans usinga drug product that contains an already approved non-new chemical entityshall submit an IND if the study is one of the following:(1) A single-dose study in normal subjects or patients where either thesingle or total daily dose exceeds that specified in the labeling of thedrug product that is the subject of an approved new drug application orabbreviated new drug application.(2) A multiple-dose study in normal subjects or patients where either thesingle or total daily dose exceeds that specified in the labeling of thedrug product that is the subject of an approved new drug application orabbreviated new drug application.(3) A multiple-dose study on a controlled release product on which no single-dosestudy has been completed.(c) The provisions of Part 312 of this chapter are applicable to any bioavailabilityor bioequivalence study conducted under an ``Investigational New Drug Application.''(d) [Reserved](e) [Reserved](f) An in vivo bioavailability or bioequivalence study in humans shallbe conducted in compliance with the requirements for institutional reviewset forth in Part 56 of this chapter, and informed consent set forth inPart 50 of this chapter, regardless of whether the study is conducted underan ``Investigational New Drug Application.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>37. Section 320.50 <T3>Purpose</T3> is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>38. Section 320.51 <T3>Procedures for establishing or amending a bioequivalence requirement</T3>is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 320.32]</ITAG>39. Part 320 is amended by redesignating andSection; 320.52 as andSection;320.32 in Subpart B, and by revising the section heading and the introductoryparagraph to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria and evidence to assess actual or potential bioequivalenceproblems.</ITAG>The Commissioner shall consider the following factors, when supported bywell-documented evidence, to identify specific pharmaceutical equivalentsand pharmaceutical alternatives that are not or may not be bioequivalentdrug products:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.53</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>40. Section 320.53 <T3>Types of bioequivalence requirements</T3> is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.54</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>41. Section 320.54 <T3>Contents of a petition to establish a bioequivalence requirement</T3>is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 320.55 and 320.56</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection;andSection; 320.33 and 320.34]</ITAG>42. Part 320 is amended by redesignating andSection; 320.55 <T3>Requirements for batch testing and certification by the Food and DrugAdministration</T3> and andSection; 320.56 <T3>Requirements for in vitro testing of each batch</T3> as andSection;andSection;320.33 and 320.34 in Subpart B, respectively.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.57</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>43. Section 320.57 <T3>Requirements for the conduct of in vivo bioequivalence testing in humans</T3>is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.58</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>44. Section 320.58 <T3>Requirements for marketing a drug product subject to a bioequivalencerequirement</T3> is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.59</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>45. Section 320.59 <T3>Bioequivalence requirements based on data voluntarily submitted</T3>is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>46. Section 320.60 <T3>Bioequivalence requirements for a drug product subject to an old drugmonograph</T3> is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>47. Section 320.61 <T3>Requirements for in vivo testing of a drug product not meeting an invitro bioequivalence standard</T3> is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 320.62</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated]</ITAG>48. Part 320 is amended by redesignating andSection; 320.62 <T3>Requirements for maintenance of records of bioequivalance testing</T3>as andSection; 320.35 in Subpart B.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: March 2, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Frank E. Young,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Food and Drugs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-16024 Filed 7-7-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4160-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>